OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  NETWORKING

AND  INFORMATION  TECHNOLOGY  RESEARCH

AND  DEVELOPMENT  (NITRD)  PROGRAM

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

JULY  31,  2008

Serial No. 110–119

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

43–688PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2008

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
ANDRE´ CARSON,  Indiana

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia
VACANCY

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

July  31,  2008

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Bart  Gordon,  Chairman,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Ralph  M.  Hall,  Minority  Ranking  Member,
Committee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .........
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Com-
mittee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Harry  E.  Mitchell,  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .................

Witnesses:

Dr.  Christopher  L.  Greer,  Director,  National  Coordination  Office  for  Net-
working  and  Information  Technology  Research  and  Development  (NCO/
NITRD)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Daniel  A.  Reed,  Director,  Scalable  and  Multicore  Computing,  Microsoft

Corporation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Craig  A.  Stewart,  Chair,  Coalition  for  Academic  Scientific  Computing;

Associate Dean, Research Technologies, Indiana University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr. Don C. Winter, Vice President, Engineering and Information Technology,

Phantom Works, the Boeing Company

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Appendix:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr.  Christopher  L.  Greer,  Director,  National  Coordination  Office  for  Net-
working  and  Information  Technology  Research  and  Development  (NCO/
NITRD) ..................................................................................................................
Dr.  Daniel  A.  Reed,  Director,  Scalable  and  Multicore  Computing,  Microsoft
Corporation ...........................................................................................................
Dr.  Craig  A.  Stewart,  Chair,  Coalition  for  Academic  Scientific  Computing;
Associate Dean, Research Technologies, Indiana University ...........................

(III)

7
8

9
9

10

11

11
13
26

26
28
35

36
37
41

42
44
48
48

58

64

67

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Mr. Don C. Winter, Vice President, Engineering and Information Technology,
Phantom Works, the Boeing Company ...............................................................

Page

70

IV

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  NETWORKING  AND  IN-
FORMATION  TECHNOLOGY  RESEARCH  AND
DEVELOPMENT  (NITRD)  PROGRAM

THURSDAY,  JULY  31,  2008

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:03  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Bart  Gordon
[Chairman of the Committee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Oversight of the Networking

and Information Technology Research

Development (NITRD) Program

THURSDAY, JULY 31, 2008

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  Thursday,  July  31,  2008,  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology  will  hold
an oversight hearing to review the multi-agency, coordinated Networking and Infor-
mation  Technology  Research  and  Development  (NITRD)  program.  The  hearing  will
examine  the  current  program  in  light  of  the  recent  assessment  of  the  President’s
Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  (PCAST)  and  explore  whether  addi-
tional legislative adjustments to the program are needed.

2. Witnesses
Dr. Chris L. Greer, Director, National Coordination Office for Networking and In-
formation Technology Research and Development (NCO/NITRD).

The  NCO/NITRD  provides  staff  support  for  the  subcommittees  and  working
groups of the National Science and Technology Council that are responsible for plan-
ning and coordinating the NITRD program and serves as the interface with the pub-
lic for the NITRD program.
Dr. Daniel A. Reed, Director of Scalable and Multicore Computing, Microsoft.

Dr.  Reed  is  a  member  of  PCAST  and  of  the  PCAST  committee  that  carried  out
the  recent  assessment  of  the  NITRD  program.  He  previously  served  as  a  member
of the President’s Information Technology Advisory Committee.
Dr.  Craig  Stewart,  Associate  Dean,  Research  Technologies,  Indiana  University,
and representing the Coalition for Academic Scientific Computation (CASC).

CASC members are academic and government computer centers that support com-
putational research in science and engineering and that are involved in applications
requiring  high-performance  computers  and  networks  and  advanced  software  devel-
opment.
Mr.  Don  C.  Winter,  Vice  President—Engineering  and  Information  Technology,
Phantom Works, the Boeing Company.

Mr.  Winter  has  been  involved  in  a  planning  effort  with  others  from  industry  and
academia  to  develop  a  research  agenda  and  roadmap  in  the  area  of  cyber-physical
systems,  which  is  one  of  the  key  research  areas  the  PCAST  assessment  calls  out
for increased funding under the NITRD program.

3. Overarching Questions

pursuing?

• Do the objectives of the NITRD program address the most important informa-
tion  technology  R&D  issues?  Are  the  R&D  objectives  prioritized  and  are  the
resources allocated appropriately to achieve the objectives?
• Are  there  significant  research  opportunities  that  the  NITRD  program  is  not
• Is the overall funding level for the NITRD program adequate for maintaining
• Are  any  changes  needed  to  the  planning,  coordination,  and  prioritization
mechanisms  of  the  NITRD  program  in  order  to  make  them  function  more  ef-
fectively?
• Does  the  research  community—both  academe  and  industry—have  a  voice  in
influencing  the  research  priorities  under  the  NITRD  program?  Are  improve-
ments needed in the external advisory process for the NITRD program?

U.S. leadership in this important technology field?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

• Do the recommendations of the recent PCAST assessment of the NITRD pro-
gram encompass all of the key issues necessary to make the NITRD program
more  effective  and  relevant  to  research  needs  and  opportunities  in  informa-
tion technology?

4. Background
NITRD Program

The  High-Performance  Computing  Act  of  1991  (P.L.  102–194),  which  the  Science
and Technology Committee was instrumental in enacting, authorized a multi-agency
research  program,  called  the  High  Performance  Computing  and  Communications
program,  to  accelerate  progress  in  the  advancement  of  computing  and  networking
technologies  and  to  support  leading  edge  computational  research  in  a  range  of
science  and  engineering  fields.  The  name  of  the  program  has  evolved  to  the  Net-
working and Information Technology Research and Development (NITRD) program.
The statute established a set of mechanisms and procedures to provide for the inter-
agency  planning,  coordination,  and  budgeting  of  the  research  and  development  ac-
tivities carried out under the program.

For  FY  2009,  13  federal  agencies  will  contribute  funding  to  the  NITRD  program
and  additional  agencies  that  do  not  contribute  funding  participate  in  planning  ac-
tivities.  The  FY  2009  budget  request  for  the  NITRD  program  is  $3.548  billion,  an
increase  of  $0.207  billion  or  approximately  six  percent,  over  the  FY  2008  level  of
$3.341  billion.  A  summary  of  the  major  research  components  of  the  program  and
funding  levels  by  major  component  and  by  agency  is  available  at:  http://
www.nitrd.gov/pubs/2009supplement/index.htm

Assessment  of  NITRD  by  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Tech-

nology (PCAST)

P.L.  102–194  provided  for  an  external  advisory  committee  for  the  NITRD  pro-
gram. A subsequent executive order created the President’s Information Technology
Advisory  Committee  (PITAC).  The  current  Administration  allowed  that  committee
to  expire  and  in  its  place  assigned  the  advisory  function  for  the  NITRD  program
to  PCAST.  Last  August  PCAST  completed  an  assessment  of  the  NITRD  program
and issued a report, ‘‘Leadership Under Challenge: Information Technology R&D in
a 
[http://www.nitrd.gov/pcast/reports/PCAST-NIT-
FINAL.pdf].

Competitive  World’’ 

The  PCAST  report  includes  several  findings  and  recommendations  related  to  the
research content of the program, as well as suggestions for improving the program’s
planning, prioritization and coordination. The recommendations from the PCAST re-
port include:

• Federal agencies should rebalance their NITRD funding portfolios by increas-
ing  support  for  important  problems  that  require  larger-scale,  longer-term,
multi-disciplinary  R&D  and  increasing  emphasis  on  innovative  and  therefore
higher-risk but potentially higher-payoff explorations.

• As new funding becomes available for the NITRD program, disproportionately

larger increases should go for:

Æ research  on  NIT  systems  connected  with  the  physical  world  (which  are

also called embedded, engineered, or cyber-physical systems);

Æ software R&D;
Æ a  national  strategy  and  implementation  plan  to  assure  the  long-term
preservation, stewardship, and widespread availability of data important
to science and technology; and

Æ networking  R&D, 

mobile4networking technologies.

including  upgrading  the  Internet  and  R&D 

in

• The NITRD agencies should:

Æ develop,  maintain,  and  implement  a  strategic  plan  for  the  NITRD  pro-

gram;

Æ conduct periodic assessments of the major components of the NITRD pro-

gram and restructure the program when warranted;

Æ develop, maintain, and implement public R&D plans or roadmaps for key
technical  areas  that  require  long-term  interagency  coordination  and  en-
gagement; and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

Æ develop  a  set  of  metrics  and  other  indicators  of  progress  for  the  NITRD
program,  including  an  estimate  of  investments  in  basic  and  applied  re-
search, and use them to assess NITRD program progress.

• The  NITRD  National  Coordination  Office  should  support  the  development,
maintenance,  and  implementation  of  the  NITRD  strategic  plan  and  R&D
plans  for  key  technical  areas;  and  it  should  be  more  proactive  in  commu-
nicating with outside groups.

Cyber-Physical Systems

The top recommendation of the PCAST report for new research investments in the
NITRD program is in the area of computer-driven systems connected with the phys-
ical world—also called embedded, engineered, or cyber-physical systems (CPS). CPS
are  connected  to  the  physical  world  through  sensors  and  actuators  to  perform  cru-
cial  monitoring  and  control  functions.  Such  systems  would  include  the  air-traffic-
control system, the power-grid, water-supply systems, and industrial process control
systems. On a more individual level, they are found in automobiles and home health
care devices.

Examples of CPS are already in widespread use but growing demand for new ca-
pabilities and applications will require significant technical advances. Such systems
can  be  difficult  and  costly  to  design,  build,  test,  and  maintain.  They  often  involve
the  intricate  integration  of  myriad  networked  software  and  hardware  components,
including  multiple  subsystems.  In  monitoring  and  controlling  the  functioning  of
complex,  fast-acting  physical  systems  (such  as  medical  devices,  weapons  systems,
manufacturing  processes,  and  power-distribution  facilities),  they  must  operate  reli-
ably  in  real  time  under  strict  constraints  on  computing,  memory,  power,  speed,
weight,  and  cost.  Moreover,  most  uses  of  cyber-physical  systems  are  safety-critical:
they must continue to function even when under attack or stress.

There is evidence that CPS will be an area of international economic competition.
For example, the European Union’s Advanced Research and Technology for Embed-
ded  Intelligence  and  Systems  (ARTEMIS)  program,  funded  by  a  public-private  in-
vestment of 5.4 billion euros (over $7 billion in mid-2007 dollars) between 2007 and
2013,  is  pursuing  R&D  to  achieve  ‘‘world  leadership  in  intelligent  electronic  sys-
tems’’ by 2016.

Recent Amendments to P.L. 102–194 [included in COMPETES Act]

In 1999, the PITAC released an assessment of the NITRD program (‘‘Information
Technology  Research:  Investing  in  Our  Future’’)  that  found  the  research  sponsored
to  be  migrating  too  much  toward  support  for  near-term,  mission  focused  objectives;
that  found  a  growing  gap  emerging  between  the  power  of  high-performance  com-
puters available to support agency mission requirements versus support for the gen-
eral  academic  research  community;  and  that  found  the  total  federal  information
technology investment inadequate. In response to that report, the Committee devel-
oped legislation that passed the House in similar form in the 108th (H.R. 4218) and
109th (H.R. 28) Congresses, but failed to be picked up in the Senate. It was finally
incorporated in the COMPETES Act (section 7024(a) ) in this Congress.

The COMPETES Act amends the 1991 Act in several ways:

Program  Planning.  Specifies  that  the  external  advisory  committee  for  the  pro-
gram,  which  must  be  re-constituted  as  a  separate  stand-alone  committee,  must
carry out biennial reviews of the funding, content and management of the inter-
agency  R&D  program  and  report  its  findings  to  Congress.  Also,  the  annual  re-
port on the program prepared by the OSTP Director must now describe how the
program  has  been  modified  in  response  to  advisory  Committee’s  recommenda-
tions.
High-End  Computing.  Requires  OSTP  to  develop  and  maintain  a  roadmap  for
developing  and  deploying  very  high-performance  computing  (high-end)  systems
necessary  to  ensure  that  the  U.S.  research  community  has  sustained  access  to
the most capable computing systems.
Large  Scale  Applications.  Clarifies  that  Grand  Challenge  problems  supported
under the interagency program are intended to involve multi-disciplinary teams
of  researchers  working  on  science  and  engineering  problems  that  demand  the
most capable high performance computing and networking resources. Consistent
with  this  requirement,  the  language  also  specifies  that  provision  for  access  to
high  performance  computing  systems  includes  technical  support  to  users  of
these systems.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5. Witness Questions

6

Dr. Greer was asked to provide an overview of the current planning and coordina-
tion  mechanisms  of  the  NITRD  program,  along  with  any  recommendations  on  how
to  improve  their  effectiveness;  a  description  of  any  actions  by  the  NITRD  agencies
that  have  been  taken,  or  that  are  in  the  planning  stages,  in  response  to  the  rec-
ommendations of the PCAST report; a description of the role of the National Coordi-
nation  Office  in  supporting  the  activities  of  the  NITRD  program;  and  his  response
to the findings and recommendations of the PCAST report related to the functioning
of the NCO.

The  other  witnesses  were  asked  to  review  and  comment  on  the  findings  and  rec-
ommendations  contained  in  the  PCAST  report  regarding  both  the  administration
and planning for the NITRD program and also the research priorities that the pro-
gram  should  address.  They  were  asked  for  their  views  on  the  merit  of  these  rec-
ommendations and on what they see as the key steps to take that would strengthen
the NITRD program, including any issues not addressed by the PCAST report.

Mr.  Winter  was  particularly  asked  to  provide  his  views  on  the  PCAST  rec-
ommendation related to the need for the NITRD program to place greater emphasis
on research on cyber-physical systems.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

Chairman GORDON. I want to welcome everyone to this morning’s
hearing  to  review  the  federal,  interagency  research  initiative  in
networking  and  information  technology,  known  as  the  NITRD  pro-
gram.

Information  technology  is  a  major  driver  of  economic  growth.  It
creates  high-wage  jobs,  provides  for  rapid  communication  through-
out  the  world,  and  provides  the  tools  for  acquiring  knowledge  and
insight  from  information.  Advances  in  computing  and  communica-
tions  have  a  broad  impact.  For  example,  information  technology
helps to make the workplace more productive, to improve the qual-
ity  of  health  care,  and  to  make  government  more  responsive  and
accessible to the needs of our citizens. In short, networking and in-
formation  technology  is  an  essential  component  of  U.S.  scientific,
industrial, and military competitiveness.

Vigorous  long-term  research  is  essential  to  realize  the  potential
benefits  of  information  technology.  Many  of  the  technical  advances
that led to today’s computers and the Internet resulted from feder-
ally  sponsored  research,  in  partnership  with  industry  and  univer-
sities.

The  depth  and  strength  of  U.S.  capabilities  in  information  tech-
nology  stem  in  part  from  the  sustained  research  and  development
program  carried  out  by  the  federal  research  agencies  under  a  pro-
gram codified by the High-Performance Computing Act of 1991. The
Science and Technology Committee has a long history of encourage-
ment  and  support  for  research  on  information  technologies  and
played  a  prominent  role  in  the  development  and  passage  of  the
1991 Act.

The  Act  created  a  multi-agency  R&D  program  to  accelerate  the
development  of  information  technology  and  to  attack  challenging
computational  science  and  engineering  problems.  Also,  it  put  in
place a formal process for planning and budgeting for the activities
carried out under what is now known as the NITRD program.

The  fiscal  year  2008  budget  for  this  interagency  program  is  $3.3
billion.  The  agencies  providing  the  largest  portions  of  this  funding
are  the  Department  of  Defense,  the  National  Science  Foundation,
the  Department  of  Energy,  and  the  National  Institutes  of  Health.
I  believe  the  NITRD  program  has  been  largely  a  success.  It  has
made a substantial contribution to moving computation to an equal
place  along  side  theory  and  experiment  for  conducting  research  in
science and engineering.

Moreover,  it  has  developed  the  computing  and  networking  infra-
structure needed to support leading edge research and to drive the
technology forward for a range of commercial applications that ben-
efit society broadly.

The  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology,
the  PCAST,  recently  carried  out  an  assessment  of  the  NITRD  pro-
gram. This assessment raises some significant issues about wheth-
er  the  NITRD  program  is  allocating  its  resources  in  ways  to
achieve  the  maximum  payoffs.  PCAST  makes  a  series  of  rec-
ommendations  that  identify  research  areas  needing  additional  re-
sources  and  suggests  that  the  modes  of  research  support  provided
by the program are less than optimum.

In  particular,  PCAST  believes  that  the  NITRD  program  should
provide more of its funding for conducting high-risk/high-reward re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

search  and  support  more  large-scale,  interdisciplinary  research
projects.  It  also  recommends  that  the  NITRD  program  institute  a
strategic  planning  process  to  strengthen  priority  setting  under  the
program.  I  believe  that  PCAST  raises  issues  that  need  to  be  seri-
ously  considered  and  then  addressed,  as  appropriate,  through  the
legislative  adjustments  to  the  NITRD  authorizing  statute.  This
hearing is the first step in a process, which the Committee will con-
duct next year.

To  assist  us  in  the  development  of  legislation,  this  hearing  pro-
vides  the  opportunity  to  receive  the  views  of  expert  witnesses  on
the findings and recommendations of the PCAST assessment of the
NITRD  program.  I  am  also  interested  in  any  comments  or  sugges-
tions the witnesses may have on other aspects of the program that
are  not  covered  by  the  PCAST  assessment  but  would  lead  to  a
more effective program.

I  want  to  thank  our  witnesses  for  their  attendance  at  this  hear-

ing and look forward to our discussions.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Gordon follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BART GORDON

I want to welcome everyone to this morning’s hearing to review the federal, inter-
agency  research  initiative  in  networking  and  information  technology,  known  as  the
NITRD [‘‘ny-ter D’’] program.

Information technology is a major driver of economic growth. It creates high-wage
jobs, provides for rapid communication throughout the world, and provides the tools
for acquiring knowledge and insight from information.

Advances in computing and communications have broad impact. For example, in-
formation  technology  helps  to  make  the  workplace  more  productive,  to  improve  the
quality  of  health  care,  and  to  make  government  more  responsive  and  accessible  to
the needs of our citizens.

In short, networking and information technology is an essential component of U.S.

scientific, industrial, and military competitiveness.

Vigorous  long-term  research  is  essential  for  realizing  the  potential  benefits  of  in-
formation technology. Many of the technical advances that led to today’s computers
and the Internet resulted from federally sponsored research, in partnership with in-
dustry and universities.

The depth and strength of U.S. capabilities in information technology stem in part
from  the  sustained  research  and  development  program  carried  out  by  federal  re-
search  agencies  under  a  program  codified  by  the  High-Performance  Computing  Act
of  1991.  The  Science  and  Technology  Committee  has  a  long  history  of  encourage-
ment and support for research on information technologies and played a prominent
role in the development and passage of the 1991 Act.

The  Act  created  a  multi-agency  R&D  program  to  accelerate  the  development  of
information  technology  and  to  attack  challenging  computational  science  and  engi-
neering problems. Also, it put in place a formal process for planning and budgeting
for the activities carried out under the NITRD program.

The  Fiscal  Year  2008  budget  for  this  interagency  program  is  $3.3  billion.  The
agencies  providing  the  largest  portions  of  this  funding  are  the  Department  of  De-
fense,  the  National  Science  Foundation,  the  Department  of  Energy,  and  the  Na-
tional Institutes of Health.

I believe the NITRD program has been largely a success. It has made a substan-
tial contribution to moving computation to an equal place along side theory and ex-
periment for conducting research in science and engineering.

Moreover,  it  has  developed  the  computing  and  networking  infrastructure  needed
to  support  leading  edge  research  and  to  drive  the  technology  forward  for  a  range
of commercial applications that benefit society broadly.

The  technical  advances  that  led  to  today’s  computing  devices  and  networks,  and
the software that drive them, evolved from past research sponsored by industry and
government,  often  in  partnership,  and  conducted  by  industry,  universities,  and  fed-
eral labs.

The  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology—the  PCAST—re-
cently  carried  out  an  assessment  of  the  NITRD  program.  This  assessment  raises

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

some  significant  issues  about  whether  the  NITRD  program  is  allocating  its  re-
sources in ways to achieve the maximum payoffs.

PCAST  makes  a  series  of  recommendations  that  identify  research  areas  needing
additional  resources  and  suggests  that  the  modes  of  research  support  provided  by
the program are less than optimum.

In  particular,  PCAST  believes  that  the  NITRD  program  should  provide  more  of
its  funding  for  conducting  high-risk/high-reward  research  and  support  more  large
scale,  interdisciplinary  research  projects.  It  also  recommends  that  the  NITRD  pro-
gram institute a strategic planning process to strengthen priority setting under the
program.

I  believe  that  PCAST  raises  issues  that  need  to  be  seriously  considered  and  then
addressed,  as  appropriate,  through  legislative  adjustments  to  the  NITRD  author-
izing  statute.  This  hearing  is  the  first  step  in  a  process,  which  the  Committee  will
conclude next year.

To  assist  us  in  the  development  of  legislation,  this  hearing  provides  the  oppor-
tunity to receive the views of expert witnesses on the findings and recommendations
of the PCAST assessment of the NITRD program.

I  am  also  interested  in  any  comments  or  suggestions  the  witnesses  may  have  on
other  aspects  of  the  program  that  are  not  covered  by  the  PCAST  assessment,  but
which could lead to a more effective program.

I  want  to  thank  our  witnesses  for  their  attendance  at  this  hearing  and  look  for-

ward to our discussion.

Chairman GORDON. And now I recognize my friend, Mr. Hall, for

his opening statement.

Mr.  HALL.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Gordon,  for  scheduling  the
oversight  hearing  of  the  NITRD  Program.  Of  course,  this  program
provides the primary mechanism by which the Federal Government
coordinates  this  nation’s  more  than  $3  billion  of  unclassified  net-
working  information  technology  research  and  development  invest-
ments,  and  you  are  absolutely  correct  in  highlighting  the  PCAST
report. To boil it down they simply said, ‘‘It is essential to U.S. eco-
nomic  prosperity,  security,  and  quality  of  life.’’  So  given  the  ever-
increasing amounts of networking and information technology that
affect  our  everyday  lives  from  power  grid  and  water  purification
systems  to  automotive  improvements  and  air  traffic  control  equip-
ment  to  home  health  care  devices  and  educational  software  pro-
grams,  it  is  important  that  we  not  only  continue  to  support  these
R&D efforts but also make sure that this program is appropriately
coordinating  with  our  classified  Cyber  Security  Initiatives  as  well.
In  fact,  I  believe  that  this  is  of  vital  importance  to  our  homeland
security and to our economy.

We  have  before  us  today  an  esteemed  panel  of  NIT  experts,  and
I  look  forward  to  hearing  their  views  and  how  to  make  an  already
exemplary  interagency  program  even  better,  and  I  yield  back  my
time.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hall follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RALPH M. HALL

Thank you Chairman Gordon for scheduling this oversight hearing on the NITRD
program. This program provides the primary mechanism by which the Federal Gov-
ernment coordinates this nation’s more than three billion dollars of unclassified net-
working and information technology (NIT) research and development (R&D) invest-
ments.

The  United  States  is  the  global  leader  in  NIT,  and  I  agree  with  the  authors  of
the  PCAST  Report  on  this  issue  when  they  say  that  our  continued  leadership  ‘‘is
essential to U.S. economic prosperity, security, and quality of life.’’

Given the ever increasing amounts of networking and information technology that
affect  our  everyday  lives  from  power  grid  and  water  purification  systems  to  auto-
motive  improvements  and  air  traffic  control  equipment  to  home  health-care  devices
and educational software programs, it is important that we not only continue to sup-
port these R&D efforts but also make sure that this program is appropriately coordi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

nating  with  our  classified  cyber  security  initiatives  as  well.  In  fact,  I  believe  that
this is of vital importance to our homeland security and to our economy.

We  have  before  us  today  an  esteemed  panel  of  NIT  experts,  and  I  look  forward
to  hearing  their  views  on  how  to  make  an  already  exemplary  interagency  program
even better.

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Hall.  At  this  time  we  nor-
mally  ask  that  Members  who  want  to  submit  their  opening  state-
ments, but since Mr. Sensenbrenner, because of his new status, we
will allow him to make any statements that he would like to at this
time.

Mr.  SENSENBRENNER.  Mr.  Sensenbrenner  is  a  man  of  few  words
unless  they  are  really  necessary.  Not  this  morning.  I  thank  the
Chair.

Chairman GORDON. All right. If that is the case, then if Members
would  like  to  submit  additional  opening  statements,  they  will  be
added to the record at this point.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

Good morning, Mr. Chairman and Ranking Member.
Today’s  hearing  on  oversight  of  the  Networking  and  Information  Technology  Re-

search and Development (NITRD) Program is important.

The  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology  is  tasked  with  the  important  activity

of seeing that our federal resources are allocated responsibly.

Investment in information technology is important to our nation, and it is impor-

tant to Texas.

Texas Instruments, located in Dallas, has been a leader in information technology.
Our  state  has  been  a  welcoming  place  for  high-tech  development,  as  is  evidenced
by cities like Austin, Dallas and Houston gaining reputation as high-tech hubs.

The  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  recently  assessed
the  NITRD  Program,  and  today’s  hearing  will  be  important  to  determine  whether
the  objectives  of  the  program  address  the  most  important  information  technology
R&D issues facing our nation.

We  need  to  know  if  this  program’s  research  objectives  are  prioritized  well,  and

whether currently allocated resources are appropriate to achieve these objectives.

It  is  the  Committee’s  distinct  honor  to  have  witnesses  representing  the  NITRD
program, as well as the President’s Council of Advisors on this issue, as well as aca-
demic and industry representatives who can offer unique perspectives.

Computer  networking  has  become  very  sophisticated.  Systems  of  computerized
sensors  perform  crucial  monitoring  and  control  functions.  Such  systems  include  the
air-traffic-control system, the power-grid, water-supply systems, and industrial proc-
ess  control  systems.  On  a  more  individual  level,  they  are  found  in  automobiles  and
home health care devices.

Our  nation  must  continue  to  innovate  and  stay  at  the  leading  edge  of  this  kind
of technology. Other nations are currently investing heavily in this activity and are
gaining competitive ground.

Take,  for  example,  the  European  Union’s  Advanced  Research  and  Technology  for

Embedded Intelligence and Systems (ARTEMIS) program.

This  effort  is  funded  by  a  public-private  investment  of  5.4  billion  euros  (over  $7
billion in mid-2007 dollars) between 2007 and 2013, is pursuing research to achieve
‘‘world leadership in intelligent electronic systems’’ by 2016.

President’s Council of Advisors on Science and Technology have provided guidance

on how our NITRD program should move forward.

Principal  among  their  recommendations  is  the  suggestion  to  rebalance  agency
funding  portfolios  to  support  more  long-term  projects,  as  well  as  research  that  is
considered to be high-risk.

The Council also advised that greater proportions of funding should go toward re-
search  in  networking  information  technology  systems  that  are  connected  with  the
physical world; and for mobile networking technologies.

In  addition,  the  Council  urged  agencies  to  implement  a  strategic  plan  for  the
NITRD  program;  and  they  should  develop  metrics  to  assess  the  progress  of  invest-
ments in research in these areas.

I want to thank the Council for their work to assess the NITRD program.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

I  hope  that  the  recommendations,  as  well  as  this  hearing,  will  help  the  Science
Committee  continue  to  be  a  good  steward  when  it  comes  to  allocation  of  funds  for
computer networking research.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Mitchell follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE HARRY E. MITCHELL

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Today  we  will  examine  current  status  of  the  Networking  and  Information  Tech-

nology Research and Development (NITRD) program.

In  1999,  an  assessment  of  the  NITRD  program  by  the  President’s  Information
Technology  Advisory  Committee  (PITAC)  concluded  that  the  research  sponsored  by
NITRD focused too much on near-term, mission focused objects.

In  response,  a  provision  in  the  America  COMPETES  Act,  legislation  that  was
drafted by this committee and now public law, aims to ensure that the NITRD sup-
ports large scale applications.

I look forward to hearing more today from our witnesses about what other legisla-

tive changes are necessary to the NITRD program.

I yield back.
Chairman  GORDON.  At  this  time  I  would  like  to  introduce  our
witnesses, and we have a very distinguished group here. First, Dr.
Chris Greer is the Director of NITRD National Coordination Office.
Welcome. Dr. Daniel Reed is the Director of Scalable and Multicore
Computing at Microsoft. Dr. Craig Stewart is Associate Dean of Re-
search  Technologies  at  Indiana  University.  He  is  representing  the
Coalition for Academic Scientific Computation. And finally, Dr. Don
Winter is the Vice President of Engineering and Information Tech-
nology for the Phantom Works, Boeing Company.

Our  witnesses  should  note  we  try  to  limit  our  spoken  testimony
to five minutes each which then Members will have an opportunity
to  question  for  five  minutes.  But  this  is  an  important  topic.  We
have Members at a variety of other hearings today, and so we want
to  be  sure  we  get  all  the  information  so  please  feel  free  to  again,
if  you  need  a  few  more  minutes  to  give  us  what  you  think  is  best,
we want to hear from that.

At this point, let us start with Dr. Greer.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  CHRISTOPHER  L.  GREER,  DIRECTOR,  NA-
TIONAL  COORDINATION  OFFICE  FOR  NETWORKING  AND  IN-
FORMATION  TECHNOLOGY  RESEARCH  AND  DEVELOPMENT
(NCO/NITRD)
Dr.  GREER.  Good  morning.  I  am  Chris  Greer,  and  I  am  Director
of  the  National  Coordination  Office  for  Networking  and  Informa-
tion  Technology  Research  and  Development,  the  NITRD  Program.
I want to thank Chairman Gordon, Ranking Member Hall, and the
Members  of  the  Committee  for  the  opportunity  to  come  here  today
to discuss this important issue with you. I am also accompanied by
a  number  of  members  seated  behind  me  of  the  NCO  NITRD  staff,
and  it  is  an  honor  to  sit  here  and  represent  the  remarkable  work
of  that  group.  And  I  commend  this  committee  for  initiating  the
High-Performance  Computing  Act  of  1991  and  its  subsequent
amendments, with its remarkably far-sighted mandate for R&D co-
ordination. The resulting federal program now in its 17th year has
become  a  model  for  multi-agency  cooperation.  The  program  has
grown substantially in size and scope since 1991. Today NITRD en-
compasses $3.5 billion in R&D across 13 member agencies as of the
President’s 2009 budget.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

NITRD  investments  further  our  nation’s  goals  for  national  de-
fense  and  national  security,  health  care,  energy,  education,  eco-
nomic competitiveness, environmental sustainability, and other na-
tional priorities.

My  written  testimony  provides  detailed  responses  to  the  ques-
tions  the  Committee  asked  me  to  address.  In  my  remarks  today,  I
want  to  highlight  strategic  planning.  This  is  NITRD’s  main  pro-
gram-wide  coordination  activity,  and  Appendix  3  of  that  written
testimony  provides  a  detailed  timeline  for  that  strategic  planning
and  road  mapping  process.  But  in  fact,  even  if  the  PCAST,  the
President’s Council Advisors on Science and Technology, hadn’t rec-
ommended  that  NITRD  develop  a  strategic  plan,  it  would  still  be
the  right  time  in  the  program’s  history  to  consider  where  NITRD
is going and how we can better manage that journey.

The  networking  and  IT  landscape  is  shifting  rapidly,  and  major
new  national  challenges  are  emerging.  The  program  has  recently
been  tasked,  for  example,  with  expanded  coordination  responsibil-
ities under the federal plan for advanced networking R&D, and the
Administration’s comprehensive National Cyber Security Initiative.
The  PCAST  assessment  of  NITRD  with  its  provocative  and  impor-
tant focus on rising global competition for networking and IT lead-
ership  sharpens  our  thinking  about  the  role  of  strategic  planning
and  shaping  NITRD  growth  and  change  to  meet  national  needs.
The PCAST report’s 17 recommendations, seven of which go to the
issue  of  planning,  provide  a  unique  opportunity  to  make  progress
toward  our  goals.  The  NITRD  Subcommittee  last  November  ap-
proved  development  of  a  comprehensive  strategic  plan  for  NITRD
and authorized my office to add a technical staff member dedicated
to support of that activity.

The  NITRD  Subcommittee  has  agreed  that  the  plan  should  be
first  vision  driven  with  the  theme  of  complexity  and  multiple  di-
mensions.  Second,  focused  on  goals  and  capabilities  that  can  only
be  achieved  through  interagency  cooperation  and  coordination  and
the  R&D  capabilities  and  challenges  required  to  achieve  those
goals.  It  should  also  be  predictive  of  an  effective  organizational
structure for the NITRD program.

As shown on the timeline in my written testimony, NITRD’s stra-
tegic  planning  task  group  is  working  intensively  on  the  plan  now,
including steps to solicit broad, private-sector input to the planning
process.

A  request  for  input  has  just  now  been  published  in  the  Federal
Register  and  widely  disseminated  to  academia,  to  industry,  and  to
professional  organizations.  A  national  workshop  planned  for  No-
vember  2008  will  provide  a  second  opportunity  for  public  input,
and the final draft will be posted for public comment in early 2009.
That  timeline  also  shows  that  PCAST  recommendations  on  as-
sessing  the  alignment  of  the  NITRD  research  areas  initiating  an
NCO  plan  to  support  the  overall  planning  process,  and  preparing
a fast-track education study are also being addressed.

Other  PCAST  recommendations  will  be  integrated  into  the
NITRD  planning  enterprise  as  the  comprehensive  strategic  plan
takes  shape  and  provides  the  larger  context.  Upon  completion  of
this  strategic  plan,  we  anticipate  providing  a  point-by-point  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

sponse to the PCAST recommendations informed and supported by
that plan.

We  agree  with  PCAST  that  leadership  in  networking  and  infor-
mation  technology  is  essential  to  U.S.  economic  prosperity,  secu-
rity,  and  quality  of  life.  The  federal  investments  that  we  make  in
research  and  development  in  this  area  are  the  keys  to  a  future  of
promise for our nation and for its citizens.

I look forward to working with the Congress to fulfill that prom-

ise. Thank you.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Greer follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHRISTOPHER L. GREER

Good morning. My name is Chris Greer and I am Director of the National Coordi-
nation  Office  (NCO)  for  Networking  and  Information  Technology  Research  and  De-
velopment (NITRD). With my colleague, Dr. Jeannette Wing of the National Science
Foundation (NSF), I co-chair the NITRD Subcommittee of the National Science and
Technology  Council’s  (NSTC)  Committee  on  Technology.  I  want  to  thank  Chairman
Gordon,  Ranking  Member  Hall,  and  the  Members  of  the  Committee  for  the  oppor-
tunity  to  come  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  Federal  Government’s  multi-agency
NITRD effort.

The NITRD Program—now in its 17th year—represents the Federal Government’s
portfolio  of  unclassified  investments  in  fundamental,  long-term  research  and  devel-
opment  (R&D)  in  advanced  networking  and  information  technology  (IT),  including
high-end  computing,  large-scale  networking,  cyber  security  and  information  assur-
ance,  human-computer  interaction,  information  management,  high-confidence  soft-
ware and systems, software design, and socioeconomic, education and workforce im-
plications  of  IT.  NITRD  research  is  performed  in  universities,  federal  research  cen-
ters  and  laboratories,  federally  funded  R&D  centers,  private  companies,  and  non-
profit  organizations  across  the  country.  Agencies  participating  in  the  NITRD  pro-
gram—including  13  member  agencies  and  a  number  of  other  participating  agencies
and  offices—support  vital  investments  in  R&D  and  research  infrastructure  to  fur-
ther  our  nation’s  goals  for  national  defense  and  national  security,  health  care,  en-
ergy,  education,  economic  competitiveness,  environmental  sustainability,  and  other
national  priorities.  Through  the  NITRD  program,  federal  agencies  work  together  to
ensure  that  the  impact  of  their  efforts  is  greater  than  the  sum  of  their  individual
investments.  This  is  accomplished  through  interaction  across  the  government,  aca-
demic,  commercial,  and  international  sectors  using  cooperation,  coordination,  infor-
mation sharing, and joint planning to identify critical needs, avoid duplication of ef-
fort,  maximize  resource  sharing,  and  partner  in  investments  to  pursue  higher-level
goals.

Mandate for coordination

Seventeen  years  ago,  when  Congress  passed  the  bipartisan  High-Performance
Computing  (HPC)  Act  of  1991  (Public  Law  102–194),  the  Act’s  mandate  for  inter-
agency  coordination  of  federal  networking  and  IT  R&D  was  remarkably  farsighted.
The  Act  established  a  powerful,  resilient  framework  for  federal  networking  and  IT
R&D activities. That framework combined ambitious research goals with specific re-
quirements for interagency cooperation, collaboration, and partnerships with indus-
try  and  academia.  The  validation  of  the  HPC  Act’s  core  vision  can  be  found  in  the
success  and  vitality  of  today’s  NITRD  Program,  which  has  become  a  model  for  co-
ordination across federal agencies.

The HPC Act was amended by the Next Generation Internet Research Act of 1998
(Public  Law  105–305)  and  the  America  COMPETES  Act  of  2007  (Public  Law  110–
69).  These  Acts  extended  the  scope  of  responsibilities  for  interagency  coordination
to  include  human-centered  systems;  flexible,  extensible,  inter-operable,  and  acces-
sible network technologies and implementations; education, training, and human re-
sources; and other areas. As a result, the NITRD Program now provides for coopera-
tion  and  coordination  across  a  broad  landscape,  allowing  it  to  tackle  the  inherently
multi-disciplinary,  multi-technology,  and  multi-sector  challenges  of  today’s  net-
working and IT research horizons.

The Office of Science and Technology Policy (OSTP), with the support of the Office
of  Management  and  Budget  (OMB)  and  the  participating  NITRD  agencies,  has
taken  a  vigorous  approach  to  implementing  the  enabling  NITRD  legislation.  The
NCO  Director  is  a  member  of  the  OSTP  technical  staff  group  with  direct  access  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

and  active  support  by  OSTP  and  OMB  staff  and  leadership.  In  addition  to  their  fi-
nancial  contributions,  the  participating  agencies  provide  the  time  of  some  of  their
most  capable  experts  and  senior  managers  to  pursue  NITRD  goals.  The  success  of
NITRD is due in large measure to the dedication and commitment of those who im-
plement the program.

Program history in brief

In its first annual report to the Congress, the then-High Performance Computing
and  Communications  (HPCC)  Program  reported  an  estimated  1991  multi-agency
budget of $489.4 million and a proposed 1992 budget of $638.3 million. Eight federal
agencies  were  represented  in  that  budget:  Defense  Advanced  Research  Projects
Agency  (DARPA),  Department  of  Energy  (DOE),  Environmental  Protection  Agency
(EPA), National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), National Institutes
of  Health  (NIH),  National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST),  National
Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA), and National Science Foundation
(NSF).  The  HPCC  program  had  four  major  research  areas  called  Program  Compo-
nent  Areas  (PCAs):  High  Performance  Computing  Systems  (HPCS);  Advanced  Soft-
ware  Technology  and  Algorithms  (ASTA);  National  Research  and  Education  Net-
work (NREN); and Basic Research and Human Resources (BRHR).

Since  1991,  the  Federal  IT  R&D  program  has  evolved  continuously,  addressing
the  continuing,  dramatic  expansion  in  computing  and  networking  technologies,  ap-
plications,  and  societal  needs  by  adjusting  the  research  focus  and  adding  new,
emerging  areas  of  interest.  This  includes  disaggregating  investments  in  high-end
computing infrastructure and applications from those in high-end computing (HEC)
systems and system software research, and adding software design and productivity,
high-confidence software and systems, and societal and workforce implications of IT.
Today,  the  NITRD  Program,  which  is  successor  to  the  original  HPCC  Program,
encompasses  $3.5  billion  (2009  Budget  Request)  in  R&D  funding  and  comprises  13
member  agencies—the  original  eight  agencies  plus  Agency  for  Healthcare  Research
and  Quality  (AHRQ),  National  Archives  and  Records  Administration  (NARA),  De-
partment  of  Energy/National  Nuclear  Security  Administration  (DOE/NNSA),  Na-
tional  Security  Agency  (NSA),  and  Office  of  the  Secretary  of  Defense  and  Depart-
ment of Defense Service research organizations (OSD and DOD Service research or-
ganizations). About a dozen other agencies that are not formal NITRD members also
participate in the eight Program Component Areas (PCAs) and other NITRD activi-
ties. (See Appendix 1 on page 14 for a list of the current NITRD agencies and PCAs
and a NITRD organizational chart.)

Response to the Committee Request

The invitation to testify from this House Committee included a request to address

three topic areas. Responses are provided in the numbered sections that follow.

Request #1: Current planning and coordination overview

The NITRD Program uses five general mechanisms to pursue its mission:

(1) Monthly meetings of the seven Federal Interagency Working Groups (IWGs)
and  Coordinating  Groups  (CGs)  chartered  under  the  auspices  of  the  NSTC

(2) Workshops, most including private-sector as well as federal participants
(3) Formal reports, including the annual NITRD Supplement to the President’s

Budget and strategic planning documents

(4) Support for external studies and assessments
(5) Outreach to the federal and private sectors

I’ll illustrate how these are used with examples for each mechanism.
In each NITRD Program Component Area (PCA), agencies work together in a CG
or  IWG  that  meets  monthly  to  identify  research  needs,  plan  programs,  share  best
practices, and review progress. These regular meetings allow groups to explore com-
plex  research  and  development  challenges.  As  an  example,  the  High  Confidence
Software and Systems (HCSS) CG is playing a leadership role in engaging research-
ers  and  industry  in  assessing  the  national  research  needs  in  the  complex  life-  and
safety-critical technologies called cyber-physical systems1 (defined here as IT embed-
ded  in  and  critical  to  the  function  of  a  physical  system;  aircraft  avionics  are  an  ex-
ample).  This  analysis  is  being  informed  by  a  workshop  series  engaging  the  aca-

1 In  its  2007  assessment  of  the  NITRD  Program,  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on
Science and Technology (PCAST) termed cyber-physical systems ‘‘a national priority for Federal
R&D.’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

demic, commercial, and government sectors. Recent workshops in this series covered
medical  device  software  and  systems,  with  participation  by  researchers,  clinicians,
hospital  administrators,  and  industry  representatives;  another  focused  on  auto-
motive  safety,  engaging  automobile  designers,  safety  experts,  and  engineers  and
academic  researchers.  The  next  in  the  series,  planned  for  Fall  2008,  will  focus  on
‘‘High Confidence Cyber-Physical Transportation Systems: A look at the Commercial
Aero,  Auto,  and  Rail  Sectors,  and  Military  Ground  and  Aerial  Unmanned  Autono-
mous Vehicles (UAVs).’’

During the 20-month period from October 2006 to May 2008, the NITRD Program
planned and held a total of 27 workshops—an average of 1.5 workshops per month.
Topics  include  composable  cyber  systems,  supervisory  control  and  data  acquisition
(SCADA)  systems  for  industrial  process/system  control,  and  an  upcoming  event  on
national  and  international  networking  research  challenges.  An  ongoing  series,  the
Collaborative  Expedition  Workshops,  covers  wide-ranging  topics  such  as  virtual
work  settings,  evaluation  of  emerging  technology  and  technology  development  pro-
grams, and scalable data management.

Formal reports produced during this same 20-month period include the 2007 and
2008 NITRD Supplement to the President’s Budget and the following strategic plan-
ning  documents  produced  by  ad  hoc  interagency  task  groups  of  NITRD  member
agencies and others:

Federal Plan for Advanced Networking Research and Development
On  January  30,  2007,  OSTP  Director  Jack  Marburger  established  an  Inter-
agency  Task  Force  on  Advanced  Networking  and  charged  it  with  developing  a
strategic  vision  and  long-range  plan  for  federal  networking  R&D;  he  requested
that  the  initial  draft  of  the  plan  be  completed  in  three  months,  by  May  2007,
to  provide  timely  input  for  the  FY  2009  budget  process.  Through  intensive  ef-
forts, the 40-member task force of NITRD and other agency representatives pro-
duced a draft on schedule, including a detailed analysis of networking research
challenges  that  has  been  extremely  well  received.  The  Task  Force  continued  to
refine  the  draft  over  the  next  12  months;  the  final  Federal  Plan  for  Advanced
Networking Research and Development is now being printed and will be sent to
all  Members  of  Congress  shortly.  The  preprint  version  of  the  Plan  is  available
on the NITRD Web site at: http://www.nitrd.gov/ITFAN-preprint-061108.pdf
Plan  for  Coordination  of  Federal  R&D  and  Plan  for  the  Leap-Ahead
Program of Research and Development
In  February  2008,  OSTP  called  for  an  Interagency  Task  Force  from  NITRD
agencies  and  others  to  develop  two  research-related  planning  documents  on  a
fast-track  basis  under  the  Comprehensive  National  Cybersecurity  Initiative
(CNCI),  established  by  National  Security  Presidential  Directive  54/Homeland
Security  Presidential  Directive  23  in  January  2008.  To  expedite  quick  turn-
around on this tasking, the 21 task force members divided into two groups. One
developed  the  plan  for  overall  coordination  of  the  federal  cyber  R&D  portfolio;
the  other  crafted  the  ‘‘Leap-Ahead’’  plan  for  accelerating  high-risk,  high-return
research  to  help  maintain  our  technological  edge  in  cyberspace.  These  plans
now  provide  the  basis  for  the  recent  launch  of  the  CNCI  R&D  planning  activi-
ties.
Under  the  CNCI  plans,  the  Cyber  Security  and  Information  Assurance  Inter-
agency  Working  Group  (CSIA  IWG)  chartered  by  the  NSTC  in  2006—aug-
mented by a new Senior Steering Group—is tasked with two new assignments:
leading  the  CNCI  R&D  coordination  activity  including  improving  coordination
between  the  unclassified  and  classified  Federal  R&D  sectors,  and  coordinating
the ‘‘Leap-Ahead’’ initiative. The CSIA IWG’s 2006 Federal Plan for Cyber Secu-
rity  and  Information  Assurance  Research  and  Development  provides  a  detailed
technical baseline for setting federal cyber R&D priorities under CNCI.

The NITRD Program supports external studies and reviews to expand its perspec-
tives  and  take  advantage  of  expertise  from  a  diversity  of  sources.  A  study  by  the
National Academies is currently underway to develop a better understanding of the
potential  scientific  and  technological  impact  of  high-end  capability  computing  in
science and engineering. Public release of the final report is expected in September
2008.  The  Program  recently  provided  briefings  and  written  inputs  to  the  Net-
working and Information Technology Subcommittee of the President’s Council of Ad-
visors  on  Science  and  Technology  (PCAST)  for  use  in  its  assessment  of  the  NITRD
Program.  Looking  ahead,  the  Program  developed  a  statement  of  work  for  the  first
of  the  fast-track  studies  on  NIT  post-secondary  education  called  for  by  the  PCAST
assessment of NITRD.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

The  NITRD  Program  uses  a  variety  of  mechanisms  to  reach  out  to  researchers,
private-sector  developers,  resource  providers,  and  end-users.  Examples  include  two
groups  under  the  Large  Scale  Networking  CG:  the  Joint  Engineering  Team  (JET)
and  Middleware  and  Grid  Infrastructure  Coordination  (MAGIC)  group,  which  have
academic and industry members; the Federal Agency Administration of Science and
Technology Education and Research (FASTER) Community of Practice (CoP), which
seeks  exchanges  of  information  with  the  private  sector  and  new  technologies  to
streamline  the  management  of  federal  research;  and  the  multi-sector  NITRD  re-
search workshops held in all the PCAs.

A number of efforts are underway to improve the effectiveness of NITRD planning
and  coordination.  These  include  revamping  the  NITRD  web  site  (both  public  and
federal-only  resources),  providing  improved  web-based  services  to  support  remote
participation and digital content sharing, and outreach visits by NCO technical staff
to  academic  and  commercial  organizations  as  a  required  component  of  regular  con-
ference travel.

The  high  sustained  level  of  collaborative  engagement  reflected  in  the  diverse
NITRD  activities  of  the  last  two  years  is,  in  my  judgment,  a  key  measure  of  the
effectiveness  of  the  NITRD  coordination  model—it  remains  resilient  amid  the  Pro-
gram’s  increasing  activities  and  expanding  responsibilities.  Another  measure  is  the
productive  synergy  gained  through  joint  funding,  partnerships  with  private-sector
entities, and sometimes a combination of the two. For example:

Collaboration
Benchmarks  for  Federal  HEC  systems:  The  HEC  agencies  are  collaborating  to
develop an interagency suite of HEC benchmarks that can accurately represent the
demands of federal advanced computing applications.
IPv6 debugging: DOD,  DOE/SC,  and  NASA  are  collaborating,  in  cooperation  with
the university networking consortium Internet2, in a project that is conducting end-
to-end  debugging,  performance  measurement,  and  toolset  enhancement  of  Internet
Protocol  version  6  (IPv6)  over  DOD’s  Defense  Research  and  Education  Network
(DREN), DOE/SC’s Energy Sciences network (ESnet), and Internet2Net.
Environmental  databases  and  data  distribution:  Through  the  Earth  System
Modeling  Framework  activity  and  related  efforts,  NITRD  agencies  (DOD,  EPA,
NASA, NOAA, NSF) continue their long-range cooperative work to expand the inter-
operability and usability of diverse models and large-scale data sets for weather, cli-
mate, and environmental research.

Joint funding/Partnerships
High-Productivity Computing Systems (HPCS) Phase III: This  DARPA  effort,
supported  also  by  DOE/SC  and  NSA  and  with  collaborative  participation  by  other
HEC  agencies,  involves  design,  fabrication,  integration,  and  demonstration  of  full-
scale prototypes by 2010 for a new generation of petascale, economically viable com-
puting systems.
HEC–University  Research  Activity  (HEC–URA):  In  2004,  HEC  R&D  agencies
(DARPA,  DOE/NNSA,  DOE/SC,  NASA,  NSA,  and  NSF)  initiated  this  program  of
high-risk  R&D  in  technically  challenging  areas  including  HEC  software  tools  and
compilers;  file  systems,  I/O,  and  storage  design  for  high  throughput;  and  new  par-
allel  programming  models  for  thousands  of  processors.  DARPA,  DOE/SC,  and  NSF
have  contributed  funding,  and  they  and  other  HEC  agencies  participate  in  reviews
and HEC–URA workshops.
DETERlab:  DHS  and  NSF,  with  university  and  industry  partners,  are  supporting
the cyber-DEfense Technology Experimental Research laboratory testbed, a general-
purpose  experimental  infrastructure  that  enables  research  and  development  on
next-generation cyber security technologies.
Open Science Grid (OSG):  NSF  and  DOE/SC  are  jointly  supporting  this  growing
consortium  of  about  100  researchers  and  software,  service,  and  resource  providers
from universities, national laboratories, and computing centers across the U.S. OSG
brings together distributed computing and storage resources from campuses and re-
search communities in a common, shared grid infrastructure over research networks
via a common set of middleware.
Trustworthy  Cyber  Infrastructure  for  the  Power  Grid  (TCIP):  In  this  effort
co-funded by NSF, DOE (OE), and DHS, researchers from the University of Illinois
at  Urbana-Champaign,  Dartmouth  College,  Cornell  University,  and  Washington
State  University  are  seeking  to  better  secure  operations  of  the  Nation’s  power  grid

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

by improving the engineering of its underlying IT infrastructure, making it more se-
cure, reliable, and safe.
Cluster  Exploratory  (CluE)  program:  NSF  has  formed  a  partnership  with
Google  and  IBM  that  will  enable  academic  researchers  to  explore  data-intensive
computing  applications  in  science  and  engineering  using  a  1,600-processor  server
farm set up and supported by the two companies.

Committee Request #2: PCAST assessment of the NITRD Program

Periodic  assessments  of  the  multi-agency  networking  and  IT  R&D  program  by  a
Presidential advisory committee are mandated by the HPC Act, as amended by the
Next  Generation  Internet  Research  Act  of  1998  and  most  recently  by  the  America
COMPETES  Act  of  2007.  Executive  Order  13385,  signed  September  29,  2005,  as-
signed  the  assessment  responsibility  to  PCAST,  which  in  2006  established  a  Net-
working  and  Information  Technology  (NIT)  Subcommittee  to  lead  the  process.  The
results of PCAST’s assessment are presented in the August 2007 report Leadership
Under Challenge: Information Technology R&D in a Competitive World.

Over  all,  the  PCAST  concluded  that  while  the  NITRD  program,  with  NCO  sup-
port, has in the past ‘‘been effective at meeting agency and national needs,’’ for the
future  ‘‘changes  are  needed  in  order  for  the  United  States  to  ensure  its  continued
leadership.’’  This  conclusion  recognizes  the  advent  of  an  era  of  global  NIT  competi-
tiveness in which ‘‘other countries and regions have also recognized the value of NIT
leadership and are mounting challenges.’’ The changes recommended by PCAST are
in the areas of education and workforce development, portfolio balance, new empha-
sis  areas,  and  strategic  planning.  The  PCAST  conclusions  and  recommendations
sharpen  our  focus  on  the  central  role  of  strategic  planning  in  shaping  NITRD
growth  and  change;  and  even  in  the  most  technically  difficult  R&D  areas  such  as
complex  software,  the  PCAST  recommendations  provide  an  opportunity  to  make
progress toward our goals.

The  PCAST  makes  17  recommendations  in  its  report.  (The  recommendations  are
listed  numerically,  in  sequence  by  chapter,  in  Appendix  2.  Recommendations  are
noted parenthetically by number in this testimony.) These recommendations can be
categorized as follows:

(1) Seven focus on improved planning processes (#9, 11–13, 16, 18, 20)
(2) Four  address  issues  of  portfolio  balance  and  emphasis  areas  (#2a,  6,  8,  14)
(3) Two suggest studies or consultations (#1, 10)
(4) Two focus on assessment (#17, 19)
(5) Two are addressed to the Director of OSTP (#7, 15)
(6) Three  call  for  efforts  to  ease  the  visa  process  for  international  students,

graduates, and visiting experts (#2b, 2c, 2d)

The  final  two  categories  fall  outside  the  purview  of  NITRD  and  this  testimony,
and  will  not  be  addressed  further.  I  would  like  to  address  the  first  four  categories
with a few comments and observations on each.

PCAST Category 1: Planning recommendations

The  PCAST  assessment  comes  at  a  developmental  turning  point  for  NITRD.  In
light of the maturation and increase in responsibilities I have described, it is clearly
the  right  time  in  NITRD  history  to  consider  where  we  are  going  and  how  we  can
better manage the journey. For this reason, and in light of the PCAST assessment,
the  NITRD  Subcommittee  has  initiated  the  development  of  a  comprehensive  stra-
tegic plan. The key features of this plan are that it is:

• Vision-driven with a theme of complexity in multiple dimensions
• Focused  on  goals  and  capabilities  that  can  only  be  achieved  through  inter-
agency cooperation and coordination, and the R&D capabilities and challenges
required to achieve those goals

• Predictive of an effective organizational structure for the NITRD Program

With  the  development  of  a  comprehensive  strategic  plan,  we  anticipate  a  point-
by-point  response  to  the  PCAST  recommendations  informed  and  supported  by  the
plan.

Process for developing NITRD Strategic Plan

At  its  November  2007  meeting,  the  NITRD  Subcommittee  approved  an  initiative
to  prepare  a  new  Strategic  Plan  for  NITRD  as  the  critical  initial  task  for  entering
a new phase of development. A detailed timeline for the strategic planning process,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

with  milestones,  is  provided  in  Appendix  3  (note  that  the  timeline  also  lists  the
PCAST recommendations relevant to the various steps in the process). This timeline
covers the period FY 2008–09 and has five major features:

(1) The plan development process has three subphases—initial content develop-
ment March through September 2008; text drafting and revision September
2008 through March 2009; and concurrence review with a target for release
in June 2009.

(2) The  process  provides  multiple  opportunities  and  mechanisms  for  public
input  including  a  Request  for  Input  (RFI)  for  initial  comments,  a  workshop
to engage all sectors, and public comments on a full draft plan.

(3) The  PCAST  recommendations  are  fully  integrated  into  and  help  guide  the

strategic planning process.

(4) The  development  of  PCA  strategic  plans  and  roadmaps  overlaps  with  and

is informed by the culmination of the NITRD strategic planning process.

(5) The strategic planning process is viewed as ongoing with regular opportuni-
ties  in  the  future  for  evolving  and  revising  the  plan  as  goals  are  achieved
and the networking and IT landscape changes.

Agency  representatives  kicked  off  the  strategic  planning  process  with  a  two-day
off-site  meeting  in  March  2008.  First  principles  agreed  upon  at  that  meeting  were
that the NITRD Strategic Plan should align with the strategic plans of the member
agencies,  and  that  the  Plan  should  focus  on  long-term  capabilities  that  require  the
research contributions of multiple agencies to achieve. An 18-member strategic plan-
ning team of agency representatives is now meeting weekly and is currently focused
on  the  task  of  initial  content  development.  A  Request  for  Input  (RFI)  appeared  in
the Federal Register July 24 and notification has been sent to stakeholder organiza-
tions across the country as well as to the NCO’s outreach list of approximately 1,700
contacts.  The  two-page  RFI  (see  Appendix  3)  asks  all  interested  parties—individ-
uals,  groups,  organizations,  and  representatives  of  companies  and  industries—to
provide  a  two-page  statement  envisioning  the  future  of  networking  and  IT  and  the
future role of NITRD.

In  developing  its  strategic  plan,  NITRD  is  also  coordinating  closely  with  the
NSTC  Committee  on  Science’s  Interagency  Working  Group  on  Digital  Data
(IWGDD). The IWGDD is charged with developing and providing for the implemen-
tation  of  a  plan  to  cultivate  a  framework  for  reliable  preservation  and  effective  ac-
cess to digital scientific data. Along with Cita Furlani of NIST and Charles Romine
of OSTP, I serve as co-chair of the IWGDD.

PCAST  Category  2:  Recommendations  on  portfolio  balance  and  emphasis

areas

This  category  of  PCAST  recommendations  recognizes  and  supports  the  current

NITRD portfolio while suggesting increases in:

(1) larger-scale,  longer-term,  multi-disciplinary,  and  high-risk/high-payoff  re-

search; and

(2) support for NIT systems connected with the physical world, software, digital
data,  and  networking,  while  continuing  support  for  high-end  computing,
cyber security and information assurance, human-computer interaction, and
NIT and the social sciences.

As PCAST recognizes, the NITRD Program fields a number of efforts in this first
item  today,  including  R&D  in  petascale  architectures,  software,  and  applications;
all-optical  network  technologies;  quantum  information  technologies;  and  next-gen-
eration  wireless  and  sensor  capabilities.  At  the  same  time,  a  key  goal  of  NITRD’s
current  strategic  planning  activity  is  to  enable  us  to  identify  new  opportunities  for
long-term, high-risk research investments. The plan’s specific emphasis on goals and
capabilities  that  can  only  be  achieved  by  agencies  working  together  is  intended  to
enable  agencies  to  share  funding  for  larger  and  longer-term  projects  and  to  share
the  risk  in  projects  whose  payoffs  are  broad  enough  to  interest  multiple  agencies.
Furthermore,  the  Program’s  ability  to  move  nimbly  to  seize  such  new  opportunities
is  contingent  in  part  on  the  alignment  of  the  PCAs  in  which  agencies  report  their
NITRD research dollars. For that reason, one focus of our strategic planning activi-
ties is an unfettered examination of the PCAs to assess whether, and what type of,
realignment  of  NITRD  research  areas  might  be  desirable  to  promote  new  strategic
directions.  (This  kind  of  Subcommittee  assessment  is  also  called  for  by  the  PCAST
in a separate recommendation.)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

High  payoffs  can  also  come  from  good  ideas  that  are  not  necessarily  high-risk.
Two  such  examples  are  the  opening  up  of  computing  cycles  on  federal  leadership-
class  systems  to  the  broader  national  research  community  and  the  investment  by
NSF in Track 2 HEC clusters. The NSF investment resulted in a dramatic increase
in  computational  resources  available  over  the  Teragrid.  The  open  solicitations  for
leading-edge  computational  research  proposals  by  DOE/SC  (under  the  Innovative
and  Novel  Computational  Impact  on  Theory  and  Experiment  [INCITE]  program)
and  NASA  (under  the  former  National  Leadership  Computing  System  [NCLS]  pro-
gram)  have  greatly  broadened  access  for  the  national  research  community  to  the
world’s  most  powerful  supercomputers.  The  2008  INCITE  competition  resulted  in
awards  of  computing  cycles  on  leadership-class  federal  systems  to  eight  major  U.S.
corporations,  17  universities,  and  20  smaller  federal  agencies  and  labs  as  well  as
international  research  institutions—for  a  total  of  more  than  a  quarter  of  a  billion
compute hours.

The  topic  areas  listed  in  the  second  item  above  (focused  on  cyber-physical  sys-
tems)  are  emerging  as  crucial  in  the  discussions  of  the  NITRD  strategic  planning
group.  We  concur  with  PCAST  in  its  assessment  of  the  importance  of  these  topics
and expect them to be central in the final strategic plan.

Although  the  PCAST  report  states  that  ‘‘over  all,  technology  transfer  has  worked
well  in  networking  and  IT,’’  the  NITRD  Program  has  several  new  opportunities  to
address  the  report’s  recommendation  that  NITRD  do  more  to  exploit  existing  tech
transfer  mechanisms.  Already  existing  NITRD  mechanisms  that  bring  researchers
and their results together with private-sector developers and end-users include: the
above  mentioned  JET  and  MAGIC  groups;  the  Federal  Agency  Administration  of
Science  and  Technology  Education  and  Research  (FASTER)  community  of  practice
group,  which  seeks  exchanges  of  information  with  the  private  sector  and  new  tech-
nologies  to  streamline  the  management  of  federal  research;  and  the  multi-sector
NITRD research workshops held in all the PCAs.

The  new  opportunities  are  presented  by  the  two  CNCI  plans  and  the  advanced
networking  plan.  Each  of  these  plans  places  substantial  emphasis  on  developing
new  models  for  expanding  substantive  interactions  with  the  private  sector,  such  as
cooperation on testbeds and increased meetings with industry organizations, and on
expediting the movement of research results into prototyping and commercial imple-
mentation.  The  increasing  pace  of  technological  change  is  recognized  in  the  NITRD
community  as  a  challenge  in  advancing  research  innovations,  so  there  is  eagerness
now to explore ways to improve NITRD’s outreach to private developers and indus-
try.

The new CNCI activities also bear on the PCAST recommendation to increase the
emphasis  on  long-term  research  and  infrastructure  in  cyber  security  and  informa-
tion assurance. The NITRD Subcommittee has approved the addition of one FTE to
the NCO staff to support the expanded responsibilities of the CSIA IWG and its new
Senior  Steering  Group  (SSG)  for  coordinating  cyber  R&D  and  the  Leap-Ahead  re-
search  initiative.  Infrastructure  for  cyber  security  R&D  is  called  for  by  both  the
CNCI planning documents and the CSIA IWG Federal Plan.

PCAST Category 3: Recommendations for consultations and studies

The  dynamic  and  global  networking  and  IT  landscape  will  require  a  partnership
across the government, academic, and commercial sectors if we are to maintain our
nation’s  leadership  role.  This  will  require  the  Federal  Government  to  act  as  both
leader to and partner with the other sectors. The NITRD agencies can lead by mak-
ing effective R&D investments, including those in larger, longer-term, multi-discipli-
nary, and high-risk/high-payoff efforts, and by setting examples, demonstrating fea-
sibility,  and  developing  initial  implementation  capabilities  through  their  own  NIT
activities,  such  as  achieving  IPv6  capability.  The  NITRD  agencies  can  be  partners
by  being  transparent  and  interactive  in  their  R&D  planning  activities,  exchanging
information  about  emerging  innovations  and  understanding  the  needs,  opportuni-
ties, and capabilities in the other sectors.

This  dual  leadership/partnership  role  requires  ongoing  mechanisms  for  dialogue
and interaction between the NITRD program and other sectors. As I mentioned ear-
lier,  the  JET  and  MAGIC  teams  include  academic  and  commercial-sector  participa-
tion. This model could profitably be extended into other PCAs and focus areas. The
NITRD workshops are designed to draw participation across sectors and to bring to-
gether groups with complementary interests and capabilities that do not have a his-
tory  of  interaction.  This  mechanism  will  continue  to  see  extensive  use.  The  PCAST
assessment  and  its  influence  on  NITRD  activities  demonstrates  the  value  of  high-
level external review of the Program as an additional means for input. The America
COMPETES Act calls for an ongoing, external review process.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

The partnership role also includes making good use of the expertise and perspec-
tives  available  in  the  other  sectors.  External  studies  commissioned  by  NITRD  are
one  means  for  achieving  this.  For  example,  the  PCAST  assessment  identifies  as  a
priority  area  ensuring  an  adequate  supply  of  well-educated  NIT  professionals,  a
strategic  goal  that  we  share.  To  inform  the  development  of  our  strategic  plan,  the
NITRD agencies have launched an initial fast-track study of networking and IT edu-
cation. A Statement of Work developed by a multi-agency task group was approved
at the March off-site meeting of the NITRD Subcommittee. We are also in the proc-
ess of assessing the current NITRD educational activities including graduate fellow-
ships  to  compare  these  against  needs  and  against  priorities  of  our  strategic  plan.
Our initial plan includes a full-day workshop to discuss current programs across the
federal agencies. Thus, the strategic planning process itself is an example of the use
of multiple consultation and input mechanisms to inform planning.

Additional  examples  of  external  inputs  are  in  the  areas  of  software  development
and  advanced  networking.  The  recent  National  Academies  study  Software  for  De-
pendable  Systems:  Sufficient  Evidence?  has  been  complemented  by  the  ongoing
workshop series supported by the HCSS group that has drawn input from academia,
industry,  user  groups,  and  government  on  certifiably  dependable  software  systems
for  critical  applications.  The  Federal  Plan  for  Advanced  Networking  Research  and
Development  was  informed  by  a  series  of  eight  workshops,  RFIs,  working  groups,
and external reports.

PCAST Category 4: Recommendations on assessment

The PCAST assessment included recommendations for periodic assessment of the
NITRD  PCA  structure  and  the  development  of  metrics  and  indicators  to  assess
progress.  As  I  stated  earlier,  an  explicit  goal  in  the  strategic  planning  process  is  to
evaluate  the  current  PCA  structure  against  our  new  strategic  plan  and  to  make
changes  as  appropriate.  We  envision  the  strategic  planning  process  and  any  associ-
ated  PCA  realignments  as  an  ongoing  process,  to  be  revisited  on  a  regular  basis  as
the networking and IT landscape evolves and as strategic goals are achieved.

There  are  currently  two  types  of  metrics  or  indicators  against  which  we  intend
to  assess  progress.  Stage  One  indicators  include  successful  completion  of  the  Stra-
tegic  Plan  and  the  PCA  strategic  plans  and  roadmaps—including  measures  of
progress—called  for  in  the  PCAST  report.  The  timeline  in  Appendix  3  provides  a
series of specific milestones and events, which are examples of Stage One indicators.
Stage  Two  indicators—measures  of  how  well  the  Program  is  carrying  out  its  Stra-
tegic  Plan,  how  effectively  the  PCAs  are  pursuing  their  strategic  plans  and  road-
maps,  and  the  impact  of  these  efforts—are  being  developed  as  part  of  the  strategic
planning  process.  These  Stage  Two  indicators  will  be  an  important  part  of  our  im-
plementation plan.

Committee  Request  #3:  Role  and  functions  of  the  National  Coordination  Office  for

NITRD (NCO/NITRD)

The  NCO/NITRD  is  identified  in  the  NSTC  Committee  on  Technology  charter  for
the  NITRD  Subcommittee.  The  Office  provides  technical,  planning,  budgetary,  and
logistical  support  for  all  the  activities  of  the  NITRD  Program,  under  the  operative
framework  of  relevant  laws,  charters,  and  Executive  Branch  directives.  The  Office
also serves as the central point of contact for inquiries and requests for information
about the Program and maintains the Program’s Web site and documents, including
current  and  archival  documentation  of  NITRD  subcommittee,  IWG,  and  CG  activi-
ties. The Director and Associate Director are federal employees and serve as senior
management. The staff of 13 contractors and one federal employee on detail includes
a  contract  manager  and  an  office  operations  manager;  five  Technical  Coordinators
who  support  11  IWGs,  CGs,  and  technical  groups;  one  writer/editor;  three  adminis-
trative  support  staff;  a  web  master  and  an  IT  systems  manager;  and  a  temporary
full-time  coordinator  for  the  NITRD  strategic  planning  process.  The  five  Technical
Coordinators  are  Ph.D.-level  positions  that  provide  expert  knowledge  of  the  R&D
challenges in the NITRD fields.

Regular  NCO  activities  include  logistical  preparations  and  staff  support  for  all
meetings  of  NITRD  entities,  including  those  of  the  Presidential  advisory  group  on
IT, and most NITRD-affiliated workshops; drafting, editing, and publishing support
for  publications  (annual  budget  supplement,  R&D  plans,  workshop  reports,  studies,
and  reviews)  of  the  NITRD  Program  and  those  of  the  Presidential  advisory  group;
and  preparation  of  special  budgetary  and  technical  documents  requested  by  the
NITRD  Subcommittee.  The  NCO  Director  maintains  close  communications  with
OSTP, OMB, the NITRD agencies, and this Committee, and represents the Program
in presentations to organizations nationally.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

The  PCAST  assessment  includes  three  recommendations  that  explicitly  reference
the  NCO.  Two  focus  on  NCO  support  for  the  Subcommittee  in  commissioning  stud-
ies  on  networking  and  IT  education  and  in  developing  metrics  and  progress  indica-
tors for assessment. These support efforts are underway, as described above.

The third recommendation is that NCO, with Subcommittee guidance, should de-
velop and implement a plan for supporting the NITRD Program in developing stra-
tegic  plans  and  roadmaps.  Such  a  plan  has  been  developed  for  the  initial  stages  of
this  new  NITRD  activity  and  is  being  implemented.  Under  this  initial  plan,  the
NCO  has  committed  significant  resources  to  the  process,  including  the  hiring  of  a
temporary  coordinator  for  strategic  planning.  The  Office  has  committed  significant
technical writing time in preparing text and has charged the Technical Coordinators
with  serving  as  liaisons  between  the  Strategic  Planning  Group  and  the  IWGs  and
CGs. The Office is supporting the weekly meetings of the Strategic Planning Group
and  providing  logistical  support  for  its  outreach  activities.  Thus,  the  NCO  is  fully
committed  to  supporting  a  successful  NITRD  strategic  planning  and  roadmapping
process.

In conclusion

The enabling NITRD legislation and its vigorous implementation by OSTP, OMB,
and the NITRD agencies have created a robust, responsive, and resilient framework
for  effective  cooperation  and  coordination  in  federal  networking  and  IT  R&D  plan-
ning and execution. The NITRD Program has matured and now encompasses a spec-
trum  of  NIT  areas  that  allow  it  to  take  on  the  complex,  multi-disciplinary,  multi-
sector challenges characteristic of today’s networking and IT landscape.

Thank you.

With this maturation comes the opportunity and responsibility for comprehensive
strategic  planning  to  ensure  best  use  of  this  important  resource  for  coordination.
The  NITRD  Program  is  now  deep  into  the  process  of  a  vigorous  strategic  planning
and  roadmapping  effort.  We  are  confident  that  this  process  and  its  attendant  ele-
ments will fully address the valuable recommendations contained in the PCAST as-
sessment.

A  measure  of  the  strength  of  the  NITRD  Program  and  the  supporting  National
Coordination  Office  is  the  ability  to  simultaneously  support  a  vigorous  strategic
planning  process,  the  development  of  coordination  and  leap-ahead  R&D  activities
under  the  Comprehensive  National  Cybersecurity  Initiative,  manage  two  external
studies,  facilitate  a  robust  workshop  series,  and  conduct  the  regular  planning,  co-
ordinating,  and  reporting  activities  of  the  11  IWGs,  CGs,  and  teams.  This  is  only
accomplished  because  of  the  competence,  dedication,  and  commitment  of  all  of  the
members of the NITRD/NCO community.

As the PCAST concludes, leadership in networking and information technology is
essential  to  U.S.  economic  prosperity,  security,  and  quality  of  life.  The  federal  in-
vestments  we  make  in  research  and  development  in  this  area  are  the  keys  to  a  fu-
ture of promise for our nation and its citizens. I look forward to working with Con-
gress to fulfill that promise.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

BIOGRAPHY FOR CHRISTOPHER L. GREER

Dr. Chris Greer is Director of the National Coordination Office (NCO) for the Net-
working and Information Technology Research and Development (NITRD) program.
The  NCO/NITRD  mission  is  to  formulate  and  promote  federal  information  tech-
nology  research  and  development  to  meet  national  goals.  The  NCO  reports  to  the
Office of Science and Technology Policy within the Executive Office of the President.
Dr. Greer is on assignment to the NCO from his position as Senior Advisor for Dig-
ital Data in the NSF Office of Cyberinfrastructure. He recently served as Executive
Secretary  for  the  Long-lived  Digital  Data  Collections  Activities  of  the  National
Science Board and is currently Co-Chair of the Interagency Working Group on Dig-
ital  Data  of  the  National  Science  and  Technology  Council’s  Committee  on  Science.
He  is  also  a  member  of  the  Advisory  Committee  for  the  National  Archives  and
Records  Administration’s  Electronic  Records  Archive  and  a  member  of  the  Digital
Library Council of the Federal Depository Library Program.

Dr.  Greer  received  his  Ph.D.  degree  in  biochemistry  from  the  University  of  Cali-
fornia, Berkeley and did his postdoctoral work at CalTech. He was a member of the
faculty  at  the  University  of  California  at  Irvine  in  the  Department  of  Biological
Chemistry  for  approximately  18  years  where  his  research  on  gene  expression  path-
ways was supported by grants from the NSF, NIH and the American Heart Associa-
tion.  During  that  time,  he  was  founding  Executive  Officer  of  the  RNA  Society,  an
international professional organization.

Chairman  GORDON.  Right  on  the  money,  Dr.  Greer.  Dr.  Reed,

you are up.

STATEMENT OF DR. DANIEL A. REED, DIRECTOR, SCALABLE
AND MULTICORE COMPUTING, MICROSOFT CORPORATION
Dr.  REED.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the
Committee.  I  am  Dan  Reed.  I  am  Chair  of  the  Board  of  Directors
of the Computing Research Association and Co-Chair of the PCAST
Subcommittee  that  produced  the  2007  NITRD  Program  Assess-
ment.

Today I would like to make five points regarding the NITRD Pro-
gram  followed  by  a  set  of  specific  recommendations  for  the  future.
Information  technology,  as  Dr.  Greer  noted,  is  driven  by  basic  re-
search investments that has transformed our society and our econ-
omy.  Imagine  a  world  without  personal  computers,  without  mobile
devices or the Internet, without predictive computational models or
deep—the  future  can  be  even  more  amazing  if  we  sustain  our  IT
research——

Historically,  the  diversity  of  the  NITRD  agencies  has  been  a
major  strength  of  U.S.  IT  research,  fostering  multiple  approaches
to complex problems. The Internet began as a DARPA project, grew
with  NSF  support,  and  blossomed  with  commercial  funding.  The
human genome project was a triumph of biomedicine and IT based
and  building  on  funding  from  NIH,  from  DARPA,  from  NSF,  the
Department of Energy, and it birthed personalized medicine.

This  brings  me  to  the  issue  of  balancing  risk  and  protection—
today I believe the NITRD ecosystem’s health is threatened due to
an  over-dependence  on  a  single-funding  source  and  inadequate  re-
search  funding  overall.  DARPA’s  retreat  from  fundamental  com-
puting  research  at  U.S.  universities  has  unbalanced  the  NITRD
ecosystem.  NSF  now  provides  86  percent  of  all  academic  IT  re-
search  funding,  and  fierce  competition  has  driven  researchers  to
focus  excessively  on  short-term,  well-risked  research  projects.  Like
a  stock  portfolio,  our  long-term  success  depends  on  balance,  plan-
ning, and regular reassessment.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

This  leads  to  my  third  point,  NITRD  coordination  and  planning.
In  general,  I  believe  the  NITRD  Programs  effectively  foster  infor-
mal  communication  and  coordination  among  the  agencies,  and  I
commend  the  National  Coordination  Office  for  its  role  in  this  as-
pect.  However,  the  focus  on  individual  agency  agendas  has  made
the  NITRD  Program  less  effective  in  managing  coordinated
projects, particularly multi-disciplinary ones of rising importance.

This  leads  to  my  fourth  point  about  research  opportunities  and
foci.  In  2007,  PCAST  revisited  the  priority  areas  identified  by
PITAC in 1999. Concluding that they remained deeply relevant, in-
cluding  I  should  add,  as  a  personal  anecdote,  high  performance
computing,  something  which  I  have  been  involved  in  for  many
years.  IT  systems  that  interact  with  the  physical  world,  however,
a  special  case  is  the  more  general  issue  of  software  systems
emerged as a new top priority. These cyber-physical systems embed
computing,  sensors,  and  actuators  and  objects  that  span  scales
from  our  critical  national  infrastructure  to  implanted  biomedical
devices.  Their  creation  requires  workers  with  new  and  ever-more
multi-disciplinary skills.

That leads me to the issue of sustaining our IT workforce. Today
information  technology  has  a  serious  image  problem.  It  affects  our
workforce  quantity,  its  diversity,  and  its—many  groups  are  work-
ing very hard to address stereotypes and create new, multi-discipli-
nary  curricula  but  much  work  remains  in  this  area.  I  believe  we
must  also  do  more  to  retain  the  best  and  brightest  international
students  who  obtain  graduate  degrees  here,  many  of  whom  are
supported by federal research grants and contracts. Simply put, our
international  competitiveness  depends  on  the  availability  of  a
qualified and diverse workforce.

This  leads  to  my  recommendations  for  the  future.  To  ensure  the
health  of  the  U.S.  IT  ecosystem,  we  should  fully  fund  the  America
COMPETES  Act.  This  will  fuel  the  IT  innovation  engine,  the  fun-
damental  research  by  U.S.  universities  and  national  laboratories,
and  further  broaden  STEM-based  education.  And  I  commend  you,
Mr.  Chairman,  and  your  colleagues  for  your  continuing  support  of
America COMPETES.

Second,  I  believe  we  must  rebalance  participation  in  the  NITRD
Program so that responsibility for fundamental research is not born
excessively  by  a  single  agency.  As  Dr.  Greer  noted,  I  believe  we
must  create  and  regularly  update  a  strategic  R&D  plan  and  a  set
of  associated  metrics  that  define  interagency  accountabilities  with
a mix appropriately of project scales and—risks.

Finally,  I  believe  we  must  regularly  review  our  research  invest-
ment  against  that  strategic  plan.  I  also  believe  the  NITRD  Pro-
gram is best served by a stand-alone and active PITAC that is com-
posed  of  computing  experts  drawn  from  academia  and  industry.  I
say that as someone who served on both PITAC and PCAST. Eight
years  between  overall  NITRD  reviews  is  far  too  long  in  the  infor-
mation  technology  industry.  By  analogy,  eight  years  in  dog  years
is multiple lifetimes in the computing industry. We need to be more
proactive in examining our strategy.

Mr. Chairman, thank you and this committee for your continued
interest  and  support  in  the  future  of  the  NITRD  Program  and  its

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

importance  to  U.S.  competitiveness  and  national  security.  At  the
appropriate time, I would be delighted to answer any questions.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Reed follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DANIEL A. REED

Good  afternoon,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  Thank  you  for
granting  me  this  opportunity  to  comment  on  the  federal  Networking  and  Informa-
tion  Technology  Research  and  Development  (NITRD)  program.  I  am  Daniel  Reed,
Chair  of  the  Board  of  Directors  for  the  Computing  Research  Association  (CRA).  I
am  also  a  researcher  in  high-performance  computing;  a  member  of  the  President’s
Council of Advisors on Science and Technology (PCAST); the former Head of the De-
partment  of  Computer  Science  at  the  University  of  Illinois  at  Urbana  Champaign;
and  currently  Director  of  Scalable  and  Multicore  Computing  Strategy  at  Microsoft.
During our lifetime, information technology has transformed our society, our econ-
omy and our personal lives. Imagine a world without consumer electronics, personal
computers,  the  Internet  or  predictive  computational  models.  As  Tennyson  so  elo-
quently  expressed,  we  have  ‘‘. . .  dipped  into  the  future,  far  as  human  eye  could
see;  saw  the  vision  of  the  world,  and  all  the  wonder  that  would  be.’’  Despite  our
current  wonder,  the  future  of  computing—the  world  that  can  be—is  even  more
amazing,  for  we  are  poised  on  the  brink  of  even  greater  revolutions:  deep  under-
standing  of  biological  and  physical  processes,  personalized  medicine  and  assistive
living  technology,  autonomous  vehicles  that  navigate  in  traffic  and  severe  weather,
strategic  and  tactical  military  and  intelligence  systems  with  true  information  supe-
riority,  information  assistants  that  enhance  our  intellectual  activities,  distributed
sensors  and  actuators  that  protect  our  environment,  intelligent  systems  for  ad-
vanced energy management, and a host of other innovations.

Making  such  visions  a  reality  is  the  essence  of  information  technology  research
and  the  core  of  the  NITRD  program.  It  is  also  why  sustained  and  appropriate  in-
vestments  in  information  technology  research  and  development  are  critical  to  our
nation’s future.

In  response  to  your  questions,  I  would  like  to  make  eight  points  today  regarding
the  status  and  future  of  the  NITRD  program,  beginning  with  a  synopsis  of  the  re-
cent  report  of  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology
(PCAST)  assessment  of  the  Networking,  Information  Technology  Research  and  De-
velopment (NITRD) program.
1. PCAST: Information Technology Assessment

In 2007, I was privileged to co-chair PCAST’s assessment of the NITRD program.
The  resulting  report,  Leadership  Under  Challenge:  Information  Technology  R&D  in
a Competitive World,1 was the first overall assessment of the NITRD program since
that  conducted  in  1999  by  the  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Com-
mittee (PITAC). The 2007 PCAST report emphasized the following points:

• NIT  and  global  competitiveness.  Today,  the  United  States  is  the  global
leader  in  networking  and  information  technology  (NIT)  and  that  leadership
is essential to U.S. economic prosperity, security, and quality of life. However,
other countries and regions have also recognized the value of NIT leadership
and are mounting challenges.

• NITRD ecosystem. The NITRD program is a key mechanism through which
the Federal Government contributes to NIT research and development leader-
ship,  and  the  NITRD  program  has  by  and  large  been  effective  at  meeting
agency and national needs.

• Research  horizons  and  risks.  The  federal  NIT  research  and  development
portfolio  is  currently  imbalanced  in  favor  of  low-risk  projects;  too  many  are
small  scale  and  short-term  efforts.  The  number  of  large-scale,  multi-discipli-
nary  activities  with  long  time  horizons  is  limited  and  visionary  projects  are
few.

• Workforce  availability  and  skills.  The  number  of  people  completing  NIT
education programs and the usefulness of that education fall short of current
and projected needs. Current curricula must be re-evaluated, graduate fellow-
ships increased and visa processes simplified to address these challenges.

1 Leadership  Under  Challenge:  Information  Technology  R&D  in  a  Competitive  World,  Presi-
dent’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  (PCAST),  August  2007,  http://
www.ostp.gov/pdf/nitrd¥review.pdf

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

• Research  priority  areas.  The  top  priorities  for  new  funding  are  NIT  sys-
tems  connected  to  the  physical  world,  software,  networking  and  digital  data,
with continuing emphasis on high-end computing, cyber security and informa-
tion assurance, human-computer interaction and NIT and the social sciences.
• Strategic  plans  and  roadmaps.  We  must  develop,  maintain,  and  imple-
ment  a  strategic  plan  for  the  NITRD  program,  along  with  public  R&D  plans
or  roadmaps  and  progress  metrics  for  key  technical  areas  that  require  long-
term interagency coordination and engagement.

• Interagency  coordination.  The  current  nature  and  scale  of  NITRD  pro-
gram  coordination  processes  are  inadequate  to  meet  anticipated  national
needs  and  to  maintain  U.S.  leadership  in  an  era  of  global  NIT  competitive-
ness.

With this backdrop, the remainder of my testimony expands and explains the ra-
tionale  for  these  PCAST  findings  along  with  personal  observations  on  possible  ac-
tions.  However,  the  opinions  expressed  herein  are  my  own,  not  necessarily  those  of
PCAST  or  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  (OSTP).  I  would  also  like  to
acknowledge the contributions of Peter Harsha, from the Computing Research Asso-
ciation (CRA), to these remarks.

2. The Importance of Information Technology

The  importance  of  information  technology  (IT)  in  enabling  innovation  and
powering the new economy is well documented. Advances in computing and commu-
nications  have  led  to  significant  improvements  in  product  design,  development  and
distribution  for  American  industry,  provided  instant  communications  for  people
worldwide,  and  enabled  new  scientific  disciplines 
like  bio-informatics  and
nanotechnology that show great promise in improving a whole range of health, secu-
rity, and communications technologies. Several studies have suggested informa-
tion  technology  has  been  responsible  for  25  percent  of  more  of  U.S.  eco-
nomic growth in recent years, despite being a much smaller fraction of the
gross  domestic  product  (GDP).2 Moreover,  information  technology  leader-

2 Dale  W.  Jorgenson  and  Charles  Wessner,  editors.  2007.  Enhancing  Productivity  Growth  in
the  Information  Age:  Measuring  and  Sustaining  the  New  Economy.  Washington,  D.C.:  National
Academies  Press.  Also  see  Dale  W.  Jorgenson,  Mun  S.  Ho,  and  Kevin  J.  Stiroh.  2005.  Produc-
tivity  Volume  3:  Information  Technology  and  the  American  Growth  Resurgence.  Cambridge,
Mass.: MIT Press.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

ship has proven essential to the Nation’s security, from our national infra-
structure and signals intelligence to our military.

Information  technology  has  also  changed  the  conduct  of  research.  Innovations  in
computing  and  networking  technologies  are  enabling  discovery  across  every  sci-
entific  and  engineering  discipline—from  mapping  the  human  brain  to  modeling  cli-
matic  change  and  enhancing  energy  production.  Faced  with  problems  that  are  ever
more  complex  and  interdisciplinary  in  nature,  researchers  are  using  IT  to  collabo-
rate across the globe, visualize large and complex data sets, and collect and manage
massive amounts of real-time sensor-derived data.

But equally important to the role IT plays in enabling innovations in in-
dustry and in the other scientific and engineering disciplines is the role of
the research and development (R&D) ecosystem in enabling IT innovations.
The  1995  National  Research  Council  (NRC)  report,  Evolving  the  High  Performance
Computing  and  Communications  Initiative  to  Support  the  Nation’s  Information  In-
frastructure,3 included a compelling graphic illustrating this spectacular return. The
graphic was updated in 2002 and is reproduced in Figure 1.

The  graphic  in  Figure  1  shows  the  development  of  technologies  from
their  origins  in  industrial  and  federally-supported  research,  to  the  intro-
duction  of  the  first  commercial  products,  through  the  creation  of  billion-
dollar  industries  and  markets.  The  original  1995  NRC  report  identified  nine  of
these multi-billion dollar IT industries (the categories on the left side of the graph-
ic).  Seven  years  later,  the  number  of  examples  had  grown  to  19  multi-billion  dollar
industries that are transforming our lives and driving our economy.

The  graphic  also  illustrates  the  complex  interplay  among  industrial  R&D  efforts
and  the  interdependent  ecosystem  of  NITRD  agencies  that  supports  academic  re-
search.  Each  federal  agency  plays  a  distinct,  but  important  role  in  the  current  and
future success of the U.S. information technology ecosystem.
3. The NITRD Ecosystem: Fostering Innovation via Diversity

The  NITRD  program  is  a  collaborative  confederation  of  thirteen  federal  agencies,
each with differing missions that depend—to varying degrees—on advances in infor-
mation  technology.  This  ecosystem  of  agencies  is  complex  and  interdependent,  with
some small and others large, some supporting outcome-directed research and others
supporting  innovation-driven  research,  some  supporting  small  projects  and  others
funding  large  initiatives,  some  focused  on  federal  research  laboratories  and  others
engaging academia.

Historically,  this  NITRD  diversity  has  been  a  major  strength  of  the  U.S.
approach to information technology research, as it has fostered diverse ap-
proaches to complex computing problems, with differing research horizons
and  communities.  Together,  a  strong  IT  industry,  powerful  commercializa-
tion  system,  and  high-quality  education  and  research  institutions  have
been critical to America’s leadership in IT. The aforementioned 1995 report by
the National Research Council emphasized the ‘‘extraordinarily productive interplay
of federally funded university research, federally and privately funded industrial re-
search,  and  entrepreneurial  companies  founded  and  staffed  by  people  who  moved
back and forth between universities and industry.’’

To  further  illustrate  this  point,  consider  some  specific,  compelling  examples  of
agency  leadership,  cross-agency  collaboration  and  industrial  engagement.  The  De-
fense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA) has historically supported large-
scale  projects  with  revolutionary  intent—high-speed  networks  for  resilient  commu-
nication, artificial intelligence and autonomous navigation, massively parallel super-
computing  for  detailed  modeling,  real-time  and  embedded  systems  for  situational
awareness—to  ensure  the  technological  superiority  of  U.S.  military  forces.  Today’s
Internet began in the 1960s as an ambitious DARPA (then ARPA) research
project in resilient, packet-based communications for national defense.

Reflecting its long-term focus, DARPA supported the Arpanet for well over a dec-
ade.  This  later  enabled  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  to  build  on
a  rich  research  and  technology  base  to  create  a  high-speed  national  net-
work  connecting  supercomputing  centers  and  their  NSF-funded  students
and faculty researchers. From this fertile ground, the Mosaic web browser
was  born  at  the  University  of  Illinois,  spawning  the  commercial  web  revo-
lution and today’s Internet via commercial investments.

The Department of Energy’s Office of Science (DOE SC) and its National Nuclear
Security Administration (DOE NNSA) have long supported algorithms and software

3 U.S. National Research Council. Evolving the High Performance Computing and Communica-
tions  Initiative  to  Support  the  Nation’s  Information  Infrastructure.  National  Academies  Press,
Washington, D.C. 1995.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

research, network and distributed systems studies and advanced computer architec-
ture  designs  in  both  DOE  laboratories  and  academia.  DOE  SC’s  Scientific  Dis-
covery through Advanced Computing (SciDAC) program supports multi-dis-
ciplinary  teams  to  develop  the  enabling  technologies  for  next-generation
computing systems and their application to models of climate change, effi-
cient energy sources and biological processes. In turn, the DOE NNSA has ad-
vanced  computer  systems,  software  and  algorithms  in  support  of  nuclear  stockpile
stewardship and certification.

The Human Genome Project, funded by the National Institutes of Health
(NIH),  was  enabled  by  high-throughput  sequencing  systems,  based  on  ad-
vanced  semiconductor  technology  and  efficient  algorithms  for  DNA  subse-
quence  reassembly  executing  atop  high-performance  computing  systems.
Simply put, the Human Genome Project was a collaborative triumph of biomedicine
and  information  technology;  the  commercial  semiconductor  designs  and  computer
architecture  and  academic  algorithms  that  enabled  this  breakthrough  were  pre-
viously funded by DARPA, NSF and DOE. The tantalizing promise of low-cost, per-
sonalized  medicine,  with  treatments  and  drugs  tailored  to  individual  needs,  will  be
realized  only  via  continued  advances  in  computing  technology,  themselves  derived
from information technology research.

As  all  these  examples  illustrate,  the  success  of  the  NITRD  program  has  accrued
from  the  health,  diversity  and  vigorous  interactions  among  its  component  agencies,
universities  and  industrial  partnerships.  Historically,  DARPA  funded  large-scale,
high-risk  projects  involving  academic  and  industry  teams.  In  turn,  DOE  supported
national  laboratory  and  academic  researchers  around  large-scale  scientific  instru-
ments, and NSF supported innovation-driven research, predominantly by individual
faculty members and their students, with a mix of larger projects and centers. NIH
has partnered on selected NITRD programs and NASA, NIST and the other NITRD
agencies have supported mission-specific research and development programs.4

The  rich  ecosystem  of  computing  research  approaches,  collaborative  agencies  and
funding  models  has  long  made  the  U.S.  the  undisputed  leader  in  information  tech-
nology, with concomitant benefits to our national security, economic competitiveness
and lifestyle.
4. Research Horizons and Risks: The Funding Monoculture

In  a  biological  ecosystem,  environmental  changes  or  the  death  of  a  species  can
change  the  ecosystem’s  set  point  or  even  lead  to  its  death;  the  NITRD  ecosystem
is no different. Today, the health of the NITRD ecosystem is threatened, and
the  future  of  our  national  competitiveness  is  at  grave  risk,  due  largely  to
an  over-dependence  on  a  single  research  funding  source,  a  single  funding
approach  and  inadequate  research  funding  overall.  Through  the  1990s,  aca-
demic  computing  research  funding  was  dominated  by  two  NITRD  sources,  DARPA
and  NSF,  with  each  filling  complementary  ecosystem  niches  based  on  different
project selection models, funding scales and assessment approaches.

From its inception, DARPA supported larger-scale, outcome-driven initiatives and
projects  based  on  targeted  solicitations.  DARPA  program  managers  had  broad  lati-
tude to assemble academic and industrial consortia that built computing technology
prototypes  and  transferred  promising  prototypes  into  industry  for  commercializa-
tion.  In  a  complementary  role,  NSF  funded  exploratory,  innovation-driven  com-
puting  research,  funding  peer-reviewed  research  proposals  submitted  by  the  aca-
demic  community.  Although  project  funding  levels  were  typically  lower  than  at
DARPA, researchers were free to explore novel ideas of their own choosing. NSF re-
searchers  not  only  filled  niches  not  occupied  by  DARPA,  their  most  promising  re-
sults  often  stimulated  new  DARPA  technology  prototyping  and  transfer  initiatives.
As  an  example,  research  flourished  in  computer  architecture,  system  software,
programming  models,  algorithms  and  applications  in  the  1990s.  Computer  vendors
launched  new  initiatives,  parallel  computing  startup  companies  were  born,  and
planning  began  for  petascale  systems,  based  on  integrated  hardware,  architecture,
software  and  algorithms  research.  This  renaissance  in  parallel  and  high-perform-
ance  computing  research  was  a  direct  consequence  of  the  High-Performance  Com-
puting  and  Communications  (HPCC)  program  and  interdependent  agency  initia-
tives,  notably  DARPA  and  NSF.  DARPA  funded  large-scale  hardware  prototypes
and software initiatives, while NSF supported exploratory research by single inves-
tigators.

When  DARPA  shifted  its  funding  and  evaluation  model  to  shorter-term,  ‘‘go/no-
go’’ assessments and approaches, the ecosystem of funding agencies and researchers

4 Each  of  the  NITRD  agencies  supports  diverse  programs  at  multiple  scales.  This  description

captures the dominant mode of each agency.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

reacted  and  adapted.  Large-scale  computing  research  contracted,  and  those  aca-
demic  institutions  and  faculty  who  has  historically  benefited  from  DARPA’s  largess
turned  to  NSF  for  research  funding.  This  retreat  of  DARPA  from  funding  fun-
damental  computing  research  at  U.S.  universities  has  left  a  hole  in  the
overall  federal  IT  research  ecosystem  that  other  participating  agencies
have been unable to fill. The types and scale of research changed and the number
of  research  proposals  submitted  to  NSF  rose  precipitously,  with  a  concomitant  de-
cline in proposal success rates.

The  National  Science  Foundation  is  now  the  predominate  funder  of  all
academic computing research. Indeed, recent analyses show that NSF pro-
vides 86 percent of all funding for academic computing research.5 The result
is  that  NSF  is  now  viewed  by  most  academic  researchers  as  the  only  viable  source
of research funding. The notable exceptions are the DOE SciDAC program and those
faculty members who have strong ties to the national laboratories.

The consequences of this ecosystem shift are both deep and profound, with several
deleterious  effects.  First,  fierce  competition  for  funding  has  made  researchers  risk
averse. Today, those proposals recommended for funding are far more likely
to  emphasize  short-term,  incremental  research  that  builds  on  well-under-
stood approaches. Such proposals are less controversial and more likely to
win  consensus  approval  than  those  embodying  high  risk,  ground-breaking
ideas.  This  is  especially  worrisome  given  the  timeline  of  Figure  1,  which
shows  the  long  incubation  period  for  these  technologies  between  the  time
they  were  conceived  and  first  researched  to  the  time  they  arrived  in  the
market as commercial products. In nearly every case, that lag time is measured
in decades.

Incremental advancement itself is not bad; it is the lifeblood of the scientific proc-
ess. However, just as a balanced retirement portfolio includes an evolving mix of low
risk,  modest  return  investments  and  higher  risk,  higher  return  investments,  the
long-term  success  of  our  computing  research  ecosystem  depends  on  a  balance  of
modest  risk,  moderate  payoff  research  and  higher  risk,  but  high  payoff,  revolu-
tionary  research.  We  must  rebalance  our  research  portfolio  to  encourage
greater innovation and risk taking.

Second,  current  academic  structures  necessitate  research  funding  as  an  external
validation of quality and to sustain internal research processes. Hence, faculty mem-
bers face enormous institutional pressure to seek external research funding for pro-
motion,  tenure  and  national  visibility.  Because  only  a  modest  fraction  of  sub-
mitted proposals is funded in many programs, faculty members now spend
an  inordinate  fraction  of  their  time  preparing,  submitting  and  reviewing
proposals.  It  is  not  uncommon  for  an  assistant  professor  to  write  five  or  even  ten
proposals  in  a  single  year,  hoping  one  or  two  will  be  funded. Hence, we must ad-
dress the funding shortfall that currently limits research innovation.
5. Research Priority Areas: Identifying Innovation Foci

The  seminal  1999  PITAC  report,  Information  Technology  Research:  Investing  in
Our  Future,6 highlighted  the  importance  of  software  noting,  ‘‘Software  is  the  new
physical  infrastructure  of  the  information  age.  It  is  fundamental  to  economic  suc-
cess, scientific and technical research, and national security.’’ The report also noted
that  the  diversity  and  sophistication  of  our  software  systems  was  growing  rapidly
at  a  time  we  lacked  the  technologies  to  build  reliable  and  secure  software  systems
and  that  even  more  perniciously,  we  were  under-investing  in  the  research  needed
to develop those technologies. In addition to the critical importance of software, the
1999  PITAC  report  emphasized  the  importance  of  adequate  research  investment  in
scalable information infrastructure and high-performance computing.

In  2007,  PCAST  revisited  the  1999  PITAC  technical  priority  areas,  con-
cluding  that  the  broad  areas  remained  deeply  relevant,  albeit  with  slight
changes.  Information  technology  systems  that  interact  with  the  physical
world  emerged  as  the  new  top  priority—cyber-physical  systems  where  com-
puting  systems,  sensors  and  actuators  are  deeply  embedded  in  engineered  objects.
Such systems are now both diverse and ubiquitous and include our critical national
infrastructure  such  as  the  electric  power  grid,  mobile  and  human-centered  sensors
(e.g.,  mobile  biomedical  devices),  environmental  monitors  and  military  systems.
Such systems can be difficult and costly to design, build, test, and maintain and the
consequences of failure can be catastrophic. However, the benefits are enormous, in-

5 National  Science  Foundation,  Division  of  Science  Resources  Statistics.  2008.  Federal  Funds

for Research and Development: Fiscal Years 2005–07. Forthcoming. Arlington, VA.

6 President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory  Committee,  Information  Technology  Research:

Investing in Our Future, http://www.nitrd.gov/pitac/report, 1999

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

cluding  more  efficient  transportation  systems,  more  efficient  energy  generation  and
management  and  a  reduced  carbon  footprint  for  a  diverse  set  of  human  activities.
One should rightly view systems that interact with the physical world as
a special case of the broader software priority identified by PITAC. In this
spirit,  software  remains  the  second  broad  priority  identified  by  PCAST,
along  with  networking  and  digital  data.  The  latter  two  areas  reflect  the  popu-
larization of the Internet, with concomitant challenges in security, scalability, resil-
ience  and  management,  and  the  explosive  growth  of  digital  data,  itself  enabled  by
inexpensive  sensors  and  large-scale  storage  devices.  Advances  in  these  areas  are
also  essential  to  national  security  and  to  combating  cyber  crime.  PCAST also rec-
ognized the need for continuing emphasis on high-end computing, cyber se-
curity  and  information  assurance,  human-computer  interaction,  and  infor-
mation technology and the social sciences.
6. Workforce: Ensuring Quality and Quantity

In  a  knowledge  economy,  continued  innovation  and  international  competitiveness
depend  on  an  adequate  and  continually  renewed  supply  of  qualified  and  motivated
workers. In the U.S., the IT workforce is composed of those educated here—U.S. citi-
zens,  permanent  residents  and  international  students—and  the  best  and  brightest
from  around  the  world  who  choose  to  live  and  work  here.  We  face  both  quantity
challenges, ensuring an adequate supply of IT workers, and quality issues,
creating  curricula  that  match  emerging  technical  trends  and  that  attract
and  excite  sufficiently  diverse  cross-section  of  the  population.  As  the  2007
PCAST report noted,

Although the overall supply of networking and information technology specialists
is  expected  to  grow  in  response  to  the  growth  in  total  demand,  at  current  rates
of enrollment and graduation, shortfalls in the numbers of highly qualified com-
puter scientists and engineers graduated at the undergraduate and doctoral lev-
els  are  likely.  Women  and  other  under-represented  groups  will  constitute  a  de-
clining proportion of the new graduates.

The stereotype of a geek who writes code in a small cubicle and who es-
chews  human  interaction  is  neither  reflective  of  the  diversity  of  modern
computing  and  nor  of  computing’s  role  in  all  aspects  of  society,  from  the
arts and humanities through business practice to science and engineering.
Many academic, federal and private groups are working assiduously to dis-
pel  this  stereotype  and  raise  the  image  of  computing  among  potential  stu-
dents. The Image of Computing Task Force7 was created by a consortium of compa-
nies and computing professional societies to ‘‘expose a realistic view of opportunities
in  computing’’  and  to  ‘‘educate  the  public  and  those  with  the  aptitude  and  interest
to  pursue  computing  careers,  on  the  increasing  vital  role  computing  plays  in  every
major  field.’’  In  addition,  the  CRA  Committee  on  the  Status  of  Women  (CRA–W),8
the National Center for Women and Information Technology (NCWIT) 9 and the Coa-
lition  to  Diversity  Computing  (CDC) 10 are  all  highlighting  the  importance  of  diver-
sity in computing and the opportunities for creative and engaging careers.

In  addition  to  increasing  awareness  of  information  technology  as  a  vi-
brant,  attractive  and  relevant  problem-solving  skill  in  the  21st  century
knowledge  economy,  computing  professional  societies  and  universities  are
working  to  revamp  curricula  that  have  changed  relatively  little  since  the
1970s.  The  changes  include  increasing  multi-disciplinary  computing  education  (i.e.,
computing  and  its  applications  to  another  discipline),  multi-track  curricula  that
allow students to create degree programs that better match their interests and em-
phasizing  the  power  of  computing  as  a  general-purpose  problem  solving  tool.  As  a
complement to image education and curricula reform, PCAST also recommended in-
creasing the number of multi-year graduate fellowships offered to U.S. students.

These image, curricula and fellowship reforms potentially address the shortfall of
domestic  students.  However,  the  U.S.  information  technology  ecosystem  has  long
been  a  magnet  for  talented  students,  researchers  and  workers  from  around  the
world.  Such  individuals  increasingly  find  attractive  educational,  research  and  pro-
fessional  opportunities  in  their  home  countries.  It  is  in  the  best  interests  of  the
U.S.  to  retain  the  best  and  brightest  international  students  who  obtain
graduate  degrees  in  this  country,  often  supported  by  research  grants  and
contracts.  Hence,  PCAST  also  recommended  streamlining  the  process  for

7 Image of Computing, http://www.imageofcomputing.com
8 CRA Committee on the Status of Women, http://www.cra.org/Activities/craw
9 National Center for Women and Information Technology, http://www.ncwit.org
10 Coalition to Diversity Computing, http://www.cdc-computing.org

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

obtaining  visas  for  non-U.S.  students  admitted  to  accredited  graduate  de-
gree  programs  and  to  make  it  routine  for  foreign  nationals  who  have  ob-
tained  advanced  degrees  in  NIT  subjects  at  accredited  U.S.  universities  to
be  permitted  to  work  and  gain  citizenship  by  easing  visa  and  permanent
resident processes for them.
7. NITRD Coordination: Strategic Planning and Execution

Without  doubt,  the  NITRD  program  has  been  effective  in  fostering  informal  com-
munication  and  coordination  across  agencies,  both  collectively  and  via  the  National
Coordination Office (NCO). The NCO annually solicits and reports agency spending
on  NITRD  Program  Component  Areas  (PCAs).  Though  each  federal  agency  is
represented  within  a  NITRD  Interagency  Working  Group  (IWG)  on  IT  re-
search and development, the IWG has no budget authority over any of the
participating  agencies  or  the  PCAs,  nor  does  the  NCO.  Each  agency  controls
its  own  budget  and  sets  its  own  goals  exclusively  on  the  perceived  appropriateness
of that funding to the agency’s mission.

In practical terms, this means the IWG function in NITRD is largely one of infor-
mation  sharing  among  agency  representatives  on  what  the  agencies  plan  to  do  and
have  done.  Although  the  resulting  NCO  data  is  useful,  it  is  a  retrospective  view  of
agency decisions and priorities, rather than an assessment of program priorities and
progress  against  those  plans.  The  process  also  tends  to  bias  the  process  toward  in-
cremental,  agency-specific  agendas,  making  the  NITRD  program  less  effective  in
managing larger-scale, coordinated projects than span multiple agencies.

In  a  globally  competitive  world,  we  must  plan  more  strategically  and  in-
crease  agency  accountability  for  execution  against  those  strategic  plans.
This  will  require  greater  interagency  coordination  and  collaboration
across  PCAs  to  facilitate  research  and  development  transition  within  and
across  agencies,  both  to  support  fundamental  research  and  to  enable  larg-
er, multi-agency projects.
8. Remaining Competitive: A Call to Action

To  maintain  the  health  and  vibrancy  of  the  U.S.  information  technology
ecosystem,  we  must  fully  fund  the  agencies  and  programs  included  in  the
America COMPETES Act. I commend you and your colleagues, Mr. Chairman, for
working so hard for its passage last year. It sent a powerful signal about the impor-
tance  of  the  federal  role  in  supporting  fundamental  research  in  the  physical
sciences,  including  information  technology.  I  also  appreciate  your  efforts  to  see  the
promise  of  the  COMPETES  Act  realized  in  appropriations.  The  funding  author-
ized in the Act would help drive the core of the IT innovation engine—the
fundamental  information  technology  research  in  U.S.  universities  and  na-
tional  laboratories  supported  by  the  National  Science  Foundation,  the  De-
partment of Energy’s Office of Science, and the National Institute of Stand-
ards and Technology.

The focus within the COMPETES Act on programs that aim to increase the num-
ber of students who enter science, technology, engineering and mathematics (STEM)
fields is also crucial to the future of information technology research. As I noted ear-
lier,  the  projected  demand  for  IT  professionals  over  the  next  10  years—positions
that require at least a Bachelor’s degree in computer science or computer engineer-
ing—exceeds  all  other  science  and  engineering  disciplines  combined.  Encouraging
U.S. students to enter the science and engineering education pipeline, as is the focus
of  many  of  the  programs  included  in  the  COMPETES  Act,  will  help  ensure  that
those  projected  workforce  needs  are  addressed.  The  many  provisions  in  the  Act
that seek to increase the participation of women and minorities in science
and  engineering  fields—two  populations  that  are  woefully  under-rep-
resented in computing—are especially important.

Adequate funding is critically important, but it is not sufficient; this funding must
be  invested  wisely  in  our  information  technology  ecosystem.  The  unilateral  deci-
sion  by  any  agency  to  change  the  direction,  scope  and  mechanisms  for  its
research  investments  has  consequences  across  the  entire  NITRD  eco-
system—federal  agencies,  universities  and  industry.  Such  changes  must  not
be  undertaken  without  due  consultation  and  consideration  of  broad  consequences.
We must rebalance agency participation in the NITRD program so that the
crucial  responsibility  of  supporting  fundamental  research  in  computing  is
not borne solely by one agency.

We  must  also  create  an  interagency  IT  research  and  development  stra-
tegic  plan,  complemented  by  a  roadmap  and  a  set  of  associated  metrics
that  define  interagency  expectations  and  accountabilities.  An  evolving,  stra-
tegic vision of information technology, together with an appropriate balance of short-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

range,  low  risk  and  long-range,  high  risk  projects  is  essential  if  we  are  to  remain
global  leaders.  The  1999  PITAC  report  recommended  creation  of  large-scale
Expeditions  to  the  21st  Century,  revolutionary  expeditions  whose  mission
. . .  will  be  to  report  back  to  the  Nation  what  could  be  accomplished  by  using
technologies  that  are  quantitatively  and  qualitatively  more  powerful  than  those
available  today.  In  essence,  these  centers  will  create  ‘‘time  machines’’  to  enable
the  early  exploration  of  technologies  that  would  otherwise  be  beyond  reach  for
many years.

We  would  do  well  to  embrace  this  vision  and  recommendation,  ensuring  that  we
fund a mix of projects, large and small, low and high risk, and both short- and long-
term.

Finally,  we  must  also  have  appropriate  oversight  and  review  of  our  re-
search  investment  and  accountability  against  strategic  plans.  The  Presi-
dent’s Information Technology Advisory Committee (PITAC) was authorized by Con-
gress  as  a  federal  advisory  committee  under  the  High-Performance  Computing  Act
of  1991  and  the  Next  Generation  Internet  Act  of  1998,  with  responsibility  to  assess
advanced information technology and review the NITRD program. PITAC functioned
as  a  separate  Presidential  advisory  committee  until  its  roles  and  responsibilities
were assigned by Executive Order in 2005 to the President’s Council of Advisors on
Science and Technology (PCAST).

PCAST  has  a  broad  scope  that  spans  all  of  science  and  technology,  a  challenging
and  important  portfolio.  Given the importance of IT research and technology
to our nation’s economy, national security, military readiness and research
enterprise,  an  independent  PITAC  is  needed  that  can  devote  the  time,  en-
ergy  and  diligence  to  ongoing  assessment  of  successes,  challenges,  needs
and  opportunities  in  information  technology.  I  base  this  opinion  on  my  own
experience  as  a  previous  member  of  PITAC  and  a  current  member  of  PCAST.  Sim-
ply  put,  the  NITRD  program  is  best  served  by  a  stand-alone  PITAC  composed  of
computing experts from academia and industry.

In summary, information technology is a universal intellectual amplifier, advanc-
ing all of science and engineering, powering the knowledge economy, enhancing the
quality  of  our  health  care,  and  transforming  how  we  work,  play  and  communicate.
With  vision,  strategic  investment  and  coordination,  the  U.S.  NITRD  program  can
and will continue to be the world’s leader.

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  and  this  committee  for  your  interest  in  the  future  of
the  NITRD  program  and  its  importance  to  U.S.  competitiveness.  Thank  you  very
much  for  your  time  and  attention.  At  the  appropriate  time,  I  would  be  pleased  to
answer any questions you might have.

BIOGRAPHY FOR DANIEL A. REED

Daniel  A.  Reed  is  Director  of  Scalable  and  Multicore  Computing  Strategy  at
Microsoft.  Previously,  he  was  the  Chancellor’s  Eminent  Professor  at  the  University
of  North  Carolina  at  Chapel  Hill,  as  well  as  the  Director  of  the  Renaissance  Com-
puting  Institute  (RENCI),  which  explored  the  interactions  of  computing  technology
with  the  sciences,  arts  and  humanities.  He  formerly  held  the  Edward  William  and
Jane  Marr  Gutgsell  Professorship  at  the  University  of  Illinois  at  Urbana-Cham-
paign,  where  he  was  Professor  and  Head  of  the  Department  of  Computer  Science
and Director of the National Center for Supercomputing Applications (NCSA). At Il-
linois, he also led National Computational Science Alliance, a consortium of roughly
fifty academic institutions and national laboratories to develop next-generation soft-
ware  infrastructure  of  scientific  computing.  He  was  also  one  of  the  principal  inves-
tigators and chief architect for the NSF TeraGrid.

Dr.  Reed  is  a  member  of  President  Bush’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and
Technology  (PCAST)  and  a  former  member  of  the  President’s  Information  Tech-
nology  Advisory  Committee  (PITAC).  He  recently  chaired  a  review  of  the  federal
networking  and  IT  research  (NITRD)  portfolio,  and  he  is  Chair  of  the  Board  of  Di-
rectors of the Computing Research Association (CRA), which represents the research
interests  of  universities,  government  laboratories  and  industry.  He  received  his
Ph.D. in computer science in 1983 from Purdue University.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Reed, and also thank you for
pointing  out  the  need  to  continue  the  funding  for  COMPETES.  I
think  sometimes  the  real  world  out  there  doesn’t  understand  the
difference  between  authorization  and  appropriation,  and  we  have

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

got  to  continue  to  move  forward.  And  thank  you  for  bringing  that
up.

I  will  also  point  out  that  in  the  COMPETES  Act,  we  did  change
the  review  to  two  years,  and  we  made  it  a  stand-alone  committee
also.

Dr. Stewart, we would love to hear from you.

STATMENT OF DR. CRAIG A. STEWART, CHAIR, COALITION FOR
ACADEMIC  SCIENTIFIC  COMPUTING;  ASSOCIATE  DEAN,  RE-
SEARCH TECHNOLOGIES, INDIANA UNIVERSITY
Dr.  STEWART.  Let  me  begin  by  thanking  Chairman  Gordon,
Ranking  Member  Mr.  Hall,  Messrs.  Hills  and  Carson  of  Indiana,
and  all  Members  of  the  House  Science  and  Technology  Committee
for the opportunity to be here today.

I am Chair of the Coalition for Academic Scientific Computation,
or  CASC.  I  am  offering  testimony  as  requested  by  Chairman  Gor-
don  regarding  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and
Technology 2007 Report, Leadership Under Challenge, Information
Technology Research and Development in a Competitive World. To
provide  context  for  this  testimony,  CASC  is  an  educational,  non-
profit  organization  dedicated  to  using  advanced  computing  tech-
nology  to  accelerate  scientific  discovery  for  national  competitive-
ness, global security, and economic success.

There  are  a  total  of  53  CASC  members,  colleges,  and  univer-
sities, and research labs in 36 states and the District of Columbia.
I  note  that  Members  of  the  Committee  represent  a  total  of  24
states, 19 of which are home to at least one CASC member.

As stated in the PCAST Report, we must improve the networking
and  information  technology  ecosystem  in  the  United  States  to
maintain  and  extend  our  competitive  advantage  and  innovation.
The NITRD Program support of 13 federal agencies including DOD,
DOE,  DARPA,  NASA,  NIH,  NIST,  and  NSF  has  accelerated  infor-
mation  technology  innovation  and  led  to  new  insights  in  science,
technology,  and  medicine.  These  advances  have  led  to  valuable
changes in the private sector as we all know.

CASC  fully  supports  the  overall  recommendations  of  the  2007
PCAST  Report.  The  recommendations  in  that  report,  if  well-sup-
ported by finding and executed aggressively, will contribute greatly
to  continued  U.S.  leadership  in  networking  and  information  tech-
nology.

Without  overarching  endorsement  as  the  key  point  of  this  testi-
mony,  CASC  would  like  to  make  a  few  suggestions  to  emphasize
and add to the PCAST recommendations. First, federal investment
in NIT research and development will be most valuable in the long
run  if  investment  patterns  in  the  many  sub  areas  included  within
NITRD are as consistent as possible over time. The PCAST Report
makes several important recommendations regarding workforce de-
velopment.  We  agree  with  these  recommendations  and  would  like
to  suggest  additional  areas  of  emphasis.  Programs  that  will  in-
crease  the  number  of  students  who  choose  a  major  related  to  NIT
after  entering  college  undecided  on  a  major  and  continue  to
strengthen  and  expand  the  emphasis  on  science,  technology,  engi-
neering,  and  mathematics  disciplines  in  primary  and  secondary
education.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

We  commend  Chairman  Gordon  and  the  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee as a whole for leadership in creating and supporting the de-
velopment  of  the  STEM  program.  We  hope  you  might  consider  ex-
panding it to include greater emphasis on computing in the future.
CASC would also like to expand on the report’s recommendation
regarding  a  strategic  roadmap  for  federal  investments  in  high-end
computing  research  and  development.  In  addition  to  the  rec-
ommendations  made  in  the  report,  such  a  plan  should  implement
methods for sustained support and maintenance of software critical
to  the  U.S.  networking  and  information  technology  agenda.  This
plan  should  also  support  the  coordination  of  U.S.  high-end  com-
puting  facilities  in  a  way  that  maximizes  the  total  benefit  to  U.S.
national  interest  by  leveraging  investments  at  the  college,  univer-
sity,  State,  and  regional  levels  in  addition  to  federal  investments.
In  closing,  let  me  return  to  the  title  of  the  2007  PCAST  Report,
Leadership Under Challenge. U.S. leadership is indeed under chal-
lenge in many ways across the globe. As regards, networking infor-
mation  technology,  the  current  challenges  are  without  precedent.
Without  strong  investment,  the  United  States  is  at  risk  of  losing
its  longstanding  position  of  global  leadership  in  networking  infor-
mation technology. The consequences of that would be catastrophic.
However,  the  recommendations  made  in  the  PCAST  Report  if  en-
acted and well-funded, will continue and extend U.S. leadership in
networking information technology and fuel future U.S. global lead-
ership  and  innovation  generally.  This  will  lead  to  continued  and
improved prosperity, health, and security for Americans and indeed
all citizens of the world.

Thank you again for the opportunity to appear before you today.
I  should  note  that  my  testimony  this  morning  has  been  endorsed
by  a  formal  vote  of  CASC  members.  One  CASC  member’s  voting
representative  was  unavailable  due  to  travel.  The  remaining  52
have  voted  unanimously  to  endorse  my  testimony  this  morning.  I
hope that these remarks have been helpful to the Committee. I am
happy  to  answer  any  questions  now  or  at  any  time  in  the  future.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Stewart follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CRAIG A. STEWART

1. Background and context

I  am  pleased  to  have  this  opportunity  to  provide  testimony  to  the  House  Science
and Technology Committee in response to a request from Chairman Gordon. Chair-
man Gordon, in his letter of invitation to the Coalition for Advanced Scientific Com-
puting,  asked  for  comments  on  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and
Technology  (PCAST)  2007  report  Leadership  Under  Challenge:  Information  Tech-
nology R&D in a Competitive World1 and the merit of the recommendations therein.
To  provide  context  for  this  testimony,  I  serve  as  the  chair  of  the  Coalition  for  Ad-
vanced  Scientific  Computing  (CASC)  (http://www.casc.org),  an  educational  non-
profit 501(c)(3) organization with 53 member institutions, representing many of the
Nation’s  most  forward  thinking  universities  and  computing  centers.  CASC  is  dedi-
cated to advocating the use and development of the most advanced computing tech-
nology to accelerate scientific discovery for national competitiveness, global security,
and economic success, as well as to developing a diverse and highly skilled 21st cen-
tury  workforce.  My  testimony  this  morning  has  been  endorsed  by  a  majority  of  the
members  of  CASC,  and  represents  the  general  consensus  of  opinion  within  CASC.

1 President’s Council of Advisors on Science and Technology (PCAST). 2007. Leadership Under
Challenge:  Information  Technology  R&D  in  a[0]  Competitive  World.  http://www.nitrd.gov/
pcast/reports/PCAST-NIT-FINAL.pdf

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

I  also  serve  Indiana  University  as  the  Associate  Dean  for  Research  Technologies
and the Chief Operating Officer for the Pervasive Technology Labs at Indiana Uni-
versity.  As  such,  I  am  responsible  for  many  of  the  advanced  networking  and  infor-
mation  technology  services  provided  to  Indiana  University  researchers.  Through
support  from  the  State  of  Indiana  and  Federal  agencies,  I  am  also  responsible  for
services delivered to public and private sector researchers in Indiana and research-
ers  at  institutions  of  higher  education  throughout  the  U.S.  I  came  to  be  involved
in networking and information technology originally as a biologist. I thus value ad-
vanced  technology  first  and  foremost  for  what  it  can  do  practically  to  improve  the
quality of human life and our understanding of the world around us.

2. Key observations

In  their  letter  submitting  the  2007  PCAST  report,  Co-Chairs  John  H.  Marburger
III  and  E.  Floyd  Kvamme  summarized  in  two  sentences  the  challenge  facing  the
U.S. in networking and information technology (NIT):

‘‘While the United States clearly is the global NIT leader today, we face aggres-
sive  challenges  from  a  growing  list  of  competitors.  To  maintain—and  extend—
the  Nation’s  competitive  advantages,  we  must  further  improve  the  U.S.  NIT
ecosystem—the  fabric  made  up  of  high-quality  research  and  education  institu-
tions,  an  entrepreneurial  culture,  strong  capital  markets,  commercialization
pathways, and a skilled NIT workforce that fuels our technological leadership.’’
CASC strongly endorses this statement and the findings and recommendations in-
cluded  in  the  report.  The  key  summary  of  the  past,  included  on  page  1,  that  ‘‘. . ..
the  NITRD  [Networking  and  Information  Technology  Research  and  Development]
Program  has  by  and  large  been  effective  at  meeting  agency  and  national  needs’’  is
correct.  Indeed,  the  NITRD  program’s  support  of  fourteen  Federal  agencies,  includ-
ing the Department of Defense, Department of Energy, and DARPA, has accelerated
innovation in information technology, leading to new insights and practical, valuable
changes  in  industry  (including  improved  fuel  efficiency,  health  and  medical  care,
homeland security, and the creation of many physical devices that improve our pro-
ductivity and overall quality of life).

The Community I represent fully supports the overall recommendations stated in
the  PCAST  report.  General  George  S.  Patton  stated,  ‘‘A  good  plan,  violently  exe-
cuted  now,  is  better  than  a  perfect  plan  next  week.’’  The  findings  of  PCAST  are—
overall—spot  on.  It  is  easy  to  quibble  over  details,  but  in  general  the  recommenda-
tions,  if  executed  aggressively,  would  be  far  better  than  inaction  or  continuation
with the status quo in the NITRD Program.

With  that  overarching  endorsement  as  the  key  point  of  this  testimony,  we  would
like  to  make  three  additional  points  to  emphasize  and  add  to  the  PCAST  rec-
ommendations  regarding  investment  patterns  over  time,  workforce  development,  and
creation  and  implementation  of  a  High  End  Computing  Research  and  Development
plan.

3. Pattern of investment over time

Without strong, continued, and consistent investment in networking and informa-
tion technology (NIT), the U.S. will not have the administrative and technical lead-
ership  to  support  consistent  and  directed  change.  Government  investment  in  NIT
will  be  of  greatest  value  if  there  is  consistency  in  levels  of  investment  over  time.
The men and women who execute the national NIT agenda represent a tremendous
store of experience, skill, and knowledge. The uniform experience of CASC members
is  that  when  there  are  strong  variations  in  funding  in  specific  areas  of  NIT  over
time,  lean  times  for  particular  areas  of  research  in  NIT  cause  skilled  professionals
to leave public sector NIT research. This means that years of investment by the gov-
ernment  in  developing  a  knowledge  and  experience  base  in  individuals  who  desire
to  pursue  a  career  in  the  public  service  sector  are  lost  to  the  public  sector,  not  to
return even when funding for particular areas is subsequently restored. U.S. global
competitiveness,  innovation,  and  homeland  security  are  thus  best  served  by  con-
sistent and strong investment in basic NIT research; advanced NIT facilities to sup-
port  advanced  research  and  development  in  science,  engineering,  and  technology;
and research in developing and delivering the next generation of such advanced NIT
facilities.

4. Workforce Development

The  PCAST  report  makes  several  important  recommendations  regarding  work-
force  development  aimed  at  increasing  the  supply  of  professionals  with  Bachelor’s,
Master’s, and doctoral degrees in NIT areas. The recommendations focus on actions

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

that should increase the supply of skilled NIT professionals in the U.S. in the short-
term. This is critically important, and CASC supports all of those recommendations.
We  would  like  to  make  two  suggestions  for  funding  emphasis  that  are  in  addition
to the recommendations made in the report.

Recommendation: Increase the number of students receiving a Bachelor’s degree in
a  field  related  to  NIT  by  funding  programs  that  encourage  students  to  explore  NIT
majors.  An  effective  way  to  do  this  would  be  to  support  programs  that  use  tele-col-
laboration technologies to enhance the NIT-related course offerings at small colleges
and  universities,  particularly  those  that  serve  large  populations  of  students  from
groups  traditionally  under-represented  among  NIT  professionals.  For  example,  stu-
dents at Jackson State University, an HBCU (Historically Black College or Univer-
sity),  and  Navajo  Technical  College  (a  college  located  within  the  Navajo  Nation)
took, via teleconference, computer science courses from IU School of Informatics Pro-
fessor  Geoffrey  C.  Fox.  Students  who  took  these  courses  indicated  that  they  found
the classes inspirational and that they affected their career plans. This activity was
enabled  by  relatively  modest  funding  from  the  National  Science  Foundation.  Simi-
larly,  Thomas  Sterling,  the  inventor  of  Beowulf  computing  and  a  computer  science
professor  at  Louisiana  State,  has  taught  classes  in  high  performance  computing
classes  via  tele-collaboration  to  students  of  the  University  of  Arkansas  and  Lou-
isiana  Tech.  Increased  investment  in  collaborative  distance  education,  either  in  ab-
solute terms or as a relative share of the NITRD budget, would have disproportion-
ately  great  long-term  impact  on  the  supply  of  professionals  with  college  degrees  in
NIT.

Recommendation:  Continue  to  strengthen  and  expand  the  emphasis  on  STEM
(Science,  Technology,  Engineering,  and  Mathematics)  disciplines  in  elementary  and
secondary education, so as to increase the absolute numbers and relative percentages
of  high  school  graduates  who  plan  to  enter  college  in  an  NIT-related  discipline.  We
would  like  to  commend  Chairman  Gordon  for  his  leadership  in  creating  and  sup-
porting  the  development  of  the  STEM  program.  The  uniform  experience  of  CASC
member  organizations  is  that  within  their  home  states,  there  are  areas  where  the
educational system and social environment do not provide adequate incentive or op-
portunity for our young people to become excited by STEM disciplines and then ac-
quire the primary and secondary education needed to successfully pursue an under-
graduate  (and  then  advanced)  education  in  NIT-related  areas.  The  PCAST  report
recommends steps to increase the importing of talent to the U.S. from abroad at the
same time that we are losing the opportunity to develop our own talent. Each CASC
institution can provide data to support this. In my home State of Indiana, for exam-
ple innately bright young people in the rural southwest and urban northwest of the
state  are  lost  to  the  U.S.  21st  century  workforce  because  they  are  provided  neither
the inspiration nor the education that would enable them to pursue careers in NIT.
We  recognize  that  this  area  is  beyond  the  statutory  responsibility  of  NITRD,  but  it
is  important  and  related  to  NITRD  and  the  PCAST  recommendations.  Chairman
Gordon, we hope that you might now consider leveraging the successful STEM pro-
gram by expanding it to include Computing.

5. High End Computing Research and Development Roadmap

The  PCAST  report  makes  several  recommendations  regarding  investments  in
High End Computing. We endorse those recommendations and would like to expand
on one of the recommendations (made on page 40 of the PCAST report):

‘‘Recommendation:  The  NITRD  Subcommittee  should  develop,  implement,  and
maintain a strategic plan for Federal investments in HEC [high-end computing]
R&D,  infrastructure,  applications,  and  education  and  training.  Based  on  the
strategic plan, the NITRD Subcommittee should involve experts from academia
and industry to develop and maintain a HEC R&D roadmap.’’

As noted in the PCAST report, such a roadmap should be based on the 2004 Fed-
eral  Plan  for  High-End  Computing.2 Since  the  writing  of  that  2004  report,  several
new  developments  in  the  NIT  ecosystem  have  taken  place,  creating  new  opportuni-
ties  for  increased  innovation,  more  widespread  practical  benefits  resulting  from
those  innovations,  and  enhanced  leverage  of  federal  investments.  CASC  offers  two
suggestions regarding the plan called for in this recommendation, to be added to the
bullet points listed on page 40 of the PCAST report. A strategic plan for federal de-
velopments in HEC R&D should:

2 National  Science  and  Technology  Council.  Federal  Plan  for  High-End  Computing.  Wash-
http://www.nitrd.gov/pubs/2004¥hecrtf/

available 

at 

ington,  D.C.:  May 
20040702¥hecrtf.pdf

2004, 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

• Implement  methods  for  sustainable  support  for  software  development  critical
to the U.S. NIT agenda. This must include supporting creation of complexity-
hiding  interfaces  that  will  dramatically  expand  the  ability  of  scientists  and
engineers generally to leverage and effectively use HEC infrastructure.
• Support the coordination of U.S. cyberinfrastructure that maximizes the total
benefit  to  U.S.  national  interests  by  taking  best  advantage  of  investments  at
the college, university, State, and regional levels, in addition to federal invest-
ments.

I would like to briefly explain these points below.
Implement methods for sustainable support for software development critical to the
U.S.  NIT  agenda.  This  must  include  supporting  creation  of  complexity-hiding  inter-
faces  that  will  dramatically  expand  the  ability  of  scientists  and  engineers  generally
to  leverage  and  effectively  use  HEC  infrastructure.  The  Federal  Government  needs
to significantly increase its investment in research, development, and sustained sup-
port  of  important  software  tools.  As  noted  in  the  PCAST  report,  software  critically
important to U.S. global competitiveness is not always viable as a commercial prod-
uct,  yet  sustaining  it  over  time  is  critical  to  U.S.  interests.  Sometimes  open  source
software  development  is  a  solution.  A  new  approach—community  source  software—
is emerging within universities to coordinate and leverage efforts in development of
educational  and  financial  management  software.  This  approach  may  or  may  not  be
applicable  to  scientific  software.  But  it  is  notable  that  a  relatively  modest  invest-
ment by the Mellon Foundation enabled the Sakai Collaboration3 to develop a com-
pletely  new  approach  to  sustainability  of  educational  software.  Similarly  a  modest
investment  by  the  William  and  Flora  Hewlett  Foundation  enabled  the  Connexions4
project to develop a global open and free repository for authors, instructors, and stu-
dents  to  share  and  develop  educational  material.  CASC  recommends  that  the  Fed-
eral Government investigate and support new models for scientific software sustain-
ability in addition to those already in use.

An  important  new  trend  in  HEC  software  environments  is  the  concept  of  a
Science  Gateway.  A  Science  Gateway  is  a  web-accessible  tool  that  provides  end-to-
end  support  for  a  scientific  work  flow,  such  as  the  prediction  of  tornadoes  or  the
analysis  of  an  earthquake  or  a  genome.  For  example,  one  Science  Gateway  devel-
oped with NSF support provides an intuitive interface that allows a weather expert
to select input data from Doppler radars, process multiple predictions of tornado for-
mation using some of the U.S.’s fastest supercomputers, and produce a visualization
on  a  laptop  computer  in  time  to  send  emergency  warnings  and  save  lives.  Science
Gateways  provide  this  sort  of  sophisticated  capability  to  scientists  and  engineers
without  requiring  that  such  people,  who  have  invested  years  in  becoming  experts
in their own specific disciplines, also invest years in becoming expert computational
scientists.  Using  HEC  systems  to  predict  tornadoes,  analyze  genomes,  understand
earthquakes,  etc.,  should  be  as  easy—for  researchers  who  understand  the  under-
lying  science—as  buying  a  book  over  the  Internet;  identifying  and  understanding
the critical aspects of terabytes of data should be like starting with a web-accessible
image  of  North  America  and  zooming  in  on  your  own  back  yard.  For  decades,  na-
tional and discipline-specific agendas of a few grand challenge problems in high end
computing  have  catalyzed  innovation  within  the  U.S.  Today  there  are  thousands  of
important theoretical and practical problems that can and will be solved if the HEC
infrastructure  of  the  U.S.  can  be  made  more  easily  usable.  In  addition,  such  com-
plexity-hiding  interfaces  give  undergraduate  and  even  high  school  students  the  op-
portunity  to  use  high-end  computing,  which  will  aid  the  STEM  education  and  21st
century workforce development I have already recommended.

Support for development of complexity-hiding interfaces must be in addition to the
much-needed investments in software development on which such gateways depend
and  which  are  already  called  for  in  the  PCAST  report.  For  example,  new  program-
ming  models  and  approaches  to  programming  are  needed  to  take  advantage  of
emerging HEC architectures, particularly multi-core processors and specialized com-
putational  hardware.  In  addition,  today’s  high  quality  (including  3D)  computer  dis-
plays, enhanced by research and development in visualization, can provide new tools
for extracting insight from the massive streams of data now produced by digital in-
struments.

Support the coordination of U.S. cyberinfrastructure that maximizes the total ben-
efit to U.S. national interests by taking best advantage of investments at the college,
university,  State,  and  regional  levels,  in  addition  to  Federal  investments.  While  the
term cyberinfrastructure is not used in the PCAST 2007 report, it is useful in a dis-

3 http://sakaiproject.org/
4 http://cnx.org/

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

cussion  of  NIT  and  national  competitiveness.  The  first  usage  of  the  term
cyberinfrastructure that I can find is from a 1998 press briefing by Richard Clarke,
then  National  Coordinator  for  Security,  Infrastructure  Protection,  and  Counter-ter-
rorism.5 The term became widely used after its inclusion in a very important report
by a blue-ribbon committee commissioned by the NSF.6 There are several definitions
of cyberinfrastructure; the one I like best (admittedly developed by my group at In-
diana University) is as follows:

‘‘Cyberinfrastructure  consists  of  computing  systems,  data  storage  systems,  ad-
vanced instruments and data repositories, visualization environments, and peo-
ple,  all  linked  together  by  software  and  high  performance  networks  to  improve
research productivity and enable breakthroughs not otherwise possible.’’ 7

Cyberinfrastructure  is  indeed  the  foundation  for  innovation  for  our  nation.  Lead-
ership  class  systems  within  the  national  cyberinfrastructure  are  funded  by  NITRD,
and that is likely to continue for some time. However, the broad foundation for inno-
vation  will  best  serve  the  needs  of  the  Nation  if  Federal  leadership  can  aid  the  co-
ordination  of  the  collective  cyberinfrastructure  assets  funded  by  NITRD  agencies
and  those  funded  by  other  sources,  including  colleges,  universities,  states,  and  re-
gional consortia. The resulting extension and leverage of Federal investment in NIT,
HEC,  and  cyberinfrastructure  would  be  tremendous  and  far-reaching,  enabling  the
U.S. to increase its global competitiveness far beyond what would be capable on the
basis of federal investment without such coordinated leverage.

6. Conclusion

In  conclusion,  let  me  return  to  the  starting  point  of  the  PCAST  report.  NITRD
has been tremendously important to U.S. innovation and global competitiveness, the
quality  of  life  of  Americans,  and  the  security  of  our  homeland.  CASC  members  en-
dorse the recommendations contained in the PCAST report, and hope that the com-
ments  made  in  this  testimony  regarding  particular  areas  of  emphasis  or  addition
of recommendations will be of value to this Committee as it embarks upon activities
to  plan  for  an  even  better  future  of  new,  important,  and  practical  accomplishments
through legislation related to NITRD.

The  2007  PCAST  report  is  titled  Leadership  Under  Challenge:  Information  Tech-
nology  R&D  in  a  Competitive  World.  U.S.  leadership  is  indeed  under  challenge  in
many  ways  across  the  globe.  As  regards  networking  and  information  technology,
these  challenges  are  unprecedented.  Without  strong  investment  in  NIT,  the  U.S.  is
at risk of losing its longstanding position of global leadership, and the consequences
of  this  would  be  catastrophic.  However,  the  recommendations  made  in  the  PCAST
report,  if  enacted  into  legislation  and  well  funded,  will  continue  and  extend  U.S.
leadership  in  network  and  information  technology,  and  will  fuel  future  U.S.  global
leadership  in  innovation.  This  will  lead  to  continued  and  improved  prosperity,
health, and security for Americans and indeed all citizens of the world.

Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today. I am happy to answer

any questions now or at any time in the future.

BIOGRAPHY FOR CRAIG A. STEWART

Craig  Stewart  is  Associate  Dean  for  Research  Technologies  and  Chief  Operating
Officer for the Pervasive Technology Labs at Indiana University. In these roles, Dr.
Stewart oversees activities conducive to and supporting research in advanced infor-
mation  technology.  He  received  his  Ph.D.  in  Biology  from  Indiana  University  in
1988, and has held a variety of positions in Information Technology at Indiana Uni-
versity.  His  longstanding  career  interests  are  in  high  performance  computing  and
computational  biology.  In  high  performance  computing  his  areas  of  concentration
are HPC architectures and grid computing. In the area of computational biology his
areas  of  concentration  are  computational  phylogenetics,  computationally  intensive
simulation  methods  in  systems  biology,  and  biomedical  data  grids.  Dr.  Stewart  is
currently chair of the Coalition for Academic Scientific Computing.

Dr. Stewart served as guest editor for Bioinformatics: transforming biomedical re-
search and medical care, the November 2004 special issue of Communications of the

5 Press  briefing  by  Richard  Clarke,  National  Coordinator  for  Security,  Infrastructure  Protec-
tion, and Counter-Terrorism;; and Jeffrey Hunker, Director of the Critical Infrastructure Assur-
ance Office. 22 May, 1998. http://www.fas.org/irp/news/1998/05/980522-wh3.htm

the  National  Science  Foundation  Blue-Ribbon  Advisory  Panel 

on

Cyberinfrastructure. http://www.nsf.gov/od/oci/reports/atkins.pdf

6 Report 

of 

7 Indiana University Cyberinfrastructure Newsletter, March, 2007. http://racinfo.indiana.edu/

newsletter/archives/2007-03.shtml

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

Association for Computing Machinery. He has co-authored numerous papers, includ-
ing Measuring quality, cost, and value of IT services in higher education for the 2001
American  Quality  Congress,  Parallel  computing  in  biomedical  research  and  the
search  for  petascale  biomedical  applications  for  Advances  in  Parallel  Computing  in
2004,  and  Implementation  of  a  distributed  architecture  for  managing  collection  and
dissemination  of  data  for  fetal  alcohol  spectrum  disorders  research  for  Grid  Com-
puting in Computational Biology in 2006. Dr. Stewart has also presented many tuto-
rials,  including  a  2005  introduction  to  computational  biology  at  High  Performance
Computing  Center,  Stuttgart,  Germany.  He  also  helped  lead  two  winning  projects
at  the  premier  annual  international  supercomputing  conference:  Global  Analysis  of
Arthropod  Evolution,  the  2003  HPC  Challenge  winner;  and  Using  the  Data  Capac-
itor  for  Remote  Data  Collection,  Analysis,  and  Visualization,  the  2007  Bandwidth
Challenge winner.

Dr. Stewart is an active participant in several federally funded grants, including:
TeraGrid  Resource  Partners  (NSF);  Acquisition  of  PolarGrid:  Cyberinfrastructure
for Polar Science (NSF); the Open Science Grid (NSF/NIH); and Major Research In-
frastructure: Data Capacitor (NSF).

Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Stewart. As I mentioned ear-
lier,  we  are  in  the  process  of  trying  to  gain  more  information.  The
Academy  will  be  an  important  part  of  that  information.  As  you
know,  Baron  Hill  is  fortunately  your  Member  of  Congress,  and  so
he will be taking a direct row on this and we want you to be a con-
duit  for  information  for  the  Academy  and  for  Baron  to  play  a  role
in it. Thank you very much.

And finally, Mr. Don Winter.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  DON  C.  WINTER,  VICE  PRESIDENT,  ENGI-
NEERING  AND  INFORMATION  TECHNOLOGY,  PHANTOM
WORKS, THE BOEING COMPANY
Mr.  WINTER.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member
Hall and Members of the Committee. I am Don Winter, Vice Presi-
dent  of  Engineering  and  Information  Technology  at  Boeing  Phan-
tom  Works.  I  am  grateful  for  the  invitation  to  speak  with  you  on
the  NITRD  Program,  specifically  those  focused  on  cyber-physical
systems.

I  was  impressed  with  the  way  in  which  these  recommendations
were developed, bringing stakeholders from government, academia,
and  industry  together  with  a  common  focus  on  national  competi-
tiveness.

PCAST Report builds a sound case for the recommended research
focus areas, including the area of specific interest to me, the cyber-
physical systems.

The  subject  of  research  on  cyber-physical  systems  or  CPS  is  of
great  importance  to  the  aerospace  industry  as  a  whole  and  to  our
nation.  The  use  of  CPS  is  increasing,  their  complexity  is  growing
at an exponential rate. Demands for higher performance and lower
cost  for  commercial  and  military  systems  are  driving  next-genera-
tion systems to be highly networked and highly dynamic in nature.
Moreover,  systems  will  need  to  be  designed  to  exhibit  robust  and
predictably  safe  behavior  in  these  highly  dynamic  environments.
Future  aerospace  systems  will  require  cyber-physical  systems  of
even greater complexity. Systems will operate with high degrees of
autonomy  or  collaborate  among  themselves  to  achieve  dramatic
gains  in  operational  effectiveness.  New  cyber-physical  system  at-
tributes  such  as  active  resource  management,  dynamic  scheduling,
and  software  enabled  control  mode  changes  will  be  needed  to  sup-
port  these  behaviors.  These  emerging  challenges  call  for  cyber-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

physical systems on a grand scale. Research that addresses valida-
tion  and  verification  of  the  complex  interactions  between  system
modules  is  critical.  Without  advances  in  these  technologies,  the
costs  and  risks  of  developing  next  generation  cyber-physical  sys-
tems of this scale may be prohibitive and have a significant impact
on the industry.

Many  of  our  systems  are  safety-critical  and  require  certification
by  the  FAA  or  equivalent  military  authority.  Many  of  our  military
systems  will  need  to  support  coalition  operations  with  multi-level
security requirements. Our systems must also be hardened to with-
stand a future cyber attack. Because of these unique requirements
and  the  relatively  small  number  of  end  systems,  we  do  not  expect
to  see  large  investment  from  the  commercial  IT  sector  in  these
technologies. In order to achieve these cross-cutting capabilities, we
will  need  advances  in  design  technologies  such  as  model-based  de-
velopment tools and validation environments to build systems rap-
idly and affordably. Moreover, we will require research and product
focus  technology  in  software  reuse,  real-time  theory,  languages,
and  product  line  CPS  architectures.  It  can  be  applied  to  many  dif-
ferent end systems.

We  have  achieved  some  measure  of  progress.  Over  the  past  10
years,  Boeing  has  developed  metal-ware  based  product  line,  CPS
architectures,  notably  the  bold  stroke  architecture  for  tactical  air-
craft  avionics  and  the  system  of  systems  common  operating  envi-
ronment are SOSCO for the future combat systems. To support our
military  system  developments,  and  substantial  gains  in  produc-
tivity were realized.

What is the way ahead? Efforts today that have been fragmented

across industry and limited by internal funding constraints.

CPS  investments  cross  multiple  technology  domains  will  require
an  industry  level  critical  mass  to  achieve  the  needed  result.  Other
industries,  notably  automotive,  energy  management  and  control,
and  medical  face  similar  CPS  trends  and  pressures  and  have  ex-
pressed their desire to participate. WE need a national strategy in
which  long-term  CPS  technology  needs  are  addressed  by  combined
government and corporate investment. Boeing for its part can focus
long-term  CPS  investments  of  collaborative  research  in  which  we
provide  the  challenge  problems  and  in-kind  participation  and  gov-
ernment  industry  research  consortia.  Although  I  don’t  speak  for
them,  I  am  confident  my  industry  partners  are  willing  to  do  the
same. We also need to develop new ways to facilitate the transition
of research products back into industry and into our products.

The point is critical, and again, as a matter of national competi-
tiveness,  The  European  Union’s  Advanced  Research  and  Tech-
nology  for  Embedded  Intelligence  Systems,  ARTEMIS,  program  is
funded by a public-private investment of over $7 billion and is per-
suading  R&D  to  achieve  ‘‘world  leadership  in  intelligent  electronic
systems’’  by  2016.  European  industry  is  fully  partnered  with  gov-
ernment  and  academia  in  ARTEMIS.  From  our  perspective,  an  ac-
tive partnership of this nature in CPS is essential to reap the bene-
fits  of  this  advanced  research.  This  partnership  needs  to  reach
deeper  than  the  arm’s-length  approach  used  for  industry  involve-
ment today.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

In  summary,  we  support  the  proposed  expansion  of  the  NITRD
program’s  research  objectives  to  address  cyber-physical  systems
and  we  look  forward  to  the  opportunity  to  participate.  That  con-
cludes  my  testimony.  I  would  be  pleased  to  respond  to  your  ques-
tions.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Winter follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF DON C. WINTER

Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  Hall  and  Members  of  the  Com-

mittee.

I  am  Don  Winter—Vice  President  of  Engineering  and  Information  Technology  at
Boeing  Phantom  Works.  I  am  grateful  for  the  invitation  to  speak  with  you  on  this
subject  of  research  on  cyber-physical  systems  (CPS),  a  topic  of  great  importance  to
the  Boeing  Company,  the  aerospace  industry  as  a  whole,  and  to  our  Nation.  I  have
a great interest in this subject because of my current position managing an annual
R&D budget of over $300M and my past position as one of the founders of the Bold
Stroke  R&D  initiative  at  Boeing,  focused  largely  on  advancing  the  state  of  the  art
in cyber-physical systems.

Boeing  has  a  somewhat  unique  perspective  on  cyber-physical  systems  due  to  our
prominent  position  in  both  the  military  and  commercial  aerospace  markets.  Cyber-
physical  systems  are  pervasive  at  Boeing,  and  in  the  aerospace  industry  at  large.
They  are  becoming  increasingly  prevalent  in  other  sectors,  notably  automotive  and
energy management. Their importance to our products is huge and their complexity
is  growing  at  an  exponential  rate.  Demands  for  higher  system  performance  and
lower  system  cost  for  commercial  and  military  systems  are  driving  next  generation
systems to be highly networked and highly dynamic in nature. Lower recurring and
maintenance  costs  will  be  derived  from  integrated  vehicle  health  management  that
enhances  system  reliability  and  reduces  logistics  and  maintenance  costs.  Moreover,
systems will need to be designed to exhibit ‘‘predictably safe’’ behaviors in an uncer-
tain environment.

In the 70’s and 80’s aerodynamics and structures accounted for nearly 90 percent
of  the  development  cost  of  a  transport  aircraft,  with  cyber-physical  system  develop-
ment  accounting  for  less  than  10  percent.  The  trend  has  reversed,  and  cyber-phys-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

ical system design, development, validation and certification account for nearly half
of development costs for current generation system, and for next generation systems
this percentage is expected to rise to 50 percent or more.

Several  examples  are  germane  and  illustrate  the  exponential  growth  in  software
and  system  complexity  of  our  modern  systems.  The  747–400  first  flew  in  the  late
1980’s.  The  size  of  the  software  for  the  on-board  cyber-physical  systems  is  on  the
order of 10MB. The Boeing 777 first flew in the early 1990’s. Its flight software size
is  an  order  of  magnitude  larger—100MB  (on  the  order  of  10  million  SLOC).  As  we
evolve to systems such as 787, software size and system complexity will be increased
by two or more orders of magnitude.

These are cyber-physical systems on a grand scale. Research that can support val-
idation and verification of the complex interactions between system modules is high-
ly  important.  Without  advances  in  these  technologies,  the  cost  and  risk  of  devel-
oping  next  generations  of  cyber-physical  systems  of  this  scale  may  be  prohibitive,
and have a significant impact on the aerospace industry.

The  trends  towards  CPS  complexity  are  not  exclusive  to  the  aerospace  industry.
The automotive industry has a similar experience. For the last several years, Boeing
has been participating in CPS forums across aerospace, automotive, and energy sec-
tors. At a May 2007 CPS Roundtable, representatives from USCAR (the U.S. Coun-
cil  for  Automotive  Research—an  umbrella  organization  for  collaborative  research
among  Chrysler,  Ford,  and  General  Motors)  reported  similar  trends.  Currently  the
percentage  of  vehicle  cost  due  to  electronics  content  is  approximately  30  percent.
The electronics content is increasing in complexity and number of functions. USCAR
likewise indicated that ‘‘the most difficult issues lie not in the design of the software
in individual modules, but in the interactions between different modules and compo-
nents—i.e., integration of embedded systems composed of heterogeneous components
designed and implemented by different suppliers.’’

Cyber-physical  systems  are  pervasive  in  other  military  systems.  Emerging  sys-
tems (manned and unmanned) are incorporating greater intelligence and autonomy.
Collaborative,  network-enabled  operations  between  multiple  systems  are  becoming
the  rule  rather  than  the  exception.  The  CBO  (published  in,  ‘‘The  Army’s  Future

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

Combat System Program,’’ April 2006) has indicated that at least 34M lines of soft-
ware code, much of it for CPS, will be generated for Future Combat Systems—about
twice  current  estimates  for  the  Joint  Strike  Fighter.  Today’s  generation  of  fighters
(figure  below)  incorporate  many  cyber-physical  systems.  These  systems  operate  in
highly  dynamic  environments  with  real-time  mission  specific  behaviors.  This  im-
poses challenges on the cyber-physical systems in the areas of networking, informa-
tion management, verification, validation, and certification, to mention a few.

Future aerospace systems will require cyber-physical systems of even greater com-
plexity. Systems will operate with autonomy and will collaborate among themselves
to provide vast gains in operational effectiveness. Enabling capabilities in active re-
source  management,  dynamic  scheduling,  and  software  enabled  control  mode
changes  will  be  needed  to  support  these  behaviors.  Systems  of  this  sort  have  flown
today in research focused demonstrations. They will be the norm in the future.

Estimates on source lines of code for systems beyond the current generation of de-
veloping systems are several orders of magnitude higher—and will likely exceed one
billion lines of code.

Requirements for cyber-physical systems and software are far more stringent than
those for typical office automation applications. Our systems must support real-time
behavior. We require ultra-high reliability and many of our systems are safety crit-
ical and require certification by the FAA or equivalent military authority. While the
occasional  ‘‘Blue  Screen’’  may  be  painful  in  the  office  environment,  it  can  have  ex-
treme  consequences  in  the  air.  Many  of  our  military  systems  need  to  be  designed

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

to  support  coalition  operations  with  multi-level  security  requirements.  Our  systems
must  also  be  hardened  to  withstand  future  cyber  attacks  by  adversaries.  Because
of  these  unique  requirements  and  the  relatively  small  numbers  of  systems,  we  do
not  expect  a  large  investment  from  the  commercial  IT  sector  in  these  technologies.
In order to achieve these cross-cutting capabilities, we will need advances in tech-
nologies  such  as  model-based  development  tools,  methods,  and  validation  environ-
ments  to  build  systems  rapidly  and  affordably.  Moreover,  we  will  require  product-
focused  technologies  including  software  reuse,  architectures,  real-time  theory,  lan-
guages,  and  product  line  architectures  to  achieve  system  affordability  by  recouping
investment across multiple system developments.

We have achieved some measure of progress. Several years ago, Boeing developed
middleware-based product line architectures to support our military system develop-
ments.  Sizable  investments  were  made  in  new  CPS  architectures  and  infrastruc-
tures  (e.g.,  Bold  Stroke  and  the  FCS  System  of  Systems  Common  Operating  Envi-
ronment) and substantial gains in productivity were realized. The middleware-based
approach  is  critical  since  the  days  where  military  systems  lead  and  dominate  the
IT  industry  are  long  past.  Specifically,  CPS  architectures  like  Bold  Stroke  (illus-
trated  below)  were  developed  in  part  to  provide  layers  of  isolation  between  the  avi-
onics software for DOD systems like F/A–18 and F–15 from hardware and operating
systems from the commercial IT industry.

The challenges today are far greater than those faced in even the recent past and
continue  to  grow  as  individual  systems  evolve,  operate  with  greater  autonomy  and
intelligence,  and  operate  as  part  of  a  networked  system  of  system.  The  challenges
grow even larger with future generations of unmanned air systems operating in na-
tional air space.

What  is  the  way  ahead?  Efforts  to  date  have  largely  been  fragmented  across  the
industry  and  limited  by  internal  funding  constraints.  CPS  investments  cross  mul-
tiple technology domains and will require industry-level critical mass to achieve the
needed results.

We  need  a  national  strategy  in  which  long-term  CPS  technology  needs  are  ad-
dressed by combined government and corporate investment. Boeing, for its part, can
focus our long-term CPS investments on collaborative research in which we provide
challenge  problems  and  in-kind  participation  in  government-industry  research  con-
sortiums.  I’m  confident  our  industry  partners  are  willing  to  do  the  same.  We  also
need  to  develop  new  ways  to  facilitate  the  transition  of  research  products  back  to
industry  and  into  our  products.  This  point  is  critical  and  is  a  matter  of  national
competitiveness. The European Union’s (EU) Advanced Research and Technology for
Embedded Intelligence and Systems (ARTEMIS) program is funded by a public-pri-
vate  investment  (over  $7B  in  mid-2007  dollars)  and  is  pursuing  R&D  to  achieve
‘‘world  leadership  in  intelligent  electronic  systems’’  by  2016.  European  industry  is
fully  partnered  with  academia  in  ARTEMIS.  From  our  perspective,  partnership  be-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

tween  industry  and  academia  in  CPS  is  absolutely  essential  to  reap  the  benefits  of
this advanced research. This partnership needs to reach deeper than the rather ‘‘in-
direct’’ approach used for industry involvement today.

In summary, we support the proposed expansion of the NITRD program’s research
objectives to address cyber-physical systems and we look forward to the opportunity
to participate.

That concludes my testimony. I’d be pleased now to respond to your questions.

BIOGRAPHY FOR DON C. WINTER

Don has been employed at Boeing and its predecessor companies for 31 years. He
holds  BS  and  MS  degrees  in  Physics  from  the  University  of  Missouri  and  an  MBA
from Washington University. Don held a number of avionics design and systems en-
gineering assignments on the Tomahawk cruise missile program from 1977 to 1988.
He  joined  the  Mission  Planning  Division  of  McDonnell  Douglas  Missile  Systems
Company in 1988, serving in program management roles on the Tomahawk Mission
Planning  Upgrade  and  (UK)  Automated  Mission  Planning  Aid  (AMPA)  programs,
1988–91. In 1992 he was named Deputy Program Manager for the USAF Air Force
Mission  Support  System  (AFMSS).  In  1995,  he  joined  the  Production  Aircraft  Ad-
vanced  Design  organization  as  Manager—Mission  Systems,  and  founded  the  Com-
mon  OFP  initiative,  which  later  served  as  the  foundation  for  the  Bold  Stroke  ad-
vanced  avionics  program.  He  led  CRAD  programs  under  the  Phantom  Works  Open
Systems  Architecture  technology  thrust  from  1998  to  2001,  when  he  became  Direc-
tor  of  the  overall  thrust.  He  then  led  the  PW  Network  Centric  Operations  thrust,
focused on the development of key technologies and tools for network enabling Boe-
ing  systems  and  products,  from  its  inception  in  2003  through  mid-2005.  Don  then
assumed leadership of the Integrated Command and Control organization within the
C3ISR Solutions business segment of Boeing Integrated Defense Systems. In this ca-
pacity Don led the development and execution of C2 market shaping, product devel-
opment  and  business  pursuit  strategies.  Most  recently,  Don  returned  to  Phantom
Works  to  lead  the  Engineering  and  Information  Technology  organization,  a  team  of
1,000  engineers  and  scientists  performing  leading  edge  research  spanning  domains
ranging from aeronautics and propulsion to avionics, sensors and advanced informa-
tion  technology.  Don  has  authored  numerous  technical  publications  and  currently
serves  on  advisory  boards  at  the  University  of  Cambridge,  the  University  of  Cali-
fornia–Berkeley, Vanderbilt University and Washington University.

DISCUSSION

Chairman GORDON. Mr. Miller, as you know, the PCAST top rec-
ommendation  was  the  cyber-physical  security,  and  we  do  want  to
get more involved in that.

At this point we will open the first round of questions. The Chair
recognizes  himself  for  five  minutes.  What  I  would  like  to  do  is  I
have  a  couple  of  questions  just  to  put  to  the  panel  in  general,  and
the  first  is  the  PCAST  assessment  of  NITRD  program  indicates
that  it  should  rebalance  the  funding  portfolios  by  increasing  sup-
port  for  important  problems  that  require  large-scale,  longer-term
multi-disciplinary  R&D,  increasing  emphasis  on  innovation  and
therefore  high  risk  but  potentially  higher  payoff  expirations.  Do
you agree with this recommendation? If so, what should be done to
implement  support 
innovative  research
projects? Dr. Greer, why don’t we start with you?

large-scale 

for  such 

Dr.  GREER.  Thank  you,  Chairman.  I  think  we  would  agree  with
that  recommendation  of  the  PCAST  assessment  that  these  invest-
ments  in  high  risk  but  high  payoff  in  multi-disciplinary  under-
takings  are  important,  critical  in  the  current  IT  landscape.  As  I
said,  our  strategic  plan  focuses  on  identifying  challenges  that  can
only  be  approached  by  agencies  working  together  and  the  cor-
responding technical issues to achieve that.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

Chairman  GORDON.  And  can  you  do  that  on  existing  funding  or

does that require additional funding?

Dr.  GREER.  I  think  we  would  look  to  both  of  those  possibilities,
that  refocusing  some  existing  funding  on  these  shared  projects,
identifying  those  things  that  would  substantially  enable  an  agen-
cy’s  mission  if  it  could  be  accomplished.  Then  that  merits  some  fo-
cusing  of  funding.  There  may  be  other  opportunities  for  added
funding in that same category.

Chairman GORDON. Will you be identifying those areas of oppor-

tunities and funding?

Dr.  GREER.  Yes,  that  is  part  of  our  strategic  planning  process  to
look  for  what  are  the  categories  of  this  type,  the  multi-agency,
higher-level  challenges  that  could  be  taken  on  by  a  joint  effort
across agencies in which the missions of the individual agencies are
supported by this joint effort.

Chairman GORDON. Would anyone else like to comment on that?

Okay.

Dr. REED. Well, I should say I hope I agree with the commenda-
tion  in  this  case  since  I  helped  write  it.  Just  a  reminder  that  the
PCAST was not the first time that this observation has been made.
If  you  go  back  and  you  look  at  the  1990—report,  the  last  systemic
evaluation  of  the  program,  it  recommended  something  quite  simi-
lar,  something  that  was  called  out  as  expeditions  to  the—intended
to  be  large-scale  integrated  investments—technology  that  could
have a transformative effect. And I agree with Dr. Greer, it will be
quite a mix of targeted reallocation and most likely some additional
investment.

Chairman  GORDON.  Has  this  recommendation  been  made  before

or are they behind the curve on getting something done?

Dr.  REED.  There  were  responses  to  those  recommendations,  per-
haps  not  at  the  scale  that  the  original  recommended,  some  due  to
some  financial  constraints.  I  think  it  is  difficult  to  change  the  cul-
ture of investment because again, it is not just an agency response,
it is a community response to the changes that the Federal Govern-
ment  induces.  And  there  are  strong  incentives  among  the  commu-
nity  to  continue  in  many  cases  the  status  quo.  So  it  is  not  just  a
government  issue,  it  is  a  community  education  issue  about  the—
and the risk of——

Chairman  GORDON.  I  only  have  five  minutes  also,  so  let  me  get
to my second question. PCAST also recommended that NITRD Pro-
gram  provide  increased  support  for  research  on  software  but  does
not  cite  specific  research  needs  where  the  current  program  is  defi-
cient.  Software  is  a  perennial  area  of  weakness,  and  information
technology  and  an  area  in  which  NITRD  Program  currently  allo-
cates resources. What is missing is software research resources lim-
ited or idea limited? And what research is needed to make greater
progress  for  improving  the  capabilities  and  reliable  software.  And
I  think,  Dr.  Reed,  we  should  probably  start  with  you  on  that  one.
Dr.  REED.  I  think  it  is  a  question  of  scale,  and  to  hark  back  to
something  that  Mr.  Winters  said,  as  an  example,  cyber-physical
systems.  What  is  happening  is  our  software  systems  are  growing
exponentially in size and complexity but perhaps even more worri-
some  is  that  they  are  not  isolated.  They  can  control  our  physical
environment  in  all  kinds  of  day-to-day  ways,  from  national  infra-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

structure  to  our  personal  experiences.  And  the  search  portfolio,
back  to  the  previous  question,  I  think  the  challenge  is  to  look  in
at how we address software at large scale. There is lots of research
on the small-scale software issues but how to deal with large, com-
plex systems where a small group is unlikely to understand its be-
havior,  its  reliability,  and  its  dynamics.  There  are  some  deep  re-
search  issues  there.  Some  innovation  is  required.  There  are  ques-
tions frankly we don’t know the answers to. It is not even in some
cases clear how to approach solutions to the problems.

So  the  basic  research,  but  there  is  also  a  scale  issue  about  ap-
proaching  a  problem  that  is  challenging  at  the  moment  in  aca-
demics.

Chairman  GORDON.  If  I  can  ask,  and  I  will  try  to  be  quick  with
this,  this  is  the  situation  we  run  into  so  often  is  there  is  simply
not enough money being invested. Now, we can get into, you know,
what  are  best  parties,  that  sort  of  thing.  I  think  we  need  to  do  it
through  efficiencies  in  two  ways.  Certainly  the  interagency  is  an
excellent approach, and I compliment what you have done. The sec-
ond is whether or not these are appropriate areas for international
cooperation.  You  know,  what  is  our  parochial  interest  here  or  first
to  market  interest  versus  international  collaboration  in  terms  of
trying  to  bring  some  economy  to  the  research?  Would  you  all  give
me some quick thoughts on that?

Mr.  WINTER.  I  will  give  a  couple  of  thoughts.  I  think  that  we
have examples already of international cooperation in our business
in  areas  considered  to  be  infrastructure  issues  versus,  you  know,
areas  of  proprietary  or  competitive  advantage.  We  are  not  in  the
software business or the IT business. Fundamentally, we are in the
system  business,  the  aerospace  system  business.  And  we  believe
areas  such  as  cyber-physical  system,  infrastructure  investment,  is
something  we  are  willing  to  do  in  a  collaborative  basis  with  our
competitors, with academia, and with international——

Chairman GORDON. Well, let me ask you a quick question again.
Is there any existing vehicle for that type of collaboration now, any
multinational agency or anything that you know of? Dr. Greer.

Dr.  GREER.  This  is  an  important  question.  There  are  areas  of
NIT that are inherently international. The Internet itself is global.
Cyber  security  is  a  global  issue.  In  each  of  those  areas,  an  area  of
large-scale networking, for example, there are a series of organiza-
tions that manage the standards development that manage the net-
work operation and so on. So in each of those separate areas, there
are  international  organizations.  I  think  the  challenge  is  in  coordi-
nating  across  those  international  bodies,  particularly  in  the  area
that  Dr.  Reed  has  described,  fundamental  research,  the  software
science, the theory of mathematics.

Chairman GORDON. My time is up, but I would like for you if you
have an opinion to respond to us again in this aspect of limited re-
sources  but  not  limited  needs,  where  you  think  there  might  be
areas  for  international  cooperation,  you  know,  where  they  are  al-
ready  going  on,  those  other  agencies,  and  should  there  be,  you
know,  whatever  coordinated  body.  In  other  words,  how  can  we  get
better bang for our buck here without harming ourselves in a first
to market or proprietary way.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

Thank  you,  and  excuse  me,  Mr.  Hall,  for  taking  a  little  time

there. You are certainly recognized.

Mr.  HALL.  You  are  the  Chairman.  Mr.  Winter,  you  mentioned
ARTEMIS.  You  mentioned  the  need  for  the  United  States  to  have
something  similar  to  the  EU  public/private  partnership,  research,
technology,  and  so  on  and  so  forth  called  ARTEMIS.  Although
termed an EU program, isn’t it true that industry contributes more
than  half  of  the  funding  for  this  and  was  responsible  for  the  total
start-up and operational costs of ARTEMIS? Is that true?

Mr.  WINTER.  Yes,  this  is  under  the  European  Framework  Pro-
gram which is a model for collaborative government, private-sector
investment.

Mr.  HALL.  Do  you  think  the  U.S.  industry  would  commit  to  the

Mr. WINTER. Yes, I do.
Mr. HALL. Would Boeing?
Mr. WINTER. Yes.
Mr. HALL. Dr. Reed, would Microsoft?
Dr. REED. Microsoft already is in many areas, so I have no doubt

Mr.  HALL.  You  think  our  own  industry  is  up  to  funding  at  a

about that.

greater extent?

same level?

ing.

Mr.  WINTER.  I  think  we  are  already  doing  it  to  a  large  degree
and it is a matter of coordination, being provided by nationally led
activity,  supplemented  by  some  public  funding  for  the  academic
sector. I think it is more of a matter of channeling investments we
are already making.

Chairman GORDON. Mr. Hall, you raised a very good point. Could
you  also  respond  to  the  Committee  on  how  we  could  do  that,  your
suggestions in that area? I think Mr. Hall raises a very good point.
Thank you.

Mr. HALL. Do we await that? Oh, no, no.
Chairman  GORDON.  No  response.  They  will  get  it  to  us  in  writ-

Mr.  HALL.  All  right.  Okay.  I  think  my  time  is  up.  I  yield  back.
Chairman GORDON. Mr. McNerney is recognized for five minutes.
Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  First  of  all,  I  want
to remark on a comment Dr. Stewart made. You recommended con-
sistent federal funding, and I just want to say that I feel your pain
on  this.  I  spent  my  career  in  the  renewable  energy  business,  and
the  production  tax  credits  came  and  they  went  and  the  industry
suffered  immensely  from  those  cycles.  And  I  am  sure  that  federal
funding on a consistent basis would be better than just about any-
thing  else.  But  then  I  also  echo  the  Chairman’s  words  on  this,  we
can authorize all we want in this committee. If there is not enough
money in the kitty, it is not going to happen. And so Dr. Reed men-
tioned that 86 percent of the funding is coming from one single fed-
eral  agency,  and  that  has  its  advantages  because  it  allows  better
coordination  but  it  has  a  disadvantage.  I  didn’t  quite  understand
what the disadvantages were if you would elaborate on that a little
bit, Dr. Reed?

Dr. REED. Certainly. Historically as I said, the diversity of agen-
cies  had  different  approaches,  and  by  nature  of  the  agencies  and
because  they  have  differing  missions  and  often  there  is  a  pipeline

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

of technology process and research that leads to its impact in com-
mercial  industries.  If  you  look,  for  example,  at  some  of  the  major
technologies that we take for granted now, there is about a 20-year
pipeline  from  basic  research  until  they  become  billion  dollar  or
more industries. But in the federal context, that often meant a cu-
riosity driven, single investigator research cannot get by, research-
ers are typically academia funded by the National Science Founda-
tion. DARPA on the other hand tended to focus on much more goal-
directed  outcomes,  larger  scale  projects,  building  advanced  proto-
types in collaboration with industry. But it built on ideas that had
often  been  explored  years  before  by  researchers  funded  by  the  Na-
tional Science Foundation. So that interplay of agencies meant that
there  were  different  ideas  that  could  be  picked  up  and  explored
with different mechanisms. It goes back to the interagency collabo-
ration,  coordination  mechanism,  how  that  diversity  created  a  vari-
ety  of  approaches  to  innovation.  And  what  has  happened  is  we
have lost some of that diversity. It certainly in the academic side—
on that as opposed to broadly.

And  so  we  only  have  the  first  order  a  single  approach  in  aca-

demic circles—that has been largely a single faculty member.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  You  were  talking  about  sort  of  an  agenda.  If  it
is  a  single  agency,  it  tends  to  be  agenda  driven  rather  than  giving
a diverse set of rules?

Dr.  REED.  Right.  You  would  like  multiple  goals,  multiple  agen-
das,  multiple  kinds  of  approaches  to  select  projects  for  funding  be-
cause that leads to different mixes of people, different kinds of out-
comes, and we have moved much more toward a single kind of out-
come model where it had been a much more diverse model.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  It  seems  to  me  that  if  you  have  a  well-run  pro-
gram  within  the  NSF,  it  would  accomplish  those  objectives  rather
than to try and coordinate different agencies.

Dr.  REED.  It’s  a  balancing  act  for  sure,  and  I  am  sure  Dr.  Greer
can  speak  to  that  as  well  who  balances  that  process.  But  each
agency  has  a  different  culture,  and  its  culture  makes  it  easier  or
more  difficult  for  it  to  do  certain  things.  Some  things  are  much
easier to do in a Defense Department model, some things are much
easier  to  do  in  a  NSF-style  model.  And  it  is  that  culture  that  the
agencies struggle with when we try to foster interagency collabora-
tion  and  agency  agendas  versus  the  broader  sort  of  integrated
agency and defense IT research.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Okay.  Thank  you.  Mr.  Winter,  I  am  interested
in  your  discussion  of  cyber-physical  systems.  Could  you  elaborate
a little bit on the current threat? What does that look like, how im-
mediate  is  it,  do  we  have  tools  to  move  forward  aggressively  on
that?

Mr. WINTER. You are referring specifically to cyber attack on——
Mr. MCNERNEY. Physical cyber attack, yes.
Mr.  WINTER.  Cyber-physical  systems  are  what  we  used  to  call
embedded systems, traditionally very isolated and stand-alone enti-
ties. Apply control computer in an aircraft, for example, wasn’t sub-
ject to any external influence or attack. As these systems evolve to
a  more  collaborative  model  where  they  are  not  only  doing  hard
real-time business on board the platform but are also participating
as  clients  in  a  network,  they  become  vulnerable  to  cyber  attack,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

tampering.  The  science  for  cyber  security  for  cyber-physical  sys-
tems  is  really  in  its  infancy.  Because  the  systems  have  only  re-
cently been sort of opened up and made accessible because of their
need  to  again  service  clients  on  network,  we  are  just  in  the  early
days of beginning to really take on the cyber attack threat for these
kinds of systems.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  Well,  I  guess  my  time  is  expired,  so  I  will  yield

Chairman  GORDON.  The  gentleman’s  time  has  expired,  and  Ms.

back.

Edwards is recognized.

Ms.  EDWARDS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Just  one  question.  I
mean,  each  of  you  raised  the  issue  of  technical  capacity,  training,
where  are  the  professionals  for  the  future,  and  going  to  this  ques-
tion  around  cyber  security,  I  read  an  article  yesterday  about  the
use of virtualization, particularly in the retail industry. And I won-
der  what  the  impact  is,  specifically  as  you  just  mentioned,  Mr.
Winter, of the idea of virtualization in these systems where you are
trying  to  achieve  efficiency  and,  you  know,  monitor  operations  but
how vulnerable does that leave us to cyber attacks and what capac-
ity  do  we  have  to  address  emerging  issues  in  technology?  It  just
seems  like  there  is  one  every  day  around  security.  What  is  the  ca-
pacity  we  have  right  now  to  address  those  emerging  issues  given
the lack of capacity in the industry and in the federal sector?

Mr. WINTER. I think we do have a capacity issue. Information as-
surance specialist is one of the most sought-after and rare commod-
ities  from  a  field  personnel  standpoint  in  our  industry.  We  have  a
few,  and  we  bend  over  backwards  to  keep  them  with  us.  It  is  a
small  and  slowly  growing  pool  of  specialists,  and  I  think  the  lack
of  collective  training  and  a  qualified  workforce  in  that  area  is  a
real threat to our business. And to many other business, the finan-
cial sector, other aspects of our national IT infrastructure.

Ms. EDWARDS. Dr. Reed, do you have a——
Dr. REED. Oh, I have to agree with Mr. Winter. There is a short-
age  of  talent  in  this  area,  and  as  I  said,  because  so  many  of  our
everyday  objects  now  include  embedded  intelligence  and  network
connections,  there  are  substantial  challenges  here.  Microsoft,  for
example, has made trusted computing a major initiative, to look at
how  to  make  software  more  robust  because  as  you  have  observed
rightly,  it  is  subject  to  a  wide  range  of  attacks  every  day.  Part  of
this  is  an  inevitable  consequence  that  software  permeates  almost
everything, but it is also an absolute hard fact of the original ques-
tion  that  Representative  Gordon  asked  about  the  challenges  we
face in building large complex infrastructure and the underlying re-
search  issues  behind  those.  This  is  one  example  of  the  manifesta-
tion of that struggle to build systems from first principles that are
reliable and secure, and the struggle is to retrofit security systems
as  we  discover  vulnerability.  But  there  are  major  research  issues
here, workforce issues, and other venues people have testified, and
there  are  new  programs  to  advance  the  state  of  cyber  security  re-
search under way now but there is a lot of work to do without that.
Ms.  EDWARDS.  And  so  then  to  each  of  you,  I  mean,  how  do  you
then  prioritize  where  the  allocation  needs  to  go  for  research  and
development, what areas, because it seems very expansive and you

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

know,  it  is  clear  from  your  earlier  testimony,  obviously  we  haven’t
been able to fund everything and we won’t.

Dr.  STEWART.  Funding  everything  is  clearly  beyond  reason,  but
I do think it is important to break up the funding portfolio and look
at  it  in  terms  of  a  variety  of  topics.  Cyber-physical  systems,  basic
research and networking, research networks in support of research
in other areas cyber infrastructure, production cyber infrastructure
delivered  today,  and  the  development  of  new  cyber  infrastructure
for  tomorrow.  And  the  threads  of  those  research  and  development
activities  need  to  go  on  continually  so  that  the  expertise  that  we
build up which is so precious gets retained in these programs, and
then  while  building  the  better  workforce  is,  you  know,  a  20-year
process,  from  a  10-year-old  to  a  30-year-old  seasoned  professional,
looking at the long range and really focusing on, okay, we recognize
that  today  there  shortages  of  workforces.  There  are  short-term
measures that can be put into place that will aid that in the short
run,  but  really  fundamental  efforts  as  Dr.  Reed  has  already  men-
tioned have to be put into encouraging young people in the United
States to pursue careers in networking information technology.

Ms. EDWARDS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman  GORDON.  I  thank  you  for  your  value  added,  Ms.  Ed-

wards, you bring to our committee.

Mr. Hill, you are recognized for five minutes.
Mr.  HILL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  I  want  to  thank  the
panel members for being here this morning, in particular Dr. Stew-
art,  who  is  not  only  chairman  of  CASC  but  is  also  the  Associate
Dean at the greatest university in the history of the world, Indiana
University.  Dr.  Stewart,  it  is  great  to  have  you  hear  today.  Dr.
Stewart,  you  mentioned  in  your  testimony  the  importance  of  con-
sistency,  and  I  want  to  return  to  that  issue.  Are  you  suggesting
that there are inconsistencies in funding that are occurring?

Dr.  STEWART.  I  think  if  you  look  back  at  the  past  several  years
of funding in NITRD as implemented by the participating agencies,
there  have  been  recognitions  of  areas  where  additional  funding  is
needed, and funding has been propped up in one area at sometimes
the  expense  of  other  areas;  and  that  oscillation  in  funding  really
creates  difficulty  in  maintaining  the  expertise  base  among  people
who really desire to pursue a career in publicly funded networking
information  technology  research.  If  a  program  is  eliminated  or
funding  is  temporarily  suspended  and  a  person  leaves  publicly
funded, publicly oriented network information technology research,
they are not likely to come back. That expertise is lost, and exper-
tise  as  we  have  heard  from  I  believe  all  four  of  us  this  morning  is
tremendously valuable.

Mr. HILL. And this is happening?
Dr. STEWART. This has happened. Yes. Very definitely.
Mr.  HILL.  Okay.  Switching  gears  then,  one  recommendation  you
make is to increase the coordination between federal agencies. How
would  you  suggest  that  we  do  this  or  how  would  you  suggest  this
be done?

Dr. STEWART. Well, I think the key point is to add to the coordi-
nation between federal agencies and add to that more coordination
colleges  and  universities,  State  investments  and  regional  invest-
ments,  and  the  Coalition  for  Academic  and  Scientific  Computation

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

and the Educause Campus Cyberinfrastructure Working Group just
held  a  workshop  last  week  in  Indianapolis  to  generate  new  ideas
specifically  on  this  topic.  As  Dr.  Reed  said,  a  lot  of  these  issues
have to do with the culture of academia, and I think one of the key
points  is  to  make  recommendations  both  to  academia  and  State-
funded  R&D  activities  that  enable  them  to  better  collaborate  with
federally  led  initiatives  and  to  add  to  the  federally  led  initiative
ways  that  will  allow  that  collaboration  to  make  it  more  effective.
Mr. HILL. Well, could the NITRD planning in coordination mech-

anism be used as a forum for this broader level of coordination?

Dr.  STEWART.  I  do  indeed.  I  think  that  is  actually  the  best  way

to begin that.

Mr. HILL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, I yield back.
Chairman  GORDON.  Well,  before  we  thank  our  witnesses,  I  just
thought  I  would  check  and  see  if  anyone  wants  to  have  an  alter-
native  opinion  as  to  the  world’s  greatest  ever  colossal  university.
Dr. Baird.

Mr.  BAIRD.  I  would  just  point  out  I  am  proud  to  have  two  rep-
resentatives  from  the  great  State  of  Washington  here  and  let  that
speak for itself.

Chairman  GORDON.  Again,  I  want  to  thank  our  witnesses.  We
are trying to build a base of information. You have given us a good
place  to  move  forward.  We  would  hope  that  you  would  respond  to
those  questions  that  we  ask  as  well  as  anything  else.  As  we  go
through  this  process,  you  know,  there  are  a  few  of  us  here  but
there  are  hundreds  of  thousands,  if  not—we  normally  have  a  cou-
ple  of  million  that  watch  our  webcast,  so  there  are  lots  of  others
that are out there, and we want to welcome any suggestions to this
very important concern. And this hearing is adjourned.

[Whereupon, at 10:56 a.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(57)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Christopher  L.  Greer,  Director,  National  Coordination  Office  for  Net-
working and Information Technology Research and Development (NCO/NITRD)

Questions submitted by Chairman Bart Gordon
Q1. Are there areas of IT research that are good candidates for international cooper-
ative efforts that would leverage U.S. investments but would not otherwise harm
U.S. competitive advantages, such as being first to market for a new technology?
What  mechanisms  are  available,  or  could  be  instituted,  to  facilitate  such  inter-
national cooperative research?

A1. Because  we  live  in  a  global  digital  society  there  are  international  implications
across  all  areas  of  networking  and  information  technologies  (NIT).  However,  inter-
national cooperation is exceptionally important in four NIT areas.
1) Long-term data preservation and access/sharing

This  is  a  vital  area  for  international  cooperation,  both  because  21st  century
science is global and data-driven, and because many of our society’s challenges (e.g.,
energy and other natural resources, climate change, biodiversity, and human health
in  a  globally-connected  world)  require  coordinated  international  data  sharing  and
analysis.

Current NITRD examples:

a) DOE/SC  and  NSF  support  international  high-energy  physics  research,
including  analysis  of  gigabytes-per-second  data  from  the  Large  Hadron
Collider  (LHC)  located  at  the  CERN  site  near  Geneva.  This  includes
high-capacity optical network links to two tiers of U.S. analysis sites and
development  by  DOE/SC  of  new  and  extended  protocols  enabling  mas-
sive data throughputs across broadband network links.

b) The  NSF-supported  Very  Long  Baseline  Array  (VLBA)  of  telescopes  co-
operates with the European VLB Network to create a global Internet tel-
escope  with  unprecedented  resolution  for  distributed  near-real-time  ob-
servation and data gathering.

Possible NITRD cooperative partner on data issues:

The  mission  of  the  International  Council  for  Science  (ICSU)  Committee  on
Data for Science and Technology (CODATA) is ‘‘to promote, throughout the
world, the evaluation, compilation and dissemination of data for science and
technology  and  to  foster  international  collaboration  in  this  field.’’  The  U.S.
National Committee for CODATA links the scientific and technical commu-
nity  in  the  United  States  and  the  international  CODATA  on  data  issues
and operates within the National Research Council’s Board on International
Scientific  Organizations.  I  have  met  several  times  with  USNC  CODATA  to
share  plans  and  information  and  look  to  strengthening  that  link  as  a  con-
duit for international partnerships in the data arena.

2) Advanced networking

International  networking  cooperation  is  a  prerequisite  for  seamless  global  high-
speed  communications,  including  scientific  data  sharing.  The  NITRD  agencies  thus
have longstanding cooperative relationships with international networking organiza-
tions  and  the  scientific  networks  of  other  countries,  and  continue  to  expand  these
partnerships.

Current NITRD examples:

a) The September 28–30, 2008 Networking Research Challenges Workshop
(with  international  participants  from  the  Netherlands,  Canada,  Japan,
South  Korea,  and  China),  will  be  held  in  conjunction  with  a  meeting  of
the Global Lambda Infrastructure Federation (GLIF), which coordinates
international  cooperation  and  transparency  among  the  world’s  optical
networks.  One  of  the  key  goals  of  this  workshop  is  to  explore  the  inter-
national  implications  of  the  recently-developed  Federal  Plan  for  Ad-
vanced Networking (see www.nitrd.gov/ITFAN-preprint-061108.pdf).

b) NSF’s International Research Network Connections (IRNC) program, in-

cludes

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

a) The  TransPacific  Network  (TransPac)  providing  connectivity  among

Asia, Europe, and the U.S.;

b) PerfSonar,  a  global  collaboration  among  national  research  and  edu-
cation  networks  in  the  U.S.,  Europe,  Latin  America,  and  Asia  that
is  developing  a  distributed  network  measurement  framework  to  im-
prove end-to-end performance for researchers; and

c) the Pakistan-U.S. Research & Education (R&E) Network connection,
online as of August 15, which connects Pakistan’s scientific research
and  education  community  for  the  first  time  to  the  U.S.  and  global
R&E  networking  fabric  (also  supported  by  the  European  Union’s
TEIN2 project).

c) NSF,  through  its  Network  Science  and  Engineering  program,  has  been
working with the U.S. academic and industrial communities to create op-
portunities  for  possible  federation  of  experimental  network  infrastruc-
ture, participating in the National Institute of Information and Commu-
nications  Technology  (NICT)  JGN2  and  AKARI  (Japan’s  new  generation
network  testbed)  Symposium  in  Tokyo  in  January  2008  and  the  Future
of  the  Internet  Conference  in  Slovenia  in  March  2008.  NSF  staff  will
participate in the launch of the EC’s Future Internet Research and Edu-
cation  (FIRE)  projects  in  Paris  in  September  2008.  A  joint  Japan-U.S.
workshop is planned for October 2008.

d) LSN’s  Joint  Engineering  Team  (JET)  provides  a  forum  for  the  develop-
ment of operational policies and practices, including security policies and
responding  to  security  incidents,  on  the  international  science  networks.
e) New  techniques  for  inter-domain  signaling  developed  under  the  NSF-
supported  DRAGON  project  are  enabling  a  new  networking  paradigm—
hybrid  networking—that  combines  shared  IP  services  with  dedicated
high-capacity capabilities for data-intensive scientific research. The U.S.
academic  community’s  Internet2  consortium  is  deploying  the  Dynamic
Circuit Networking (DCN) service and ensuring international inter-oper-
ability through active collaboration with a peer network in Europe called
GEANT.

f) To harmonize deployment of Internet Protocol version 6 (IPv6) in Federal
networks  with  existing  international  programs,  specifically  the  IPv6
Ready Logo program, NIST has signed Memoranda of Understanding for
cooperative  development  of  test  materials  with  members  of  the  IPv6
Forum.  Forum  members  include:  Yokogawa  Electric  Corporation  of
Japan,  NTT  Corporation  of  Japan,  NTT  Advanced  Technology  Corpora-
tion  of  Japan,  Yaskawa  Information  Systems  Corporation  of  Japan,
Institut  National  de  Recherche  en  Informatique  et  en  Automatique
(INRIA)  and  the  University  of  Rennes  in  France,  as  well  as  the  Inter-
operability Laboratory of New Hampshire.

These  examples  illustrate  how  individual  NITRD  networking  activities  are  di-
rectly  linked  to  the  appropriate  international  counterparts.  Through  its  strategic
planning  activities,  the  NITRD  program  will  explore  whether  other  organizations,
such  as  the  Organization  for  Economic  Cooperation  and  Development  (OECD)
through  its  information  and  communication  technologies  activities,  can  provide
mechanisms for addressing the broader international networking issues.
3) Software engineering

Software  is  pervasive  in  our  digital  world,  underlying  the  operation  of  planes,
ships,  factories,  and  medical  devices;  and  controlling  critical  infrastructure  such  as
power  grids  and  banking  and  financial  systems.  As  these  critical  software  applica-
tions  become  increasingly  complex,  the  need  for  robust  software  science—theory,
concepts,  and  methodology  for  creating,  analyzing,  and  verifying  software—has  be-
come a global challenge.

Current NITRD example:

The  Verified  Software  Initiative  (VSI),  a  long-term  cooperative,  inter-
national  project  directed  at  the  scientific  challenges  of  large-scale  software
verification.  The  VSI  resulted  from  the  first  Verified  Software:  Theories,
Tools,  Experiments  Conference  (VSTTE)  held  in  2005  in  Zurich  as  a  re-
sponse  to  Sir  Tony  Hoare’s  (Microsoft  Research  U.K.)  Grand  Challenge  on
the  ‘‘verifying  compiler,’’  a  vision  of  software  produced  with  machine-
verified  guarantees  of  adherence  to  specified  behavior.  International  work-
ing groups are in place and much work has been done, resulting in multiple

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

technologies  now  available  to  address  the  challenge.  The  second  VSTTE
conference  will  be  held  in  Toronto  in  October  2008;  agencies  in  NITRD’s
High Confidence Software and Systems (HCSS) coordinating group—includ-
ing NASA, ONR, NSA, and NSF—are co-sponsors of the VSTTE conferences
and/or  the  grand  challenge  technical  activities,  such  as  the  Verification
Grand  Challenge.  These  activities  also  draw  participants  from  Australia,
Belgium, China, Denmark, France, Germany, India, Israel, Japan, Switzer-
land, and the United Kingdom.

This example illustrates how international cooperation can accelerate progress on

some of the most difficult, and most pressing, NIT challenges of our time.
4) Embedded and cyber-physical systems

A  modern  automobile  is  an  integrated  cyber  and  physical  system,  relying  on  em-
bedded IT to control engine functions, anti-lock braking, transmission, emissions re-
duction, vehicle stability, and entertainment and climate control systems. Embedded
NIT  systems  in  planes,  trains,  ships,  traffic  control  systems,  and  emergency  re-
sponse  networks  are  an  essential  part  of  our  everyday  experience.  Ensuring  that
these cyber-physical systems, are safe, effective, predictable, and reliable is another
key global challenge.

Current NITRD example:

The  High  Confidence  Software  and  Systems  (HCSS)  Coordinating  Group
within  the  NITRD  Program  has  a  strong  focus  on  cyber-physical  systems.
Recent  workshops  sponsored  by  HCSS  agencies  in  this  area  include  high-
confidence  medical  devices  and  systems  and  automotive  safety.  The  HCSS
group is also active in the international arena, participating in events such
as  the  Cyber-Physical  Systems  (CPS)  Week  at  the  annual  multi-conference
(Real-Time  and  Embedded  Technology  and  Applications  Symposium
[RTAS], International Conference on Information Processing in Sensor Net-
working  [IPSN],  and  International  Conference  on  Hybrid  Systems  [HSCC])
jointly  sponsored  by  IEEE  and  the  Association  for  Computing  Machinery
(ACM)  and  the  upcoming  Embedded  Systems  Week  (International  Con-
ference  on  Embedded  [EMSOFT],  International  Conference  on  Compilers,
Architecture,  and  Synthesis  for  Embedded  Systems  [CASES],  and  Inter-
national Conference on Hardware/Software Co-design and System Synthesis
[CODES+ISSS])  jointly  sponsored  by  the  IEEE,  ACM,  and  the  Council  on
Electronic Design Automation. In the past month, a jointly-sponsored U.S./
Japan  workshop  focused  on  human-robot  interactions,  emergency  robotics,
and  medical  robotics  generated  considerable  enthusiasm  for  the  potential
for collaboration among investigators.

In summary, the HCSS group is developing both a national and international co-

ordination effort in the area of cyber-physical systems.
Q2. Do  you  have  suggestions  for  how  the  U.S.  could  institute  a  public-private  re-
search  partnership  to  advance  the  capabilities  of  cyber-physical  systems  analo-
gous  to  the  EU’s  ARTEMIS  initiative?  Could  such  an  undertaking  be  planned
and carried out under the NITRD program?

A2. Certain  elements  of  the  ARTEMIS  model  are  uniquely  shaped  by  its  European
Union context. A model launched in the U.S. is SEMATECH (SEmiconductor MAnu-
facturing  TECHnology).  This  broad  industry  consortium,  which  celebrated  its  20th
anniversary in 2007, began with close partnerships with the Sandia and Oak Ridge
national  laboratories.  It  is  credited  with  restoring  U.S.  leadership  in  the  industry.
Thus,  public-private  partnerships  can  have  a  deep  and  lasting  impact  on  the  NIT
landscape. The following examples, including one from outside the NITRD Program,
may suggest some possible starting points for new, partnered initiatives.

Current NITRD examples:

a) In  addition  to  federal  agency  networking  organizations,  the  NITRD/
LSN’s  Joint  Engineering  Team 
includes  Internet2  and  National
LambdaRail  (NLR)  (both  consortia  of  university  network  organizations),
along with commercial entities such as Cisco, Juniper, and Sun.

b) LSN’s Middleware And Grid Infrastructure Coordination (MAGIC) Team
includes representation among public and private science networking or-
ganizations  to  provide  inter-operability  among  grid  infrastructures
(Open Science Grid, Open Grid Forum), regional and local grid organiza-
tions,  university  grid  capabilities  through  Educause,  and  commercial-
sector participants such as Microsoft, IBM, and HP.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

c) NSF’s  Industry  &  University  Cooperative  Research  Program  (I/UCRC)
fosters  partnerships  between  academic  institutions,  government  agen-
cies,  national  laboratories,  and  industry,  including  IT-related  research
centers reported in the NITRD crosscut. (For a complete list, see (http:/
/www.nsf.gov/eng/iip/iucrc/).  NSF’s  Cluster  Exploratory  (CluE)  initia-
tive  has  launched  two  industry-academia-government  partnerships—one
involving  IBM  and  Google,  the  other  HP,  Intel,  and  Yahoo!—to  provide
researchers access to cluster computing resources.

d) Since  2005,  NITRD’s  HCSS  agencies  have  been  sponsoring  a  national
workshop series on key domains for cyber-physical systems (e.g., medical
systems  and  devices,  aerospace  and  transportation,  critical-infrastruc-
ture and industrial-process control systems). This series is expressly de-
signed  to  bring  together  public-  and  private-sector  domain  experts,  re-
searchers, developers, vendors, and users to share their perspectives and
forge  a  common  understanding  on  research  and  user  needs  in  these  vi-
tally  important  technologies.  These  emerging  communities  of  interest
could  possibly  serve  as  a  basis  for  a  more  formal  partnership  activity.

Related non-NITRD example:

In  2005,  the  Department  of  Energy,  in  collaboration  with  the  Department
of  Homeland  Security  and  Natural  Resources  Canada,  partnered  with  in-
dustry  leaders  in  the  electric,  oil,  and  natural  gas  sectors  to  design  a  uni-
fied  framework  to  guide  control-system  cyber  security  R&D  efforts  and  in-
vestment. The resulting 10-year Roadmap to Secure Control Systems in the
Energy  Sector  was  published  in  January  2006.  The  newly  formed  Energy
Sector  Control  Systems  Working  Group  composed  of  public  and  private  en-
ergy-sector leaders, has been active in Roadmap implementation.

The SEMATECH example illustrates how an initial public-private partnership fo-
cused on a critical NIT challenge can produce a successful outcome. One of the larg-
est  technical  challenges  in  computing  currently  is  how  to  design  software  that  can
effectively use multicore systems. The PCAST cited the emergence of multicore proc-
essors in its rationale for recommending that: ‘‘the NITRD Subcommittee should fa-
cilitate  efforts  by  leaders  from  academia,  industry,  and  government  to  identify  the
critical issues in software design and development and help guide planning on soft-
ware R&D.’’

NITRD  agencies  report  the  following  recent  initiatives  in  this  area:  Intel  has
partnered  with  academia  to  open  two  new  scalable  software  research  centers;  DOD
and  DOE/SC  have  partnered  with  Goodyear  and  Caterpillar  to  develop  a  new  set
of  geometry  and  messing  tools—the  foundation  components  needed  to  support  fast
problem  solving  on  multiple  cores;  and  the  Council  on  Competitiveness  is  working
with industry and NITRD agencies to organize a consortium for development of scal-
able  engineering  applications.  Scalable  software  may  be  an  area  in  which  a  signifi-
cant level of shared public-private investment could spearhead technical innovation
that would benefit the U.S. economy as a whole.
Q3. The  COMPETES  Act  requires  the  NITRD  program  to  develop  and  maintain  a
research,  development  and  deployment  roadmap  for  high-end  computing  sys-
tems.  What  steps  are  being  taken  and  what  is  the  timing  for  implementing  this
requirement?

A3. The  NITRD  Program  is  currently  in  the  fourth  year  of  the  five-year  plan  set
forth in the May 2004 Federal Plan for High-End Computing developed by an inter-
agency  task  force  at  the  request  of  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy.  Ac-
complishments  to  date  achieved  by  the  NITRD  agencies  as  called  for  in  that  Plan
include:  development  of  leadership-class  capability  HEC  systems;  making  cycles  on
those  systems  available  to  the  broader  private-sector  research  community  for  cut-
ting-edge  computational  R&D  projects;  revitalization  of  R&D  in  HEC  systems  soft-
ware through the HEC–University Research Activity HEC–URA); and collaboration
on  methods  to  streamline  federal  procurements  and  develop  system  bench-marking
and evaluation tools that specifically address federal requirements.

Under the NITRD strategic planning process, all of the Program’s research areas
including HEC will develop new research plans and technical roadmaps coordinated
with the overall vision laid out in the NITRD Strategic Plan. The timeline for these
activities is presented in Appendix 3 of my written testimony.
Q4. One  of  PCAST’s  recommendations  is  for  the  NITRD  National  Coordination  Of-
fice (NCO) to be more proactive in communicating with outside groups. Was this
a  fair  criticism  of  the  NCO  and  do  you  intend  to  make  any  changes  related  to
the recommendation?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

A4. We  do  not  view  the  PCAST’s  recommendation  as  a  criticism.  It  acknowledges
the reality that the NCO must keep evolving in tandem with the evolution and mat-
uration  of  the  NITRD  enterprise  as  a  whole;  PCAST  has  provided  an  opportunity
for us to accelerate our efforts in a direction we were already headed. I’ve mentioned
NCO-supported  outreach  efforts  through  the  LSN  teams  and  the  HCSS  workshop
series. Another strong example is the monthly Expedition Workshop series co-spon-
sored  by  NITRD’s  SEW  Coordinating  Group.  These  workshops  supported  by  NCO
draw upwards of 100 participants spanning government, academia, and industry in
an ongoing dialogue about ways to harness emerging technologies to improve public
and private services for citizens. It is notable, for example, that the workshops have
spawned more than a dozen professional Communities of Practice across the Federal
Government, several of which have developed data standards adopted by the Office
of  Management  and  Budget  under  the  Federal  Enterprise  Architecture.  An  auto-
mated  emergency  alert  technology  incubated  in  the  workshops  won  OMB’s  Federal
Innovation of the Year award.

The  R&D  coordination  responsibility  assigned  to  NITRD  under  the  Comprehen-
sive  National  Cybersecurity  Initiative  (CNCI)  has  at  its  core  outreach  to  and  close
partnerships  with  the  private  sector.  To  accelerate  the  advance  of  new  cyber  secu-
rity  technologies  toward  commercial  implementation,  as  called  for  under  CNCI,  the
NCO  must  work  aggressively  to  help  agencies  forge  innovative  working  relation-
ships with private-sector researchers, developers, vendors, and technology users. We
have  already  taken  key  outreach  steps,  including  having  NCO  staff  schedule  meet-
ings with industry officials during office travel, and contacting industry representa-
tives  to  participate  in  forthcoming  high-level  brainstorming  sessions  with  federal
cyber security managers.

It  is  my  expectation  that  the  NITRD  Program’s  strategic  planning  process  itself
will  identify  additional  opportunities  for  private-sector  outreach.  Several  outreach
efforts—a request for public inputs, a web site for public discussion of these inputs,
and a national workshop—are already incorporated into our activities to develop the
Strategic  Plan  for  NITRD.  In  addition,  I  anticipate  that  the  parallel  strategic  plan
we  will  develop  for  the  NCO,  as  called  for  by  the  PCAST,  will  specifically  address
new forms of NCO outreach activity in support of the NITRD Strategic Plan.
Q5. Dr.  Stewart  described  examples  of  collaborative  distance  education  to  provide
computer  science  related  courses  to  students  at  institutions  that  may  not  have
strong programs in this field as one way to attract more students to information
technology  careers.  He  suggests  increased  support  for  such  programs  could  be
particularly valuable in increasing the number of information technology profes-
sionals  from  under-represented  groups.  To  what  extent  are  such  collaborative
distance education programs now supported under the NITRD program, and are
there any impediments to increased funding for such activities?

A5. While  broad  implementation  of  education  delivery  systems  lies  outside  the
NITRD Program’s core mission, the R&D activities under the program have resulted
in many of the technologies and resources that enable distance-education, supported
research  in  best  practices  and  approaches,  and  examined  the  social  and  behavioral
implications  of  remote  learning  and  virtual  interaction.  The  NITRD  Program  and
its  predecessors  have  been  the  vanguard  of  the  technological  revolution  that  made
distance  learning  possible  and  that  continues  to  enrich  its  capabilities.  The  NITRD
agencies  including  DARPA,  NASA,  NIH/NLM,  and  NSF  (as  well  as  the  Library  of
Congress  and  the  National  Endowment  for  the  Humanities)  played  a  lead  role  in
developing  the  enabling  technologies  for  the  concept  of  digital  libraries  and  sup-
porting  the  creation  of  the  first  generation  of  major  digital  collections  of  human
knowledge  and  artifacts.  Today,  we  take  for  granted  that  written  works,  art,  and
historical  artifacts  are  accessible  to  us  online;  in  1994,  when  the  NITRD  agencies
initiated their digital libraries activities, such access was a dream.

Examples  of  technologies  applied  in  distance  learning  that  originated  in  NITRD
research  include:  modeling  and  simulation  of  experimental  data;  haptic  devices  for
remote manipulation of instruments and visualizations; the Visible Human series of
images of the human body; multi-modal computer interfaces and interactive devices;
hyperwall  technologies;  grid  technologies,  applications,  and  services;  and  wireless,
hybrid, and all-optical networking technologies, to name only a few.

The  National  Science  Foundation—with  its  broad  mission  of  support  for  STEM
education  as  well  as  for  academic  science  and  engineering  research—sponsors  an
array  of  formal  distance-learning  activities,  including  projects  reported  under  the
NITRD  crosscut.  Under  a  recent  NSF  award  to  the  University  of  Houston,  Down-
town,  The  American  Indian  Higher  Education  Consortium  (AIHEC),  the  Hispanic
Association  of  Colleges  and  Universities  (HACU),  and  the  National  Association  for
Equal Opportunity in Higher Education (NAFEO) propose to establish the Minority

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

Serving  Institutions  (MSI)-Cyberinfrastructure  (CI)  Empowerment  Coalition  (MSI–
CIEC)  to  foster  a  CI-enabled  distributed  education  and  research  network  providing
e-science  education  and  research  opportunities  to  MSI  faculty  and  students.  MSI–
CIEC  will  provide  the  ‘‘human  middleware’’—the  social  and  technological  mecha-
nisms  facilitating  the  necessary  communication  and  support  linkages  between  MSI
faculty  and  students,  and  researchers  associated  with  e-science  and  CI  initiatives.
NIH  supports  professional  distance  learning  through  the  National  Library  of
Medicine’s (NLM’s) PubMed and Medline digital archives as well as through a grow-
ing  assortment  of  biomedical  image  and  data  collections  and  networks  for  sharing
such information. The NLM also supports experiments and training in telemedicine
applications. The NIH Office of Science Education provides online resources for edu-
cators,  an  e-mentoring  program  for  high  school  and  college  students,  and  career-
planning materials.

NSA  and  NSF  are  partnering  with  other  funders  in  a  North  Carolina  program
with  distance-learning  components  that  are  applied  to  help  support  exceptional  K–
12 teachers in STEM improve their curricula by working with higher-education fac-
ulty  and  researchers.  Through  the  Kenan  Fellows  Program  (KFP)  for  Curriculum
and  Leadership  Development,  the  competitively  selected  teachers  spend  two  years
conducting  experiments  with  researchers  and  developing  new  curriculum  ideas  and
techniques based on their work.
Non-NITRD examples:

Though not part of the NITRD crosscut, NASA operates what is perhaps the Fed-
eral  Government’s  most  vibrant  distance-learning  activity,  in  that  the  agency  has
incorporated  outreach  by  means  of  advanced  digital  technologies  into  its  real-time
explorations  of  Earth  and  space,  including  vast  archives  of  scientific  images  and
broadcasts from space. Microsoft’s WorldWide Telescope and Google Sky are innova-
tive tools for experiential learning enabled by the data resources of the Sloan Digital
Sky  Survey,  the  Hubble  Space  telescope,  the  Wilkinson  Microwave  Anisotropy
Probe,  and  the  IRAS  (infrared),  Chandra  (x-ray)  and  GALEX  (ultraviolet)  missions.
Although it is not part of the NITRD crosscut, the Information Resources Manage-
ment College of DOD’s National Defense University offers 50 graduate-level courses
that can be taken in a ‘‘distributed learning’’ format. These courses focus on various
aspects  of  information  technology  leadership  leading  to  certificates  for  CIO,  includ-
ing:  Information  Assurance,  IT  Project  Management,  Organizational  Trans-
formation,  and  Enterprise  Architecture.  These  courses  are  available  to  Federal,
State,  and  local  government  employees  who  are  college  graduates,  and  to  govern-
ment  contractors.  This  provides  an  excellent  example  of  how  the  NITRD  agencies
are  using  distance  learning  capabilities  to  meet  their  own  education  and  training
needs.

As  noted  in  my  written  testimony,  we  are  incorporating  education  issues  in  the
NITRD strategic planning process, and have initiated a fast-track study of NIT edu-
cation  as  recommended  by  PCAST.  In  addition,  NITRD’s  SEW  Coordinating  Group
will  hold  a  workshop  September  16,  2008  to  bring  together  representatives  of  Fed-
eral  agencies,  including  non-NITRD  agencies,  with  responsibilities  in  the  education
arena. The workshop will focus on both the role of NIT in education and NIT work-
force needs for the future. This meeting is intended to kick off an ongoing education
activity under NITRD’s strategic planning process.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Daniel A. Reed, Director, Scalable and Multicore Computing, Microsoft

Corporation

Questions submitted by Chairman Bart Gordon
Q1. Are there areas of IT research that are good candidates for international cooper-
ative efforts that would leverage U.S. investments but would not otherwise harm
U.S. competitive advantages, such as being first to market for a new technology?
What  mechanisms  are  available,  or  could  be  instituted,  to  facilitate  such  inter-
national cooperative research?

A1. This is an extraordinarily complex problem, given the global nature of informa-
tion  technology  and  the  role  that  U.S.  multinational  computing  companies  play
around the world. As with all technologies, one must chose carefully, leveraging the
intellectual  value  of  international  collaboration,  while  avoiding  the  loss  of  competi-
tive advantage in the U.S.

In an increasingly competitive environment, it is unlikely, however, that the U.S.
will  maintain  intellectual  leadership  in  all  areas  of  computing.  Thus,  in  certain
areas, it is in our interests to collaborate. For example, the European Union is now
highly competitive with the United States on formal verification and embedded sys-
tems research.

In  addition  to  specific  technology  areas,  one  might  focus  on  the  applications  of
computing  to  international  problems,  climate  change,  the  environment  and  global
health  and  nutrition.  In  these  domains,  there  are  many  computing  research  chal-
lenges,  including  data  management  and  mining,  software  and  computer  architec-
ture.  This  is  just  one  area  where  international  collaboration  might  benefit  the  U.S.
Regardless  of  the  chosen  areas,  one  must  remember  that  the  benefits  from  re-
search accrue disproportionately to the Nation in which that research is performed.
Because information, such as advancements in basic science, is most easily commu-
nicated  through  interpersonal  interactions,  having  those  interactions  occur  within
our  borders  makes  it  much  more  likely  that  U.S.  industry  will  capitalize  on  those
advancements.
Q2. Do  you  have  suggestions  for  how  the  U.S.  could  institute  a  public-private  re-
search  partnership  to  advance  the  capabilities  of  cyber-physical  systems  analo-
gous  to  the  EU’s  ARTEMIS  initiative?  Could  such  an  undertaking  be  planned
and carried out under the NITRD program?

A2. Yes, such an undertaking is possible. ARTEMIS is structured around the Euro-
pean Union R&D processes, with much tighter academic and industry collaboration
than is typical in the U.S. To be globally competitive, I believe the U.S. must recon-
sider  some  of  the  ways  industry-academic  collaborations  are  currently  structured
and  reassess  the  reward  metrics  and  associated  intellectual  property  mechanisms.
Moreover, industrial-academic partnerships in U.S. have often been difficult given
the  financial  focus  on  quarterly  returns.  We  must  restructure  the  compact  among
the  parties  in  a  way  that  industry  invests  in  an  appropriate  share  of  long-term  re-
search. Microsoft, for example, is investing aggressively in long-term research, both
via Microsoft Research and via external funding to academic partners.

Cyber-physical  systems  span  a  broad  spectrum,  from  national  and  international
infrastructure  to  home  heating  and  cooling  controls,  and  would  be  a  candidate  for
this  type  of  partnership.  This  is  an  area  where  opportunities  might  be  best  identi-
fied  by  a  series  of  focused,  government-academe-industry  workshops.  The  NITRD
program  would  be  best  served  by  picking  one  or  two  target  areas  that  could  be  de-
fined clearly and focused on removing programmatic impediments to success.
Q3. Are  the  R&D  objectives  of  the  NITRD  program,  as  it  is  currently  constituted
prioritized appropriated and is the allocation of funding consistent with achiev-
ing the objectives? Are there particular research areas that the NITRD program
is not pursuing with sufficient resources?

A3. No, not at present. We must increase investment in software and cyber-physical
systems (see below), even if it means decreasing funding in some other areas.

In  addition  to  software,  we  need  better  tools  for  managing  the  explosive  growth
of computer-generated data. The era of the personal petabytes is very near, and our
mechanisms  for  ensuring  long-term  data  preservation,  security  and  privacy  are  ill-
suited  to  today’s  data  volumes,  much  less  those  expected  in  the  future.  Moreover,
extracting  insight  from  such  large  volumes  of  distributed  data  remains  extraor-
dinary difficult.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

Finally,  and  perhaps  most  importantly,  we  must  take  a  systemic,  scalable  ap-
proach  to  integrated  computing  challenges.  Many,  arguably  most,  of  the  computing
R&D  challenges  require  multi-disciplinary  teams  of  computing  researchers—com-
puter  architects,  hardware  designers,  system  software  researchers,  network  vision-
aries, programming model and tool experts, data mining and management research-
ers, and domain experts.

Our  current  research  ecosystem  makes  it  difficult  to  both  assemble  such  teams
and  to  sustain  them  long  enough  to  mount  explorations  of  systemic  challenges.  It
was  for  this  reason  that  the  1999  PITAC  report  recommended  funding  large-scale,
revolutionary  explorations—Expeditions  to  the  21st  Century.  Such  explorations,  in-
volving  academe,  government  and  industry,  are  a  missing  element  of  our  research
ecosystem and would go far to rebalance the risk-reward portfolio of the NITRD pro-
gram in favor of more long-term, high-risk research.
Q4. The  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  (PCAST)  rec-
ommends  that  the  NITRD  program  provide  increased  support  for  research  on
software  but  does  not  cite  specific  research  needs  where  the  current  program  is
deficient. Do you have recommendations for how the NITRD’s investment in soft-
ware research could be strengthened, assuming no substantial increases in over-
all funding?

A4. There are at least four major software challenges before us today; each is equal-
ly important.

I. Reliability  and  correctness  of  large  software  systems.  Much  of  our  critical
national  infrastructure  and  our  daily  lives  depend  on  software  systems—
our financial markets, communication systems, electrical power grid, trans-
portation  infrastructure,  signals  intelligence,  commercial  web  services  and
enterprise  software.  Our  lives  and  even  our  identities  are  dependent  on
software  systems  that  manage  information  and  infrastructure  on  our  be-
half,  yet  we  do  not  have  good  methods  to  ensure  the  reliability  of  these
systems or to design them to operate correctly—on time and on budget.

II. Cyber-physical  system  software  models  and  tools.  In  some  sense,  cyber-
physical systems are a special case of the first challenge, albeit with great-
er coupling of sensors, actuators and communication via wired and wireless
networks.  From  an  implanted  pacemaker  to  the  electronic  fuel  injection
and  anti-skid  brakes  in  today’s  automobiles  though  avionics  in  a  military
or  commercial  jet,  cyber-physical  systems  touch  us  minute-by-minute.
These  distributed  systems  are  ubiquitous,  because  their  advantages  are
manifold,  but  also  difficult  to  design  and  validate,  given  their  complexity
and the interdependence among disparate components. Moreover, failure of
one  system  component  can  have  far-reaching  and  often  disastrous  con-
sequences. (Consider, for example, the global effects of a single design fail-
ure in a commercial jet’s avionics system.)

III. Security,  privacy  and  resilience  in  an  uncertain  world.  Almost  all  of  our
critical  data—personal,  corporate  and  government—reside  in  distributed
data systems and networks. Many of these systems are vulnerable to cyber
attacks  and  to  malicious  behavior.  We  must  develop  tools  and  techniques
to design more resilient systems, and ones that are provably secure.

IV. Efficient  and  easy-to-use  tools  for  multicore  programming.  For  over  thirty
years, we have been the beneficiaries of a virtuous cycle of new and richer
computing systems, powered by ever faster microprocessors. Each new gen-
eration of processors executed old software faster and enabled new capabili-
ties—graphical  interfaces,  speech  recognition  systems  and  mobile  devices.
Today, device power limits are forcing a new approach to chip design—plac-
ing  multiple  processors  on  each  chip.  Such  multicore  systems  pose
daunting  challenges  for  software  development,  requiring  parallel  program-
ming  to  deliver  high  performance  on  new  applications.  However,  we  lack
the  necessary  tools  that  would  enable  software  developers  to  exploit  these
multicore  processors  easily  and  effectively.  This  multicore  programming
crisis  is  one  of  the  deepest  facing  the  commercial  software  industry  today,
and  inadequate  research  investment  in  years  past  is  one  of  our  current
problems.

Unless we find solutions to these problems—and soon—not only will we risk cata-
strophic  failure  of  critical  national  infrastructure,  the  virtuous  cycle  of  hardware-
software  innovation  that  has  driven  the  computing  industry  will  be  threatened.
Some  of  these,  such  as  ensuring  correctness  and  reliability  in  large,  complex  soft-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

ware  systems,  are  longstanding.  Others,  such  as  multicore  programming,  are  more
recent.

In  a  fixed  budget  scenario,  we  must  reallocate  funds  from  other,  lower  priority
R&D activities and better manage and coordinate extant investments to increase ef-
ficiencies by eliminating redundant activities.
Q5. Does  the  research  community—both  academe  and  industry—have  a  voice  in  in-
fluencing  the  research  priorities  under  the  NITRD  program?  Are  improvements
needed in the external advisory process for the NITRD program?

A5. Yes,  but  not  a  fully  effective  voice.  Academe  influences  research  priorities  via
workshops  and  joint  meetings  with  the  NITRD  program  agencies,  but  the  relative
investments  in  specific  technical  agendas  are  more  often  driven  by  agency  needs
than  by  community  priorities.  The  NSF,  as  a  research  agency,  is  perhaps  the  most
responsive to community priorities but even there proposals for specific budget allo-
cations are rarely discussed with the community.

On  the  industry  side,  there  are  fewer  mechanisms  for  community  engagement
with  NITRD  agencies.  In  general,  industry  trade  associations  tend  to  represent
short-term  issues,  rather  than  the  basic  research  topics  central  to  the  NITRD  port-
folio. Individual companies do engage, but do so carefully lest they be viewed as ad-
vancing parochial interests.

I  believe  we  must  have  greater  coordination  across  the  government-academic-in-
dustry  partnership.  Our  international  competitors  recognize  the  critical  importance
of  such  partnerships.  We  cannot  afford  to  continue  to  treat  the  three  partners  as
arms-length  collaborators.  Hence,  we  need  much  more  than  pro  forma  workshops
and  meetings  which  ‘‘rubber  stamp’’  extant  agendas  if  we  are  to  maintain  our  com-
petitive position. We also need to find new ways for collaborative technical partner-
ships across government, academe and industry, including honest assessments of in-
tellectual property issues.

PCAST  recommended  that  the  NITRD  program  increase  its  strategic  planning
and  define  roadmaps  for  realizing  the  strategic  plans.  These  planning  exercises,  to-
gether  with  public  assessments  of  progress  against  the  plans,  would  be  an  ideal
mechanism to engage academe and industry to regularly scheduled assessments and
recommendations.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Craig A. Stewart, Chair, Coalition for Academic Scientific Computing;

Associate Dean, Research Technologies, Indiana University

Note: these responses are presented by Dr. Stewart on behalf of CASC. These re-
sponses  have  been  endorsed  by  a  majority  vote  of  CASC  members,  without  dissen-
sions.

Questions submitted by Chairman Bart Gordon
Q1. Are there areas of IT research that are good candidates for international cooper-
ative efforts that would leverage U.S. investments but would not otherwise harm
U.S. competitive advantages, such as being first to market for a new technology?
What  mechanisms  are  available,  or  could  be  instituted,  to  facilitate  such  inter-
national cooperative research?

A1. As  a  general  approach  to  networking  and  information  technology,  CASC  rec-
ommends  focusing  on  international  collaboration  efforts  that  will  set  standards  for
inter-operability.  Examples  include  standards  set  by  the  Open  Grid  Forum  (http:/
/www.ogf.org/)  for  grid  computing  and  international  standards  for  networking.
Over the next several years, two areas should be priorities:

• Advanced  optical  networking  standards  and  techniques  for  high-bandwidth
connections (e.g., greater than 40 gigabits per second), techniques for dynamic
creation of dedicated networks in support of virtual organizations, and devel-
opment of sensor networks for environmental and resource monitoring.
• Identity  management—particularly  creation  of  national  online  identity  man-
agement  systems  for  research  cyberinfrastructures,  and  the  creation  of  inter-
national  trust  relationships  between  such  systems  where  appropriate.  This
would  greatly  facilitate  international  collaboration  across  many  areas  of
science and technology. One example would be establishing InCommon (http:/
/www.incommonfederation.org/)  as  the  definitive  U.S.  credential  manage-
ment system for research IT (as CASC has previously recommended).

Such  efforts  might  be  funded  via  international  collaboration  of  U.S.  federal  fund-
ing  agencies  and  the  European  Union  Research  Framework  Programme  (http://
cordis.europa.eu/fp7/home¥en.html).  A  joint  call  with  issues  by  the  U.S.  and  the
EU Research Framework Programme, and joint funding, would be a highly effective
way  to  promote  international  collaboration  in  networking  and  information  tech-
nology.

The  creation  of  internationally  accepted  standards  for  inter-operability  of  net-
working and information technology systems is essential to the U.S. and to its abil-
ity  to  cooperate  internationally.  We  believe  that  the  U.S.  then  competes  by  devel-
oping  the  best  implementations  of  information  technology,  the  most  effective  cyber-
physical systems, and the most effective interaction of simulation via computer and
verification through experimentation. In this way the U.S. can collaborate when ap-
propriate, and compete (and win) when competing is appropriate.
Q2. Do  you  have  suggestions  for  how  the  U.S.  could  institute  a  public-private  re-
search  partnership  to  advance  the  capabilities  of  cyber-physical  systems  analo-
gous to the EU’s ARTEMIS initiative? Could such an initiative be planned and
carried out under the NITRD program?

A2. The  ARTEMIS  initiative  is  an  excellent  model,  and  establishing  a  partnership
based precisely on this model could and should be carried out under the NITRD pro-
gram. A critical element for success of such a program in the U.S. would be to fund
time for U.S. academic researchers to work as part of such collaborative efforts. The
most  valuable  commodity  brought  to  private-public  partnerships  is  the  time  of  the
public  sector  experts  and  researchers.  U.S.  university  and  college  technology  trans-
fer  offices  tend  to  focus  on  intellectual  property  outcomes  resulting  from  collabo-
rative  research  before  such  research  is  even  initiated.  These  negotiations  are  a  sig-
nificant  obstacle  to  public-private  collaboration.  This  situation  arises  in  part  as  a
result  of  the  interpretations  of  the  Bayh-Dole  Act.  For  a  public-private  partnership
modeled  on  ARTEMIS  to  be  most  effective,  it  might  be  helpful  to  include  specific
terms  in  a  solicitation  (with,  if  needed,  accompanying  legislation)  that  facilitates
partnership  and  innovation  by  establishing  clear  guidelines  for  technology  transfer
to the private sector and rights to and payment for same.
Q3. Are  the  R&D  objectives  of  the  NITRD  program,  as  it  is  currently  constituted,
prioritized appropriately and is the allocation of funding consistent with achiev-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

ing  the  objectives?  Are  their  particular  research  areas  that  the  NITRD  program
is not pursuing with sufficient resources?

A3. The  prioritization  recommended  in  the  PCAST  report  is,  overall,  appropriate.
(I  note  that  in  the  written  testimony  CASC  added  increased  focus  on  complexity-
hiding  interfaces  such  as  Science  Gateways  as  a  new  area  for  emphasis  that  has
come to the fore since the PCAST report).

However,  the  objectives  set  forth  in  the  PCAST  recommendations  cannot  be  car-
ried  out  effectively,  in  ways  that  preserve  U.S.  international  competitiveness,  with-
out substantial increases in the NITRD budget.

CASC  recommends  a  significant  increase  in  the  NITRD  budget,  with  focus  par-

ticularly on three areas:

• Creation of a national research cyberinfrastructure as an interagency activity.
Such  a  national  cyberinfrastructure  should  have  significantly  greater  capa-
bility  than  the  aggregate  of  the  various  federal  agency  initiatives.  We  echo
and  support  particularly  Dr.  Reed’s  testimony  on  the  point  of  interagency
funding  balance.  Because  there  are  multiple  large-scale  cyberinfrastructure
efforts, and because none of the cyberinfrastructure systems are yet straight-
forward  enough  for  most  researchers  to  use,  the  number  of  researchers  cur-
rently  using  such  advanced  facilities  is  in  the  low  tens  of  thousands.  U.S.
global  competitiveness  would  be  best  supported  if  hundreds  of  thousands  of
researchers could use these facilities.

• Rebalancing the NITRD budget so that a relatively greater fraction of overall
funding  is  devoted  to  software  development.  Three  areas  stand  out  in  par-
ticular:  development  of  parallel  programming  tools  and  applications  for
multicore  processors;  hardening  and  sustainability  of  software  critical  to  the
Nation’s research; and funding for the creation of complexity-hiding interfaces
such as Science Gateways. Because most existing software does not efficiently
exploit  the  power  of  multicore  processors,  and  because  there  is  insufficient
funding  for  development  of  new  multicore  programming  tools  and  applica-
tions,  much  of  the  power  of  multicore  processors  goes  unexploited  in  com-
puting  systems  ranging  from  laptops  to  the  largest  supercomputers.  Because
there  is  insufficient  funding  for  hardening  of  innovative  software,  and  its
maintenance as a general tool for public sector research, much innovative and
useful  software  is  not  as  widely  (or  as  long)  used  as  it  could  or  should  be.
And  the  lack  of  sufficient  funding  for  the  development  of  complexity-hiding
interfaces is one of the primary factors behind the difficulty U.S. researchers
have  in  using  current  NITRD-funded  cyberinfrastructure.  U.S.  research  com-
petitiveness suffers as a result of all of these factors.

• Increased attention to training and development of the next generation of re-
searchers  and  programmers.  We  note  in  particular  that  parallel  computing—
one of the most difficult forms of computing for programmers to master—has
migrated  from  what  was  once  a  tiny  niche  of  the  computing  market  into  the
overwhelming  majority  of  computing  systems,  from  mainframes  to  laptops,
and soon into cell phones as well. At colleges and universities worldwide, com-
puter  science  departments  are  uncovering  serious  deficiencies  in  their  ability
to teach parallel computing. Because of lack of training, there is more impor-
tant  work  to  be  done  than  there  are  researchers  and  programmers  available
in  the  U.S.  to  do  it.  That  means  that  important  work  is  either  not  done  at
all or is done outside the U.S.

I note that it is likely rare that any concerned individual or group representative
appears  before  Congress  and  states  ‘‘the  area  in  which  we  work  receives  too  much
money’’  or  even  ‘‘the  area  in  which  we  work  is  properly  funded.’’  CASC’s  rec-
ommendation for an increase in the NITRD program is not intended to be self-serv-
ing,  however.  The  areas  in  which  increased  funding  is  most  critically  needed  (ex-
panded national cyberinfrastructure, and even greater expansion in funding for soft-
ware  and  education  and  training)  are  needed  so  that  the  networking  and  informa-
tion  technology  can  better  serve  the  other  U.S.  communities  and  research  dis-
ciplines.  The  need  is  severe  as  well.  The  funding  needed  to  ensure  U.S.  leadership
in  networking  and  information  technology  innovation,  and  the  application  of  these
innovations  in  ways  that  maintain  U.S.  global  leadership,  is  not  a  few  percentage
points but rather on the order of hundreds of millions of dollars. We recognize that
there are many pressures on the federal budget. Maintaining U.S. global leadership
in networking and information technology is essential to the long-term U.S. security
and prosperity. Increased investment is essential now.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

Q4. The  President’s  council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  (PCAST)  rec-
ommends  that  the  NITRD  program  provide  increased  support  for  research  on
software  but  does  not  cite  specific  research  needs  where  the  current  program  is
deficient.  Do  you  have  recommendations  for  how  the  NITRD’s  investments  in
software  research  could  be  strengthened,  assuming  no  substantial  increases  in
overall funding?

A4. Let  me  begin  by  reiterating  the  point  made  in  response  to  an  earlier  question:
the objectives set forth in the PCAST recommendations cannot be carried out effec-
tively, in ways that preserve U.S. international competitiveness, without substantial
increases in the NITRD budget.

Having  said  that,  CASC  suggests  that  the  following  specific  areas  of  software  re-

search are currently inadequate and should be particularly strengthened:

• Programming languages, compilers, run-time environments, and performance
analysis  and  management  tools,  particularly  for  parallel  computing  using
multicore processors.
• Complexity-hiding  interfaces,  such  as  Science  Gateways,  so  that  the  benefits
of  advanced  networking  and  information  technology  systems  may  be  more
easily used by the U.S. science and engineering communities.
• Software  for  management  and  analysis  of  massive  data  sets  and  real  time
data  streams,  including  automated  metadata  creation,  provenance  manage-
ment, and real time analytic and visual analysis tools.
• For advanced simulation and prediction software, increased funding for inter-
disciplinary  research  that  will  test  simulations  and  predictions  against  real
life phenomena and improve software accuracy and validity as a result.
• Across all areas of software research, funding for the transformation of inno-
vative  software  into  software  that  is  robust,  widely  usable,  well  supported,
and maintained over time. This recommendation echoes my testimony on the
point  of  consistency  in  funding  streams  over  time  and  its  importance  in  pre-
serving the human capital and expertise required to keep software useful over
time. Within the trio of research, development, and delivery, U.S. competitive-
ness in the future will be critically dependent upon more funding for develop-
ment and delivery.

Q5. Does  the  research  community—both  academe  and  industry—have  a  voice  in  in-
fluencing  the  research  priorities  under  the  NITRD  program?  Are  improvements
needed in the external advisory process for the NITRD program?

A5. The Committee on Science and Technology’s hearing of 31 July was an excellent
opportunity for the research community to comment on the priorities of the NITRD
program, and we very much appreciate that opportunity.

The research community has a voice, particularly through PCAST, but it is a voice
that  is  less  focused  on  networking  and  information  technology—and  thus  less
strong—than  during  the  tenure  of  the  President’s  Information  Technology  Advisory
Committee.  We  thus  recommend  the  re-creation  of  a  President’s  Information  Tech-
nology Advisory Committee to add to the advisory input that is currently heard via
the excellent work of PCAST.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Don  C.  Winter,  Vice  President,  Engineering  and  Information  Tech-

nology, Phantom Works, the Boeing Company

Questions submitted by Chairman Bart Gordon
Q1. Are there areas of IT research that are good candidates for international cooper-
ative efforts that would leverage U.S. investments but would not otherwise harm
U.S. competitive advantages, such as being first to market for a new technology?
What  mechanisms  are  available,  or  could  be  instituted,  to  facilitate  such  inter-
national cooperative research?

A1. We  believe  that  there  are  several  areas  that  would  be  good  candidates.  The
areas  of  High  End  Computing  Infrastructure  and  Applications  (HEC  l&A).  High
End Computing R&D, Human Computer Interactions and Information Management
(HCI  &  IM),  and  Large  Scale  Networking  (LSN)  are  good  candidates  for  inter-
national  cooperative  efforts.  They  are  rich  in  pre-competitive  research  challenges
and offer substantial leverage opportunities and potentially significant cost savings.
International cooperative research might be facilitated through the creation of joint
projects  addressing  ‘‘grand  challenges.’’  Targeted  expenditures  for  international  col-
laboration  are  already  in-place  at  NSF—however,  we  are  not  aware  of  metrics  that
enable  us  to  assess  the  leverage  or  potential  cost  savings  to  development  programs
of these collaborations.
Q2. Do  you  have  suggestions  for  how  the  U.S.  could  institute  a  public-private  re-
search  partnership  to  advance  the  capabilities  of  cyber-physical  systems  analo-
gous  to  the  EU’s  ARTEMIS  initiative?  Could  such  an  undertaking  be  planned
and carried out under the NITRD program?

A2. We  believe  that  this  could  be  achieved  by  creating  Industry/University  Con-
sortia  to  perform  pre-competitive  research  on  industry-provided  testbeds.  The  ‘‘in-
dustrial  strength’’  fidelity  of  the  testbeds  is  critical  to  ensuring  that  the  research
focuses on the highest payback elements of the problem space of cyber-physical sys-
tems.  Consortia  focused  on  more  applied  levels  have  been  highly  successful  and  in-
clude USCAR (U.S. Council for Automotive Research) and AVSI (Aerospace Vehicle
Systems Institute).

Fundimg  for  the  consortia  could  be  assembled  from:  1)  Industry:  Internal  Re-

search & Development; 2) Academia: Government; 3) Testbed—Government.

We  propose  a  model  based  upon  joint  work  of  integrated  projects  as  opposed  to
loose/spontaneous collaborations. While the latter model can sometimes produce im-
portant  benefits,  we  believe  the  focus  needs  to  be  the  synergistic  development  of
fundamental  science  directly  motivated  and  evaluated  on  realistic  challenge  prob-
lems from industry. In this rapidly evolving field where time and resources are lim-
ited,  this  is  the  most  effective  way  to  build  a  core  technology  base.  Knowledge  and
technology  is  best  transitioned  by  people  working  on  well  defined  problems  using
industrial strength testbeds.

While  it  is  possible  that  this  activity  could  be  carried  out  under  NITRD,  it  is  not
clear  that  there  are  existing  mechanisms  for  accomplishing  this.  From  our  perspec-
tive,  a  task  force  consisting  of  representatives  from  industry  and  academia  should
be  created  to  examine  potential  models,  and  recommend  the  appropriate  structure
within  the  next  90  days.  A  further  recommendation  is  that  task  force  leadership
should  be  provided  by  industry  to  emphasize  the  need  to  consider  novel  organiza-
tional and execution models.
Q3. Are  the  R&D  objectives  of  the  NITRD  program,  as  it  is  currently  constituted,
prioritized appropriately and is the allocation of funding consistent with achiev-
ing the objectives? Are there particular research areas that the NITRD program
is not pursuing with sufficient resources?

A3. From  our  perspective  the  R&D  objectives,  as  indicated  by  funding  levels,  are
not optimally prioritized. Nearly 50 percent of the FY 2008 and 2009 NITRD budg-
ets ($1.5B out of $3.3B in FY08) are allocated to High End Computing (Architecture,
Infrastructure,  and  R&D).  HEC  is  not  at  present  an  area  where  we  feel  U.S.  com-
petitiveness  is  at  stake.  Expenditures  for  Human  Computer  Interaction  and  Infor-
mation  Management  ($0.8B)  also  appear  out  of  proportion  relative  to  the  need  and
potential gains in research and competitiveness to be attained. The PCAST correctly
pointed out the need to substantially increase the level of spending on CPS—which
is  not  even  explicitly  mentioned  among  the  programs  in  NITRD  budget  documents.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

We  believe  that  CPS  should  be  included  as  a  separate  program  under  NITRD
since  this  would  provide  transparency  of  budget  allocations  to  this  critical  tech-
nology area. Fundamental research progress in CPS will have long-term benefits to
assuring  competitive  position  in  Aerospace,  Automotive,  Energy  Management,
Health  and  other  areas.  Furthermore,  the  low  level  of  funding  for  High  Confidence
Software  and  Systems  (HCSS)  ($0.12B),  and  Software  Design  &  Productivity  (SDP)
($0.073B)  do  not  adequately  address  the  needs  and  challenges  for  CPS,  and  are  in-
sufficient to stimulate breakthroughs required, especially in large scale CPS systems
common to DOD and commercial Aerospace and Energy applications.

We  are  also  concerned  about  the  isolation  of  Cyber  Security  and  Information  As-
surance  (CSIA)  from  the  systems  domains  (HCI  &  IM,  LSN,  HCSS,  SEW,  SDP).
CPS  must  include  an  essential  CSIA  program  element  because  of  the  unique
vulnerabilities  and  consequences  associated  with  the  target  industries.  What  we
need  is  CPS  focused  R&D  in  CSIA,  tightly  integrated  with  all  other  research  chal-
lenges.
Q4. The  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  (PCAST)  rec-
ommends  that  the  NITRD  program  provide  increased  support  for  research  on
software  but  does  not  specify  research  needs  where  the  current  program  is  defi-
cient.  Do  you  have  recommendations  for  how  the  NITRD’s  investment  in  soft-
ware research could he strengthened, assuming no substantial increases in over-
all funding?

A4. A number of workshops have been conducted since 2005, led by Dr. Andre Van
Tilborg (Director of the Information Systems Directorate in the Office of the Deputy
Under  Secretary  of  Defense  for  Science  and  Technology)  that  sought  Government,
Industry, and Academic perspectives on Software Intensive Systems. The workshops
highlighted  the  clear  need  and  established  a  framework  for  a  software  research
agenda.  The  aerospace  industry  in  particular  (Boeing,  Lockheed,  Raytheon,  Nor-
throp, BAE, Honeywell, among others) presented a common perspective on the need
and  benefits  of  testbed  driven  software  research.  Elements  of  the  research  agenda
are  published  in  a  study  on  Ultra  Large  Scale  Systems.  While  the  total  level  of
NITRD  investment  may  be  adequate,  funds  should  be  shifted  from  HEC  and  HCI
&  IM  to  CPS  focused  investments  in  HCSS,  Cyber  Security,  and  Software  Design
due to its significantly larger impact on U.S. competitiveness. In addition, increased
investment  in  these  areas  holds  significant  potential  for  reducing  costs  for  DOD
CPS software developments.
Q5. Does  the  research  community—both  academe  and  industry—have  a  voice  in  in-
fluencing  the  research  priorities  under  the  NITRD  program?  Are  improvements
needed in the external advisory process for the NITRD program?

A5. Industry  has  had  a  very  limited  voice  in  influencing  research  priorities  of
NITRD  program.  Organizations  like  PCAST  have  influence  at  a  strategic  level  but
they  have  little  influence  in  implementation.  We  believe  that  proactive  industrial
participation  in  shaping  NITRD  priorities  and  participation  in  the  research  agenda
is key to achieving breakthroughs required.
Q6. The  top  recommendation  of  the  PCAST  assessment  of  the  NITRD  program  for
new research investments is in the area of cyber-physical systems. You have been
engaged  with  your  colleagues  from  industry,  academia,  and  government  in  dis-
cussions  of  research  requirements  in  this  field.  What  is  the  status  of  these  dis-
cussions?  Are  there  plans  to  develop  a  set  of  research  goals  and  a  roadmap  for
achieving these goals?

A6. The  discussions  on  research  requirements  continue.  Under  the  auspices  of  the
aforementioned  workshops,  we  have  formed  industry  teams  in  aerospace,  energy
management, and automotive and are working to finalize technology roadmaps. The
discussions  were  initiated  in  May  2007  at  a  CPS  roundtable  conducted  with  rep-
resentatives  from  industry  (BAE,  Boeing,  Lockheed,  Honeywell,  United  Technology,
IBM,  etc.).  Academia  (Carnegie  Mellon,  UCB,  Vanderbilt,  etc.),  and  Government
(NSF,  DOD,  etc.).  We  have  developed  initial  industrial  roadmaps  that  need  to  be
finalized and then shared with the research community at large.
Q7. What  do  you  see  as  the  relative  roles  of  industry-sponsored  research  and  feder-
ally-sponsored  research  in  moving  this  technology  area  forward  and  giving  the
U.S. a strong position?

A7. The  major  issue  here  is  that  the  CPS  research  agenda  is  cross-cutting  and
spans multiple industries. Much of the research required is of a pre-competitive na-
ture—where industry-sponsored research dollars are inherently limited. The current
approach of Federal Government-sponsored research in this area has not adequately

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

addressed  ‘‘industrial  strength’’  real-world  challenge  problems,  and  not  created  sig-
nificant  transition  pathways  outside  of  the  academic  world.  Greater  industrial  par-
ticipation  in  executing  the  research  agenda  is  critical  to  success  and  will  spur  the
focused industrial-academic collaboration needed for significant progress.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:35 Nov 28, 2008 Jkt 043688 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL08\073108\43688 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

